THE
COUNTESS IDA.
CHAPTER I.
It
was six when Claude returned to his hotel. He
was met at the door by his friend Denham, who had just
arrived from London. Of all men, he was the one he
most esteemed and loved. He was, in some respects,
the antithesis of Claude, and it was, perhaps, this very
difference which made them more attached to each
other. He was totally without Claude's
contemplative
habits, but usually acted from impulses which, if
not always prudent or wise, were always noble. He
was frank, generous, and bold; full of strong
affections
and quick passions; a faithful friend, and a good
hater. In one respect he differed widely from his
friend. He held duelling to be a custom, under
certain
circumstances, sanctioned by necessity, and
useful
in its effects upon society. Without any
particularly
serious views of religion, he professed to believe
that, in the present state of the world, the meek
doctrines
of Christianity were permitted at times to give
way to other considerations bearing upon individual
character and the general harmony of society; in short,
he was also a duellist, though in a far different way
from the debauched, vindictive, and cruel Elkington.
The latter adopted the principle as a mode of
shielding
himself in a course of profligacy, and of acquiring
a notoriety of which a purer mind or a more generous
heart would have been ashamed; the former as a
means of protecting his person from insult and his
name from calumny, and of redressing all unjust
injuries
directed either against himself or his friends.
He thought the world was thronged with persons who
might be regarded as beasts of prey, ready to attack
those not prepared with means of physical defence,
and that the same principle which permitted a
traveller
to use a pistol against a highwayman, allowed a
resort to the same weapon against those who, by force
or fraud, encroached too far on the rights and feelings
of a gentleman. This subject had often been
discussed
between these two young men, who each
respected
,
while he opposed the opinion of the other.
The delight of such a friendly meeting as now took
place, chased from Claude the clouds with which his
present painful position had long shaded his mind and
countenance. Many and rapid were the inquiries and
replies on either side; and, if anything could have added
to their pleasure, it was the mutual discovery that each
contemplated a tour into southern Germany, and to
spend the winter in Italy. The proposition that Claude
should join the party was at once made and accepted;
and, while listening to the voice of true friendship, so
rarely heard in the crowded halls of fashion, and thus
opening to himself a prospect of freedom from the sad
thoughts and humiliations which had so long
oppressed
him in Berlin, Claude already felt the weakness
of yielding to despondency, and the certainty of finding
contentment, if not happiness, elsewhere; even after
having parted for ever from the object of his now so
deep but melancholy love. It was not long before
Denham had drawn from his ingenuous friend a clear
account of what had happened since his last letter
of his almost formal dismissal by the Carolan family
of the malignant enmity of Elkington and his dark
threatsand of the challenge and its refusal. He
looked grave for a moment, and said,
You must get away at once if you are determined
to suffer this puppy to calumniate you with impunity;
Vol. II.B
and I fear also, lest, in some personal encounter, you
might be placed in an awkward position.
I fear nothing, said Claude, and I will certainly
make no open demonstration of a desire to avoid him.
I have offered to Carolan all the necessary
explanations
respecting the falsehood of his charges, and I
have openly pronounced them false. I am yet more
than ever firmly persuaded, that a man who has nothing
to reproach himself with, should, where legal redress
is not advisable or possible, point to the tenour of a
blameless life as the sole reply to passing slanders.
Denham shook his head.
I have a great mind, said he, and, were it not
for Mary, I
would
make him eat his words myself.
Even as it is
No, Charles, said Claude. Remember you
are a husband, and have no right to risk your wife's
happiness, whatever you may choose to do with your
own.
Well, then, let us get off as soon as possible; we
will take a glance at Berlin, and arrange our
route
for
the summer; but I shall expose this unprincipled
ruffian
that
is my duty, wherever I speak of him; and as
for meeting such a blackleg, for he is nothing more, he
must wash his hands clean from the stain of fraud
upon them before he has a right to call upon me.
Mrs. Denham now entered, and welcomed Claude
with a warmth which proved how sincerely he was
esteemed
where he was really known. With Mrs.
Denham
there was also a lovely little girl, her niece, whom
these amiable people had adopted. Nothing could be
more delightful than the attachment and sunshiny
happiness
which reigned continually in this little circle,
where intelligent and cultivated minds were inspired
by the best impulses that adorn the heart and
character
.
Mrs. Denham was an extremely lovely person
of three or four-and-twenty, with all the ease and
charm of a fashionable woman, without her frivolity or
pretension. The marriage had been one of mutual
attachment, and now presented the agreeable
spectacle
of a union surrounded by a milder but deeper light
of affection, in proportion as the mere illusions of love
gave place to a truer knowledge of character, and a
soberer but not less delightful appreciation of their
relative
position and merits. The little Ellen was an
orphan
,
the daughter of Denham's brother, who had died
without any fortune. She had been carefully
educated
,
and was beloved and watched over with the
tenderest
care; and it was to recruit her health, which
had been somewhat impaired by the closeness of her
application at school, that she was permitted to enjoy
the present excursion. It was, however, by no means
a loss of time, as Mrs. Denham was peculiarly
calculated
to instruct her young charge in all the necessary
branches, and, while she led her willing feet along the
path of knowledge, to teach her correct habits of
thinking
and observing, to awaken and guide in her heart
those impulses, and to instil into her mind those
principles
,
without which the brightest talents and the
fairest charms are worthless and dangerous.
For several days Claude occupied himself with his
friends, in seeing the town and its environs. Now
they walked in the beautiful gardens at
Charlottenbourg
,
and now strolled through the royal grounds and
gorgeous palaces of Potsdam, where the numerous
tokens of the great monarch, philosopher, soldier,
author
,
and statesman, whose spirit had recently quitted
the earth, interested them extremely. All the
curiosities
usually shown to travellers were diligently
explored
,
and many a merry party they had in the course
of these toilsome but exciting labours; and in the
afternoon
,
a drive around the Park or an evening at the
opera furnished new variety to their amusements, and
new and agreeable topics of conversation. In these
constant rounds of occupation Claude almost forgot
his situation. He found in the circle which gathered
every day at dinner, that ease and unreserved gayety
of private life, which pleased him more than all the
brilliancy and pomp of fashion amid which he had
spent the winter. Here all things appeared in their
true value. Rational standards of right and wrong
were the criterions of action, and the heart expanded
and opened its faculties in the warm temperature of
friendship and the sober light of nature.
At length the day of departure was fixed, and all the
necessary arrangements completed. On the afternoon
previous they sat down to dinner for the last time in
Berlin, and it was late ere they ceased the lively
conversation
to which all that they had seen and all that
they expected to see gave rise.
Well, here's a long adieu to Berlin, said
Denham
,
and a health to those who remain behind,
except
that scoundrel Elkington. You may be right,
Claude, in letting him off; but, were I in your place
That's Charles exactly, said Mrs. Denham; I
do believe he has a secret pleasure in being shot at.
I am glad you are going with us. I am sure, Mr.
Wyndham, you are too calm and reflective to suffer
passion to hurry you into actions against right and
reason. Some of your friends are not by half so
sensible
.
Come, come, my love, said Denham, no
scandal
.
Aunt Mary is angry because uncle Charles was
going to fight a duel, said Ellen, before we left
home.
How dare you, said Charles, laughing, betray
your uncle in such a heinous offence? So tell Mr.
Wyndham now the whole story, as a punishment, and
see what he will say to it.
A man said uncle Edward was no gentleman, said
Ellen, coming up to Claude, who drew her towards
him, much pleased with her countenance and manner;
and uncle Charles challenged him, and then the
person
begged his pardon, and said he
was
a gentleman.
To be sure, said Charles, laughing, and that
illustrates my old opinion. Now there was a case,
Claude, where no alternative was left. Upon the fame
of a
gentleman
no one should breathe a doubt. It
should be distinctly understood that such an insult
must be answered, and then there would be fewer
evil tongues. If you permit a man to question your
character as a gentleman with impunity, when will
you stop him? from one word he will advance to
broader onesfrom invectives to distinct charges
and from them toa blow, perhaps. If you are
prepared
,
under any circumstances, to call a person to
account
,
why not begin at the beginning? Why not
refuse
to permit the slightest indignity? Principle upon
such a subject would be very well if you could carry
it out. But since, in case of the last provocation, you
must
seek redress, the
But I do not see why you
must
, said Mrs.
Denham
.
What, even where a blow
Even a
blow
, said she, cannot excuse a man for
committing an action which is at once foolish and
wicked.
There, my love, said Denham, you must
excuse
me; a blow admits of no compromise or
reflection
;
a blow is the worst insult which one man can
inflict upon another. A blow I bear from no man; at
the foot of the altarfrom the hand of the priest or of
a king, it must be punished. It puts consequences
out of the question. It demands that every
consideration
in life should give way to an honourable, instant,
and reckless demand for redress.
And yet our Saviour bore a blow, said Mrs.
Denham
,
and mere mortals have had the greatness of
mind to rise superior to such a humiliation, rather than
commit a criminal or an unwise action. I do not see
why a blow should be such a peculiarly unpardonable
insult, or why, however much it merits proper
retaliation
and punishment, it should stand separate from
other wrongs, and reduce him who has the misfortune
to suffer it from the responsibilities and duties of a
B 2
rational being and of a Christian to a mere madman.
I do not see why an appeal to the laws may not be
made in this case with as much propriety as in any
other. A highwayman robs you of your moneya
swindler defrauds you in a lawsuita man borrows
money of you and refuses to paya person slanders
you or your friendsan incendiary sets your house on
fireall these are wrongs, but you do not feel bound
to abandon your interests here and hereafter for the
sake of taking from the law the task of punishing the
aggressors; but a frantic madmanperhaps inebriated,
and not knowing what he doesdashes his hand into
your face, and straightway you profess to have
received
such a stain in your character, such an injury
in your reputation, as must be remedied by committing
what is really a crime.
It is infamy, said Denham; and what is life
without honour?
And how is honour compromised by a blow?
demanded
Mrs. Denham. Does it make you less
honest
or noble in yourself? Does it make you
treacherous
,
impure, intemperate, or in any way abased or
wicked? Does it alter your affections or violate your
duties? Does it afflict you with a vice or deprive you
of a virtue? for, remember, I am not requiring you to
bear blows without that sensibility which preserves
the proper pride and dignity of a man, or to bear them
in any but a noble cause. How is a calm and virtuous
mind, pressing on in an honourable career of wisdom,
unfolding its powers, and occupied in strengthening and
purifying itself and benefiting othershow is such a
mind degraded by the touch of a thoughtless hand? Is
it not an ennobling and almost a divine effort, which
turns unresistingly from so rash and impotent an
attack
,
and continues to occupy itself only with what is
great and good? Be assured he has lived a doubtful
or an insignificant life who is required to illustrate its
purity or its courage by a duel. Believe me, my dear
husband, continued Mrs. Denham, with a tremulous
voice, existence is a mighty and mysterious gift. It
comes from the hand of God himself. Perhaps we
do not, with all our wisdom, know its true meaning.
Do not seek to destroy that of others for any human
passion. The provocation in your last moment will
show small beside the crime; and reserve your own
life for the duties attached to it. If a man be a
coward
,
taking life for a blow will not give him courage.
If he be not, enduring it will not make him one. How
wisely might every young malapert of the present day,
whose thoughts are of pistols, death, and eternity, on the
slightest casual occasion, take a lesson from the calm
old Greek, who said, `Strike, but hear me!'
My sweet Mary, said Denham, as he regarded
the bright eyes and heightened colour of his wife with
admiration, you speak wellyou speak eloquently
but you speak like a woman. Our Saviour, it is true,
bore a blow, but our Saviour was a
God;
we are
men.
And yet, did we but know it, said Mrs. Denham,
we have within us the power to follow in the
foot-steps
of that Divine Master, who descended to earth
that we might imitate his example. If men would
only study the
spirit
of that religionif a few, even,
would
dare
to think and act for themselves, and to
present
the sounding reply of an irreproachable life to all
that attacked reputationthisthis, indeed, would be
courage
. Am I not right, Mr. Wyndham?
I am certain, said Denham, that Wyndham, with
all his self-control and determination, would consider
himself bound to resent a blow to the last extremity.
I do not see, said Claude, what there is in the
blow of a frantic fool, to absolve from the rules of right
and wrong, or to alter the tenour of a great soul and a
rational mind. The extreme sensibility on this point
is a mode of feelinga remnant of barbarism. He
who conducts himself as he ought to do, will rarely
be in a position to receive a blow; and when in such
a position without fault of his own, he discovers more
courage in bearing than in blindly resenting it.
Come, said Denham, you are cunning reasoners,
both of you; but I suspect neither knows what the
feelings and actions of a man would, or ought to be, on
such an occasion. Theory is one thing, and practice
another. And as for me, I really don't see the use of
making ourselves uncomfortable by reasoning on
matters
which in no way concern us.
There is this use, said Claude, that when a
man has determined how he would act in certain
cases
,
upon the occurrence of these cases his steps,
instead
of being committed to headlong passion, are
guarded by the cool decision of his temperate
moments
,
and he is saved by the hand of
principle
from
plunging down a precipice.
Well! well! we are too serious, said Denham,
gayly. Come, fill your glass, Wyndham! let us
leave blows and quarrels to those who are threatened
with them. For my part, now I am a Benedict, I
shall keep away from troubled waters. I may not
determine
to let any one strike me who pleases; and, if
forced into a quarrel, I may not choose to sneak out of
it; yet, to
avoid
a quarrel, I would do as much as any
man. I hold with old Poloneus:
`Beware of entrance to a quarrel; but, being in,
Bear it, that the opposer may beware of thee.'
Come, success to our new undertaking, and may
we all live a thousand years!
CHAPTER II.
Claude
now rose to leave the table. It was eight
o'clock, and he had resolved to go this evening, for the
last time, into society in Berlin. After all that had
occurred, he did not wish to leave town clandestinely,
but to take this occasion to bid farewell to such of his
friends as were not alienated by the slanders of his
enemy, and to steal one more look at her who filled
his soul with tender anguish. He had not seen
Carolan
for some time, nor the countess, nor Ida. He
knew that the challenge from Elkington, which he had
refused, had already become the topic of conversation.
The fierce little general, disappointed in his intention
of proceeding in the duel, or of taking summary
vengeance
upon Claude for the result of his mission, and
the little respect with which the messenger had been
received, found some vent for his fury in spreading
everywhere the news of his enemy's cowardice and
disgrace. As gentlemen may be very ready to fight
duels and blow other gentlemen's brains out, and yet
be capable of wide deviations from veracity, we must
not be surprised to find that the doughty general
garnished
his recital with embellishments; and he was a
great talker and knower to everybody. According to
his account, Mr. Wyndham had insulted his friend
Lord Elkington, by calumniating him to Count
Carolan
,
with the view of breaking off his approaching
marriage with Ida; that he had, accordingly, borne a
message from Elkington, upon receiving which Mr.
Wyndham had become exceedingly pale and alarmed;
and that, after having refused to fight, although urged
to it by provocations which no gentleman could endure,
and still refusing, he, the general, took his, Mr.
Wyndham's
,
nose between his, the general's, fore and middle
fingers, and pulled the same; and that the operation
had been performed with so little resistance on the
part of the
operatee
, that he should have repeated it at
short intervals, when not otherwise engaged, wherever
the said Wyndham presumed to show the said nose in
society, only he, the said Wyndham (and in this part
of the account the general gave such huge twists with
his body, and such ghastly contortions of his wounded
cheek, as to render the description extremely lively and
impressive), had had the meannessthe cowardice
the (and here he used to make a pause, in
consequence
of there not being any word in either the
French or German language exactly strong enough
to convey the full extent of his contempt for such
conduct
)
to go to the police and complain of a
threatened
assault; thus meanly and basely, and in a most
ungentlemanly manner, preventing his being shot, or,
at least, horsewhipped in the street the next morning,
as, but for this, would have been the case.
The world at large are not unlike a flock of sheep
in respect to the facility with which they may be
induced
to follow any one who undertakes to lead,
especially
in some unjust act or foolish opinion; and the
general, by his earnest manner of censuring Claude for
not permitting himself to be shot, induced most of his
hearers to conclude that the act had been totally
unwarrantable
,
and unworthy of a gentleman. This
accusation
,
combined with the charges already in
circulation
against our hero, had completed his disgrace;
and he was now almost universally set down as a
person
of no character, who had impudently thrust
himself
into society; in short, a mere
chevalier
d'industrie
.
Several expressions of Count Carolan
sanctioned
these opinions. That gentleman, on
discovering
that Claude had dared to lift his thoughts to his
daughter, fancied himself the object of as deep an
insult
as one man could offer to another; and, once
admitting
into his bosom the feeling of revenge, it
mastered
his weak mind, and became his predominant
desire
.
If he could have crushed him into the dust, he
would have done so. The letter sent him by Claude,
containing that of Denham's, he returned unopened,
and Claude received it as he was dressing to go to
Count N's. He felt the insult, but he had made
up his mind as to the course he should pursue, and he
hoped in a week to turn his back upon Berlin for ever.
Come what, come may, thought he, I will meet
these gay crowds once more. I will steal
one
more look
at that fairfair face, which I am never to see again,
and thenhail! the future, and the pastadieu!
While dressing, his servant brought him a
newspaper
,
sent up by Denham. He unfolded it, glanced his
eye across its pages, and was flinging it aside, when
the name of the Earl of Beverly caught his eye, and
he read the following:
Death of the Earl of Beverly
.We regret to be
obliged to announce the death of the Earl of Beverly,
at his princely residence at L, on Monday
morning
.
The earl, who had been previously improving in
health, on rising in the morning at his usual hour, fell
suddenly to the floor in a fit, and expired before any
assistance could reach him. An express was instantly
sent off to the Continent to acquaint Lord Elkington
and Lady Beverly, who are at Berlin.
The late earl was born in 17. In March, 17,
when only the Hon. Mr. Lawton, he married a Miss
Carentz
,
a beautiful young orphan of Vienna. The match
was one of inclination, but terminated unfortunately. A
short time after their union, the bride, to whom he was
attached with a fervour corresponding to his high
powers
of mind and peculiar ardour of character, quitted
him, allured by the attractions of an ancient lover; and,
after having afforded but too glaring evidences of a
character singularly light, and a total disregard of her
own honour and the peace of her husband, she carried
with her a child not many months old, but neither the
unfortunate infant nor its mother long survived; both
having been lost at sea on a voyage to the West
Indies
.
Having succeeded to the titles and estates of
his father, the late , he was subsequently created
Earl of Beverly by his late majesty. After which he
immediately married Miss Seymour, daughter of the
distinguished General Seymour. Lord Elkington,
now Earl of Beverly, the only son, is twenty-two years
of age. He is daily expected with his mother from
the Continent.
Claude read this paragraph with a singular interest.
He felt almost as if Providence were unjust to raise
the profligate duellist to opulence and honour, and to
depress him, who had shown himself so ready to
sacrifice
even his reputation in the cause of right. How
brilliant was now Elkington's prospect! The Earl of
Beverly courted by allhis rank and wealth would
gloss over the defects of his character. His gambling
debts would be paid, and his misdemeanours hushed up.
If Count Carolan before had been anxious for a union
with him, he would now be much more so, and he
would be little likely to listen to charges concerning
him from one with whom he was already obviously
offended. Ida would become the Countess Beverly.
Blessed with everything to elate his spirits, and to
swell his bold, bad heart with joy and triumph, he
could go on for the future; perhaps, having no
temptation
to evil, he would endanger his reputation by no
farther open acts of profligacy; while he himself,
having
openly branded him, would be regarded as a mean
calumniator and a defeated rival.
As these reveries passed through his mind, he found
himself at the house of Count N, the
minister
.
It was blazing with light and very crowded.
It seemed all the world was there. Claude entered
with a secret tremble at his heart, which belied his
outward tranquillity. There are, perhaps, to a proud
and noble mind, few ordeals more painful than that to
which he had now voluntarily subjected himself;
stranger
as he was in Berlin, he had more of the support
obtained by a long residence, and the consciousness
that, whatever slanders might be circulated against
him, enough of his real character must be known to
create friends and defenders. The whisperthe doubt,
is enough to shade the name of the stranger; and
the open charges rung against him by Elkington, Le
Beau, Lady Beverly, Thompson (for he had turned
one of his bitterest detractors without the slightest
apparent
cause), and several others, almost entirely
destroyed
his standing. Few have the prudence or the
benevolence to doubt a slander, or, at least, to omit to
circulate it until it is clearly proved, and Claude saw,
the moment he entered the door, that he was a
proscribed
man. The Count and Countess N,
however
,
greeted him with affability. He was in their
house on their invitation, and they were, moreover,
people
of refinement and kindness. They had heard the
accusations against him, but they also had formed a
friendship with himself more intimate than the
ordinary
acquaintanceships of the saloons, and they
perceived
and respected in him a man of obviously superior
mind and elegant deportment. They knew also
Madame
Wharton's opinion of him; and with the power
of appreciating character possessed by so few, they
esteemed her as she merited. They perfectly
understood
,
too, that Carolan was a man of the feeblest
possible
understanding, and a heart entirely given up to
vanity; that Le Beau was an unprincipled rascal, who
presumed to be very important on the score of having
fought duels, and that Elkington was a desperate
libertine
.
People of sense and observation find these
things out by a thousand various trifles, and Claude
therefore, with them, stood as before. They
respected
and admired him, and were too intelligent to be led
away by a vulgar love of scandal to believe evil at the
whisper of those who were themselves far from pure.
Claude even found both the count and his lady more
affable than usual. By a kind of generosity so rarely
discovered, they seemed resolved to support the
weaker
party; to mark distinctly and publicly their dissent
from the general opinion, of which they were not
ignorant
,
and to sooth the wounds which they rightly
judged were to be inflicted upon the heart of their
young friend on this evening. Keen was the
appreciation
of this conduct, and deep the gratitude felt by
Claude; and it enabled him to regain his full
self-command
,
and, perhaps, materially supported him
through the principal incident to which he was
subsequently
subjected. It is thus often with us in our
daily
actions which have consequences we cannot foresee.
Vol. II.C
When we do
wrong
, we cannot know what evil may
follow; and when we do right, we little imagine the
pleasure and blessing which it often proves afterward.
It was with a cold heart that Claude left the side of
his amiable hosts to stroll around the rooms. The
same near-sightedness which had amused him so much
when applied to poor Digby, he felt was by no means
so entertaining when he experienced it himself. Many
an eye was suddenly averted as it met his. Many a
step turned away from his path. Some pretended not
to see him; some coolly perceived his face without
seeming to know him; a few seemed embarrassed by
his presence, and as unwilling to hurt his feelings by
an open slight, as to seem to sanction his equivocal
standing and character by any greeting. One or two
young ladies, who thought a man who could shrink
from fighting a duel must be a perfect monster of
vulgarity
and cowardice, tossed their heads with
unconcealed
contempt as he passed near them; and one
youthful male aspirant after the honours of the
beau
monde
, finding that he might be impertinent without
danger, took occasion to half recognise him, and then
draw back and retire in a marked manner on his
discovery
of some sign of a salutation, boasting afterward
that he had
cut him dead
. We are sorry to record
that Mr. Thomson was among the shyest of those who
thought it necessary to forget him entirely.
For some time Claude wandered around the rooms,
every one appearing to avoid addressing him. The
effect of this upon him was visible in an increased
paleness. Where was Lavalle? where was General
St. Hillaire? Some accident had detained them. He
felt that he would have given worlds to see the face
of one friend  to have any one to talk to, that he
might break the general coldness and silence which he
appeared to bring with him wherever he went. He
wandered on like a man in a dreadful dream. He
could scarcely believe that, by the acts and villany of
a single person, he had been so entirely ruined in the
estimation of so many people. His isolation was more
complete from the fact that, perceiving how much he
was the object of odium, he did not like to subject to
the attaintment of associating with him the few who,
perhaps, had he addressed them as usual, would have
replied with civility. Thus marked, as it were, by the
proscription of the whole brilliant assembly, and by his
pale countenance and haughty air a conspicuous
person
amid the laughing and pleasure-seeking crowds,
he thought himself suffering the worst effects of his
honest adherence to principle and the slander of his
enemies
,
when Carolan and his family entered the room.
Amid the many persons whom they saluted, the
omission
of him was conspicuous and generally remarked.
The count looked at him a moment with disdain, and
turned his back. The countess carefully avoided
meeting
his glance; and even Idaupon whose beautiful
countenance, now as pale as his own, he could not
avoid fixing his eyes, in which all his pride and
haughty
indignation had not been able to prevent a moisture
even Ida turned silently away, and was led by a
gentleman
to a distant part of the room, without a word
or a look.
There are moments when the more we suffer the
better able we are to endure, and this, for Claude, was
one of them. He felt that to remain longer in a
society
,
after so open an exposure of the estimation in which
he was held, would be neither necessary nor delicate.
He resolved, therefore, to retire; but, before doing so,
to seek with Count Carolan a few moments'
conversation
.
He therefore approached that gentleman, and
with an air so calm and yet so evidently agitated that
Carolan started at his sudden address.
Count Carolan, a word with you.
Certainly, said the count.
There is, I believe, no one in Madame de N's
boudoir; may I beg your company there for a few
moments?
The count turned rather pompously and followed.
When they reached that remote room, they found it
deserted.
What is your pleasure, sir? said Carolan,
haughtily
.
To ask you what I have done to merit a
condemnation
without a hearing. I perceive, with indignation
and surprise, that my reputation has been destroyed by
calumny. I could drag the slanderer to light, and make
him pay with his life the penalty of his falsehood; but
that would punish the falsehood, and not disprove it.
Neither is Lord Elkington one who would hear with
candour what I have to say. To you, sir, I appeal,
from a sense of duty, as having been my first friend in
Berlin; and I beg to know of what I am accused and
what suspected; and I offer, publicly or privately, to
submit my life, actions, and character to any scrutiny
you may desire. I do not ask your friendship; but I
desire you will, by your words and conduct, refute
intimations
against my character, which I offer you the
means of knowing to be above reproach.
I had hoped Mr. Wyndham had discovered a more
manly mode of righting his injured fame.
Gentlemen
settle these things in a shorter, and, you will excuse
me for adding, in a more honourable way, said
Carolan
.
Pray spare me your insinuations, sir, said Claude,
mildly. I am not here to quarrel, but to explain to
you your injustice towards me. If this injustice is
wilful, I shall not resent it; but if it is an error, I am
willing to explain the calumnies of Elkington.
Stop, sir! stop, sir! I shall hear nothing against
my friend. I deem it proper to admit him into my
family; and I presume I am the best judge of my own
companions and my own affairs.
Indeed, said Claude, remembering that he was
addressing the father of Ida, and thus, in some degree,
repressing the disgust which the pompous, arrogant
manner and unreasonable remarks of his companion
excited; indeed, sir, in offering my defence of
myself
,
I am obliged to place in your hands once more a
letter concerning Elkington, which
Stop, sirstop! I will hear nothing upon that
subject. I presume, sir, you are aware that my
daughter
has chosen him as her husband; and, though you
have been unprincipled enough
Count Carolan!
To attempt to win her affections, and to allure her
from her father's house
I? I do most solemnly protest
Stop, sir! I am acquainted with the whole; and
I deem it proper, since you have sought this interview,
to state, sir, that, when I took you upa friendless,
nameless persontoo hastily, as it seemsI thought
I discovered in you something worth my
encouragement
.
You are nothing, sir! It was by my
stamping
you that you have alone been received into
society
;
and, having been mistaken in you, I mustfrom
a high and imperative sense of dutyI must drop you
in the most marked manner; any application from you,
sir, will be entirely useless.
There was an insufferable conceit in the manner in
which this was said, which made Claude's blood boil
in his veins. It was a thousand times more difficult to
endure patiently than the straightforward injuries of
Elkington, or the capricious near-sightedness of Lady
Beverly. He could not help wishing in his heart that
he could call out to the field, and plant, at twelve
paces
from the muzzle of a good pistol, an insolence and
pomposity so inexpressibly provoking. But the father
of Ida would have been safe from an angry reply, even
had he been influenced by no loftier consideration in
governing his passions. He therefore replied,
If Count Carolan supposes my present suit as an
application for his aid in enjoying the pleasures of the
Berlin society, he mistakes me greatly. I complain
that, by a sudden withdrawal of the respect which,
from whatever motive, you have been pleased to
honour
me with, people are left to form erroneous opinions
C 2
respecting me. I offer you proof that such opinions
are false; and I appeal to your generosity and sense
of honour not to inflict upon me the injury which you
have now the power to do, at least without satisfying
yourself that you have cause.
I presume, sir, that I know how to take care of
my own honour without your advice; and as to
generosity
,
that which I have already shown towards you
has been so ill returned, that I must reserve it
hereafter
for a more worthy object, and one free from the
charges currently believed against you, sir.
Will you tell me what
are
the charges reported
against me?
Ask nothing of me, sir. I presume I shall be
ready to render an account of my actions to those who
have a right to call on me.
If, then, sir, said Claude, his patience giving way
before the insufferable pomposity and insolence which
appeared in every word and gesture of his former
patron
,
your opinion is formed without cause, and
adhered
to against proof, I can only conclude that, in
seeking to change it, I have placed upon it more than
its real value.
Do you mean to insult me? said Carolan, turning
very pale.
I protest, said Claude, after a moment's
reflection
,
I am wrong to forget that you have rendered
me kindness which should ever seal my lips. I
cannot
but think, in refusing me the opportunity to lay
my character before you, you do me wrong; but I did
not mean to fail in my respect towards you; and, for
the image of Ida floated through his mind, Count
Carolan, before we part, I beg your pardon.
No, sir. You intend to insult me.
I assure you
No, sirstop! You cannot deceive me. I see it
is your intention to insult me. I am justly served, sir,
for my imprudence in taking up persons without
examining
who and what they are! I shall hereafter,
sir, be more on my guard. And I shall deem it a high
duty to look with suspicion upon all strangers ere I
give them my countenance in society.
Tired of contending against these characteristic
remarks
disgusted
beyond measure, even more with
the manner than the matterand unwilling, from
various
considerations, to resent, Claude remained silent,
inwardly hoping that a fool might thus be best dealt
with; but even silence was no refuge against the
displeasure
of Count Carolan.
Go, sir! said that gentleman. I recommend
you to abandon a class of society for which you are
fitted neither by your education nor your fortune; but,
before you go, you will be so good, sir, as not to
forget
that a bill for 50 has been cashed by my banker
at your request.
Astonished at this extraordinary speech, Claude,
with an indignant heart, and the strongest possible
desire
to horsewhip him, turned in silence, and, with a
burning spot in his cheek, withdrew, with the
determination
to retire instantly to his house, and leave
Carolan
,
wife and daughter, without another word. He
had done all that good sense demanded to re-establish
his character; and all, through the malice of
Elkington
,
and the stupid pomposity and conceit of Carolan,
had been in vain.
Accordingly, he turned his back upon Carolan, who
had never appeared to him so ridiculous and
disgusting
,
and approached the door which led to that of
egress. He had reached the last antechamber, lost
in thoughts of no tender nature, when he was
astonished
,
not to say startled, to behold Elkington planted
directly in the doorway through which alone he could
pass to the street; and, on the appearance of Claude,
a low laugh announced a fiendish delight, which
announced
no good. Claude stopped and gazed a
moment
with surprise upon the features, attitude, and
dress of his enemy. He was not in the ordinary
habiliments
of a ballroom, but wore a surtout and boots.
His cravat was loosely tiedhis wristbands
unfastened
his
vest but partly buttoned, and his hair
dishevelled
.
His attitude was motionless as that of a snake
before he springs. On a nearer glance at his features,
he perceived that his face was much flushed, and his
lips stained with wine. There was a certain air of
swagger very different from his usual elegant
quietness
of manners; and his eyes were fixed on Claude
with a fury which probably neither wine nor passion
could have produced separately, but which was the
combined effect of both. Behind him stood little
General Le Beau. The peculiarities in the dress and
manner of Elkington, however singular, were less so
than his appearance at all, at this time, in such a scene;
the news of his father's illness having but so recently
arrived, and some of the journals having even formally
announced his death.
Claude saw that a premediatated attack awaited him
if he advanced, and, had it been possible, despite the
sneers which such a course might have excited, he
would have returned to the drawing-rooms rather than
engage in a scuffle which, from the desperate
character
of his foe, might be a fatal one; but he saw that
it was the intention of Elkington to pursue him if he
retreated, as certainly as to assault him should he
proceed. He therefore paused, not knowing for a
moment
what to do.
So, sir, said Elkington, I have sought you at
your hotelI have sought you through the streetsI
have sought you hereand here you are! I learn
you are about to quit Berlin. You have deeply
wounded
my honouryou have slandered and insulted me.
I have demanded of you the satisfaction of a
gentleman
,
which you have refused. Sir, take thisand may
it burn on your forehead for ever!
He stepped deliberately forward, and with his
clinched fist struck him a violent blow in the face.
For a moment Claude was stunned. He did not think
of returning it. He started back and covered his face
with his hands. He seemed blasted with thunder.
He heard several voices exclaim, Ha! a blow! in
tones of surprise and horror. His heart stood still.
His reason left him. His principle against taking
human
life flashed upon him as a mockery. He stirred.
It was to sacrifice, and tear to pieces the being who
had brought this spell upon him. He found some one
had grasped his arms and held him back. Fire fell
from his eyes. He thought their glance alone could
kill, and he turned them, that they might do so on his
victim. He beheld him standing therevery pale, but
smiling; a sneeras a devilon his face; and his
extended
finger pointing at him. A sense of agonyof
ruinof utter, interminable, irretrievable shame and
despair filled all his being. Never had he known the
fearful energies of his nature. Never before had he
dreamed what it was to receive a
blow!
Some
moments
elapsed, he knew not how long. He was
deprived
of the power of motion. Invisible hands held
him. He could not tell hownor whonor how long
nor by what tremendous power, his strong impulse
to leap forward was withheld. He wanted motion
a weapona pistolanything which would destroy
crushstrike
dead
.
He was first somewhat recalled to reason by the low
laugh of Elkington, who advanced and said,
My card, sir! You know where I am. I shall
be happy to hear from you at your earliest leisure.
To-nightto-night, said Claude.
When you please, sir.
Lord Elkington, you are an infamous scoundrel,
cried a voice from the side of Claude. It sounded like
Denham's, but he scarcely attended to it. He was
still as one in a dream.
How!
who
is that? demanded Elkington.
It is I, insolent ruffian! said Denham, stepping
up. You know my friend is no duellist, and the
blow you have struck, may it recoil upon your own
forehead and sink into your own heart. How dare
you, siryour hands stained with dishonestyyour
name
Elkington now, in his turn, showed signs of
trepidation
;
but he said,
I did not expect to see
you
here; but I have an
account to settle with you also, unless you are as
whining a coward as your friend.
I will meet you when your hands are clean from
If you are a
man,
muttered Elkington, desperate
with fury, you will meet me
at once!
He lifted his hand and hurled a blow upon the
forehead
of Denham. The object of this unexpected
attack
sprung upon him, but Le Beau rushed between.
Elkington, said Denham, his face livid with
passion
,
you have succeeded. You shall hear from me,
and left the room.
This scene was very rapid in its occurrence. A
general interference now took place. Elkington
retired
.
Claude was released. The crowd had rushed
from the inner apartments at the noise of the brawl;
Claude was surrounded by them. They opened to
give him room as he passed out. He found himself
in the open air; alone, burning like an evil spirit just
out of its abode of fire.
CHAPTER III.
A BLOW. This was the blasting thought which
filled
Claude's mind as he bent his steps he scarce knew
whither. He was in a state of agitation which he had
never experienced before. He had no longer any
power over his reason. His thoughts were tossed to
and fro by a whirlwind. He felt, for the moment, that
he would commit any crime, could he but tear the
heart out of Elkington's bosom! He did not
recognise
himself. He appeared in his own eyes a
demon
,
so dreadfully does unrestrained passion metamorphose
even the most rational. All his calm grandeurhis
sense of righthis reasoning powershis resolutions
of dutyhis dependance on Godthey were all gone.
There was the same difference between his mind then,
and as it usually was in its peaceful moments, as
between
the tall and gently advancing ship, with sails set,
each rope in its place, obedient to the helm, and
rising
and falling on the summer waves; and the same
vessel in a fearful tempest, its sails rent to pieces,
its masts down, its rudder broken, and its deck swept
by huge waves which threaten instant destruction.
He could only think one thought  he could only
breathe one word
A blow!
He thought to seek Elkington and sacrifice him on
the spot.
He resolved to destroy himself instantly.
He found himself at length at home. He went to
his room, he flung himself on his bed, but it heaved
beneath him, and fire flashed from his eyes and
temples
,
and faces of a laughing crowd jeered and grinned
around, and the finger of the scornful Elkington
pointed
at him, and people shouted in his ear in all sorts of
tones, A blow! a blow! The voice of hate
muttered
it; it was shrieked as if by despair; friendship
seemed to utter it with an inflection of inquiry and
incredulity
;
it came to him with the laugh of childhood
and from the scornful lips of women
A blow! a
blow!
It is a dream! he murmured, and he arose from
his bed. The heat in his body was intolerable. The
very air he breathed seemed hot and burning. He
threw off his coat, his vest; he unloosed his cravat and
shirt-collar, and sat down by the open window. But
he could not sit stillhe could not liehe could not
walk. The narrow room oppressed him by its limits;
and he strided to and fro, turning against the walls as
a wearied and enraged lion paces the small floor of
his iron cage, with a tread and a heart that should be
upon the burning desert, or the unexplored, unbounded
wood. At length he threw himself upon the naked
floor, conscious that movement only fanned the fire
within him.
A blowa blow! Let me think of it!
And, for a moment, the whirl and tumult of his mind
subsided a little, and gave place to something like
continuous
reflection.
No, he thought, it is a dreamthat blasting
stroke upon my browa dream? He raised his hand
to his face. He became conscious of a dim sense of
pain now for the first time, and, on passing his fingers
over it, he found the eye much swollen. He closed
the other, and looked out of the window with that
one injured. It was nearly deprived of sight. A vague
appearance of light was all he could distinguish. The
beautiful transparent airthe bending skythe moon
riding calmly over all the shocks of earththey were
lost and fused together, without beauty or separate
distinctness
.
The idea struck him that perhaps the wound
was irreparable; perhaps the eye was blind. No!
no! it was no dream! It was a bitter, deliberate,
public, burning insult. It was the most blighting act
of scorn and shamethe fullest of humiliationthe
most palpable and memorablethat which could be
the least overlooked, or pardoned, or forgotten by
mankind
of
all the wrongs that one human being could
inflict upon another. It was irreparable. He who
bestowed
it could not undo it. Timedistancevirtue
could not wash it out. It was a stain eternal. All
great Neptune's ocean could not clean its blackened
tracesthere was but one thing
He started to his feet.
It was
blood
. It was that great, mysterious, sacred
specific, the touch of which blasts ordinary hands
the very half-forgotten stain of which betrays
ancientest
crimedrags the murderer to lightraises the very
dead out of their fleshless graves, till vengeance has
had her banquet. The spot upon his forehead could
only be effacedthe flame in his heart could only be
quenchedby
blood!
And he sat down and rested his elbows on a table,
and leaned his throbbing temples on his fists.
Oh God! he suddenly exclaimed, dropping on
his knee; teach meguide mesave memy heart
is wildmy hand is liftedgive me some sign!
He strove to prayas was his custom on occasions
where his own sense of right wavered. But his
heaving
imagination could form no address to the Supreme
Being. That serene power that sits above the clouds
seemed itself to have deserted him in his deep
degradation
.
He could not utter a prayer, or conceive one.
Strange things flitted before his eyes, and flapped their
wings in his face; and laughter, and shrieks, and hisses
rose once more around him, till the dark room seemed
crowded with evil spirits, in the full ecstasy of their
orgies
over a lost one. He leaned again his forehead
upon the table, when suddenly a voice, as if of one of
these fiends, seemed to say,
Yes, you
are
a coward! It is craven
fear
that
holds your hand. You are a canting, trembling
hypocrite
.
You deceive yourself with names of virtue
and illusions of religionabjectdisgracedwretched
creature! No one else is deceived. Elkington is a
gallant fellow. You injured him like a scoundrel, and
then fled from him like a coward. You are afraid to
fight a duel. An unmanly sensibility and womanish
effeminacy is the secret of your convenient principles
your puny virtue. Who made you a judgea
reformer
a
prophet? Who gave
you
light to see, what
none of the wisethe bravethe great can see? Who
teaches
you
to distinguish between what is right and
what is notbetween what God commands and what
he forbids? Why
not
fight a duel? It is the custom!
It is a good custom. It is brave and manly. It
unmasks cowards and sneaking hypocrites. Fool!
look into your own heart, and see what its honest
dictates
Vol. II.D
tell you of a
blow
. Every fibre of your trembling
frame quivered with it. Every faculty of your
shrinking
soul fainted at it. Nature rose against it. A
blow! Since time began it is the badge of insultthe
mark of shame. It is a curse full of the accumulated
infamy of ages. The very beast turns at it. Its
bodily
pain is but a type and faint shadow of its moral
ruin. Bear this one, and you will receive anotherand
anotherand another. Who hereafter will honour
you? who will love you? Outcast! the blood in your
veins is wateryour heart is faint  you are not a
man
you have borne a
blow!
CHAPTER IV.
But I have
not
borne it, said Claude.
He rose and reached from his bookcase a pair of
travelling pistols, and, placing them in his bosom,
rushed from his house into the street. At first he knew
not whether it was dark or light; whether the weather
was fair or cloudy, nor had he any precise idea of what
he intended to do, or where he meant to go. He had
not walked far when he saw a man. He was a
sentinel
.
For the first time in his life he felt unable to bear
the eyes of a fellow-being. The swollen wound upon
his face seemed a mountain, and he forgot everything
but the desire to withdraw himself into solitude
darkness
and silenceaway from the gaze of alleven
were it in the grave. Then there came to him again,
as he walked, startling thoughts of self-destruction.
Only death could relieve him from the agony of his
heart. He cast his eyes about him upon the
surrounding
objects  the long, quiet streets  the deserted
squares  the silent houses  the soft, waving trees.
He wondered to behold such tranquillitysuch peace
after all his anguish. He walked beneath the soft
branches with shamehe shrank from the moonlight
reflected against the housesthe very pavement he
seemed to tread on as an intruderas a felon; and he
looked around him like guilt, stolen in the night from
its lurking-placeashamedand fearful of being seen.
Ah, thought Claude, as a moment of calm
reflection
came to him with the soft air and balmy
night-breeze
,
little dreams he who, rude in nature, bad
in heart, and feeble in understandingwithout
principle
,
feeling, or religionwith no restraints in this
world, and no communings with the otherah, little
thinks the common, vulgar mind of the dread act he
perpetrates when he launches
a blow
against a
fellow-being
.
He bent his steps towards his favourite Park. His
thoughts now rolled through his mind less confusedly.
He was no longer mad, but they had a deep and
solemn
motion. He passed through the tall
Branden-bourg
gate. The guard at his post looked at him; he
shrank from his eye, and the man seemed inclined to
stop him, but did not.
He sees, said Claude, humiliation in my very
walk.
There is something in a night-ramble which restores
the agitated soul to itself. He felt the rapid motion
the cool, sweet air abate, sooth, and calm the heat which
till now had oppressed him. He penetrated into the
beautiful recesses of the luxuriant wood. It was again
a bright moonlight, and the scene touched him through
all his agitation and awoke other feelings.
Receive me! he said, pure shades; receive the
outcast, now doubly outcast. Receive the stained, the
shamed, the fallen! Shrink not from me, ye flowers,
nor turn away your protecting arms, ye calm old trees,
who stand for ages through sun and storm, and never
know what he who steals beneath your path knows
to-night. When last I walked here I was as pure and
scatheless as yourselves; now I am apart from other
men, unless I dip my hands in blood! Oh, that it
were for ever night! Oh, could I remain for ever here,
alone with youwhere no blood flows at my feet, and
no hisses sound in my ears. A blow! a blow! Poor,
poor Rossi!
He
went mad; and it was this same
hand that struck him too. God! when he told me of
it, I little knew what
a blow
was. Why did not the
lightning arrest that rash hand ere it cast on me this
fatal misery. I should have
killed
him, but I was held
for good or for evil. Killed! what if I
had
killed
him? What is killing? what is life? what is death?
Will not God pardon it? Can I be punished for not
bearing a burden beyond my strength? and, after all,
who says killing is
not
right? The Holy Scriptures
call out `blood for blood;' and is not a blow blood?
Is it not worse? We have killed each other since
Abel's timedaily and hourly. It is our nature. It
enters into the plan of Providence. All things kill.
The soft dove snatches the golden insectthe hawk
pierces the dovethe lion tears his preythe boar
has his tuskthe serpent his sting. This sweet
forest
,
so fair to view, is but a scene of continual
massacre
.
The microscope, that discovers animalcules
invisible
to the naked eye, finds them killing each other.
I have surely been led away by idle theories of human
excellence. I have set myself apart as better than my
fellow-beings. I am not. I do not wish to be. God
made us mortal.
I will kill this man
. I will meet
himand one of us shall die. Perhaps, now, he will
notthen still I will kill him. To-morrowa week
hence  a year  twenty years  standing amid his
friendsasleepawakein bedin the fieldsin the
danceat the very altar, on his knees in repentant
prayerI will kill himI will have his heart's blood!
He paused. The last words had been spoken aloud.
They sounded like the imprecations of a demon
escaped
from hell, amid these soft glades and perfumed
bowers.
Alas! what am I become? What bloody and
dark demon has entered my body? Is this indeed
honour
?
Is this duty? Our Redeemer suffered a blow!
* * * * But that sublime tradition which paints
the wandering Jewthere is meaning in it. * * *
* * * * Oh God! he continued, after pacing on
yet farther, I am lost. I acknowledge myself weak.
I know not what I say or do. I am rushing blindly
upon murderupon death. The very fiends in the
shape of human reason seem goading and urging me
on. Alas! human reason is vain. I have listened to
it too long. As yet my hands are pure from bloodas
yet I do not stand before the throne of Heaven,
uncalled
but by my own passion. There
is
a higher
power
I
appeal to
Him
. I will not decide in my
rashness
.
What do I care for man's opinion?
He lifted his hands and eyes to Heaven. It was
near morning, and the sky was singularly transparent.
He gazed breathless upon its quiet, eternal fields
the serene order of its glittering worldsthe hushed
groups of stars  the moon pure, high, bright, and
calm as the virtue which he had forgottenas the
innocence
he had nearly thrown away. A dark cloud,
of which the summit was piled up, mass above mass,
like the silver Pyrenean cliffs above the blue
Mediterranean
,
and whose base, black and definitely marked
against the radiant air, lay stretched like a huge rock
in a summer deep, gave to that upper world of light
a new and awful aspect. As he gazed a sudden breeze
came softly rushing over the tree-topskissing the
murmuring leavesreaching the face of the
half-maddened
being belowcooling his brow, and cheek, and
heartlifting the hair from his hot foreheadand
wafting
to his senses and to his soul, in a cloud of
perfume
,
a consciousness of loveof hopeof lifeof
peaceof Heaven. At the same moment large tears
rose to his burning eyelids and rolled down his cheeks;
and, throwing himself upon the groundalone, in that
silent woodunseen but by watchful starsthe
proudest
spirit that ever walked the globe bent to earthly
anguish, and he wept, convulsively, like a child.
D 2
Oh, Elkington! Could a wretch like thee bend that
brow to the grassy ground, and shake with almost
fatal
pangs a heart which was to thee as the floating
eagle to the howling cur? Thou hast triumphedbut
beware! The triumph of guilt is a wrong against
Heaven. The good man is the child of God, and God
is omnipresent, and he is around usin the very air
when we know it not.
There is a blessing in tears. They are waters from
Heaven, and they cleanse the soul to its pristine peace
and purity.
It is not right, muttered Claude, to take human
life for human passion. Shall I not leave the task of
punishing to the sublime Being who rules the universe?
Is he absent? is he powerless?
A peal of thunder burst over the starting earth ere
the last word had left his lip; at the same moment the
lightning darted with a blinding intensity. The
tremendous
volume of sound paused after the first shock
rolled onpausedwent on and on again
crushingly
as
if annihilation itself had come upon mankind;
and repeating several times its appalling reverberations
broad as the air, and apparently stirring the earth
from its very orbitlost itself threateningly, but calmly,
as if amid the vastness of other spheres. Claude had
not yet moved when a torrent came rushing down, and
he was drenched to the skin; when he raised his head,
the sky was wrapped in utter darkness. The wind
swept over the wood, bending the tallest trees, and
twisting their gnarled limbs till they groaned as if
with fear and pain. The peal was followed by another,
and so close and heavy that the instinct of
self-preservation
occupied his mind, to the exclusion of the
subject which had so deeply agitated him. He
hastened
out of the Park into the broad road, where he
was less in danger than among the trees. There is
something in a good drenching which deadens human
passions, and shows how weak and idle are even some
of those words which make us commit deeds
irreparable
.
The floods which drenched him were delicious,
and cooled his fever. He breathed more freely, he
trod more firmly; and, if the truth must be added, at a
considerably swifter pace than he generally adopted.
His course was bent also towards the gate, and he
reentered
the town.
The rain, almost as suddenly as it had commenced,
ceased, and a fissure appeared across the masses of
black clouds which obscured the heavens. The
dispersion
of the vapours was so extremely rapid, that, even
thrilled as he was by the incident which had just
occurred
,
it fastened his attention. Forming themselves into
separate piles, the clouds broke apart in all quarters,
leaving the blue void stainless, and the stars glittering
with unwonted brightness. Then the whole air, earth,
and heaven were suddenly illuminated by a soft
radiance
.
A massive breadth of vapour had passed from
before the moon, and she broke out full orbed and almost
light as day, while each torn fragment of silver cloud
disappeared entirely, and the air became as still as the
heaven.
Oh God, said he, I worship thee in thy temple,
I call upon thee for aid. May this be to me an
emblem
of my own soul. Its passions, however
tremendous
,
belong to earth; its calm hopes to Heaven. I
commit myself to thee.
And his soul now poured itself in prayer, which
seemed to rise unimpeded to the Throne of Mercy.
He had implored a sign, and Heaven had granted it.
The serenity of nature taught him by its example to
sit serene after the mildest storm, which the same
hand that conjured up could waft away, and that no
tempest could reach the fair arrangement of right and
truth. Slowly he wandered to his home. No
weakness
disturbed his spirit or his intellect. He had made
up his determination to pass the indignity he had
received
in silence. The mortal body was subdued and
ever mastered by the superior mind. At the word of
reflection and of religion the hot blood flowed cool and
placid through his frame. His obedient pulse played
temperately, and all his soul was peace.
CHAPTER IV.
As
he entered his hotel, the morning had not begun
to break, although it was near the hour. To his
astonishment
he found the front door ajar, and two horses
saddled, and held by Beaufort, who was easily
distinguished
by the lamplight. On entering, the door of
Denham's room was also open. He thought it strange,
and stopped a moment. A light step sounded within.
He listened. It was a man's. Was Denham up?
was he ill? Perhaps his wifeor the lovely little
girl? If he should knock! he might disturb them.
He approached. Denham was standing within, with
his back to him, in a riding-coat, boots, and spurs,
completely dressed. He shook violently, bending his
head to his outspread hands. Then he stepped
forward
breathlessly, noiselessly, towards his bedroom
door. As he did so, Claude caught a full view of his
countenance in a mirror. It was as white as ever
lay bound with linen in a coffin. His gaze was fixed
on an object in the adjoining apartment.
Extremely shocked, Claude advanced and followed
with his eyes those of his friend. He started,
however
,
at what there met his view, and was about
retiring
,
for he found himself gazing upon the face of
Mrs. Denham, tranquilly sleeping. A kind of
bewilderment
held him chained to the spot. The lovely
sleeper was apparently lost in a pleasant dream. She
was very beautiful. Her long hair lay in a kind of
charming negligence around her faceher hand had
fallen over her headher cheeks were rosyher lips
touched with a smile. A happinessa beautya
placid
peace gave to her countenance the loveliness of a
seraph. Denham approached herleaned over her.
Again he shook violently. He bent his lips near hers,
but did not touch them, and then turned away. He
appeared to feel no surprise on seeing Claude. He
seized his arm, and they hurried into the hall.
How late is it? said Denham.
Daybreak.
Already?
Certainly. Great God! my friend, what is the
meaning of this?
Denham turned as if startled by the sound of his
voice, and now recognised him.
What, Wyndham!
Yes. What is the matter? Why is Beaufort at
the door? The horsesyour dresswhere are you
going?
You don't know?
No!
Adieu, my friend. He turned very pale, and
silently
pointing with his inverted thumb to his room,
Claude, I commit
her
to
your care
. God help
yougood-by!
But, where? who? what? stammered Claude.
For so completely had he been stunned by the last
night's scenes, that no trace of Denham's interference
and its consequences had struck his attention. As his
friend broke away, and he heard the sound of horses'
feet driven at a rapid gallop over the pavement, a dim,
dreamy idea of Denhamand hot wordsand he knew
not what, came over him. It seemed the recollection
of a dream. Denham, then, had been implicated in
his quarrel, and was gone to fight a duel. To fight
for him
, perhaps. The thought affected him more
terribly than all his own pangs. He rushed to the
door. He went into the street. Nothing was to be
seen. The pale morning light was broadening over
the heaven. One or two street-passengers were
already
outlabourers going to their toilmilk-women
with their little dog-carts. He went out and looked in
the direction in which he had heard the horses' feet.
Nothing was to be seen of the fugitives. He returned
to the hotel. The waiters were stirring. He spoke
to a boy, and asked if he had seen any one pass. No,
he had seen nothing. He suspected nothing. And
Claude suddenly thought of the police, and instantly
set off with the determination to call in their aid. As
he went into the street again, a young boy came along,
singing aloud. His face was round and rosy, his gait
careless and thoughtless, his eyes bright, clear, and
happy-looking. Ah, boyhood! how its recollections
and an appreciation of its sweet exemption touched
his soul. He went on. Every common thing looked
strange to him, for death was in his thoughts. A maid
was washing windows and humming an air; a man
drove his cart by with a crack of the whip; in the
building next the police, an old blind man had
commenced
his rounds, and was playing a merry tune
on his organ; a billFurnished rooms to lethung
over the door. He hastened on. The large doorway
was closed. The great gates and little door were
equally closed and fastened. He rangno one came.
He rang again and again. At last the door sprang
open. He went in. The large, dirty hall was empty.
All the doors around were closed. That one where
he had entered to lay his complaint against
Le Beau
was also shut. He rang and knockedno one came.
Did they know his deep impatience? Did they know
death and life depended on their steps? He waited
there half an hour. At length a rough-looking
bumpkin
came in out of the court, scratching his uncombed
head, and gaping at him.
Where are theywhere are the police?
Nein! nein! said the man, shaking his head.
Can I see no one here?
Nein! nein!
It's shut?
Ja!
How can I see them? Where?
Eight o'clock!
Not before? Can't you tell me where to find
them?
Nein! nein! said the man; and, taking out a
flint and steel, he drew from his pocket his pipe,
lighted
it, and went leisurely out of the front door.
Every attempt made by Claude to see the police
was vain, and he was about returning to the hotel, when
he suddenly thought of Elkington. What if he went
to his hotel! He determined to do so,
notwithstanding
the reluctance, the repugnance he felt to show
himself there or anywhere among his fellow-men;
farther, he remembered again that he bore the
evidence
on his brow of the insult inflicted upon him the
preceding evening. He went, and gave the servant
his card for Lady Beverly.
She is asleep, said Scarlet, bluntly.
He begged she might be awakened.
Impossible, said Scarlet.
It affects the life of her son!
Perhaps so, said the man.
What do you mean, you scoundrel? said Claude.
Come, come, said Scarlet, a civil tongue, if
you please; you've got a whole eye yet, and you'd
better keep it if you know when you're well off.
I will go myself, said Claude, to Lady
Beverly's
door. She cannot know what's going on.
He stepped forward. The man laid a brawny hand
upon his arm, and coolly clinched the other fist.
I tell you what, my rum chap, said Scarlet, if
it wasn't for mere shame's sake, I'd bung up that
t'other eye of your'n in less than no time. I'd sarve ye
as master didgood for nothing, cowardly poltroon you
areto let another man go out and get shot, all for
avenging of your cuffs. If I couldn't be a better
gentleman
than that, I wouldn't be none, no how.
Claude grasped the fellow by the throat and
dragged
him a few steps with a force which greatly
astonished
him, who thought he had only a chicken to deal
with; and his astonishment was not diminished when,
just as he thought he was to receive a drubbing,
Claude released his hold, and said,
Poor fellow! while your master goes unpunished,
you ought to have free room. Let me see Lady
Beverly
,
and here is my purse.
I beg your pardon, sir, said Scarlet, very
respectfully
;
but milady can't be seen. Indeed, she's not
hereshe's out of town.
Out of town?
Last night! gone! and not to come back! We're
to follow in a day or two.
I understand, said Claude, with a sickening heart.
Your master is also out?
Yes, sir, said Scarlet, in a low tone.
And you are his confidential servant?
Scarlet was silent.
I will give you 10 if you will direct me to where
he is before anything happens.
I might take your money, sir, said Scarlet, but
it wouldn't be of no use. It's too late. It's all over
by this time.
Great Heaven!
It is, sir, that's certain. They be gone out now
two good hours.
And when did the arrangements take place?
Last night. Master up and struck Mr. Denham
I believe the poor gentleman's name's Denham
ain't it, sir? and he's game tootrue bloodno backing
out
there
up to the mark! It wasn't fifteen minutes,
sir, afore he had a gentleman here, and in a half an hour
the hull was settled. I hearn it all myself. I was
ordered to stand and keep watch afore the door.
And where is it they have gone?
Oh, don't fret yourself, sir. It's impossible to help
it. The poor gentleman's good stuff; but, Lord, sir!
he might as well put his head into a forty-nine
pounder
when it's a gitten fired, as to go out with master.
He never went out with a man yet without pinking
him. The poor gentleman's tucked under the green
sod an hour ago. I hope he haint got no family, has
he, sir? These ere is awkward things in such cases;
but when a man's called a `dd rascal,' what ken he
do, you know? How's your eye this mornin, sir?
CHAPTER V.
Claude
went back to his hotel in a state of mind
bordering on distraction, but it had the effect to divert
him from the consideration of himself. It seemed that
a fatal duel on his account, in return for an insult
which he had declined to resent, was all that was
necessary
to sink him to the lowest depths in the world's
esteem, if not in his own. But that was a less
insupportable
reflection than the situation of Mrs. Denham
and the sweet little girl, who were, probably, yet
locked
in peaceful slumber, unconscious of the
thunderbolt
about to fall upon them. He would have gone
again to the police, but he had no precise information
to give, and he felt sure, too, that it was too late for
interference. There was, however, still a
hope
. It
was possible either that chance might interrupt the
meetingor that Elkington might fallor that, if
Denham
should receive a wound, it might not be mortal.
But then the utter recklessness of Denhamhis
knowledge of Elkington's affair with the cardsand
the unerring skill, as well as remorseless character of
the latter, recurred to him with an agonizing force.
As he entered the hotel he saw that there was an
unusual
confusion. Several waiters were running to and
fro. One of them came up to him quickly as soon as
he saw him.
You had better go to Madam Denham.
Vol. II.E
Has anything happened?
Mr. Denham has gone off.
And not yet returned?
No.
He breathed again. He had felt an unutterable fear
on approaching the house.
Thank God! he said, all may yet be well.
The lady is in a bad way, sir; she's very ill.
At this moment a voice from a servant at the top of
the stairs called out,
Has Mr. Wyndham come in yet?
You'd better go to her, sir, said the landlord. I
fear something very dreadful has
Claude recovered from a momentary faintness,
nerved his heart, and entered the room. All that he
had imagined of horrible was surpassed by Mrs.
Denham
.
She was pale as death itself. Her hair hung
in disorder about her beautiful and lightly clothed
person
.
Her eyes were distended with terror, and the
little Ellen clung to her bosom, weeping aloud, and
winding her arms around her neck affectionately, and
repeating,
Dear sister, my dear, dear sister. He will come,
he will come. He will indeed, indeed he will!
Mrs. Denham's eyes were perfectly dry and
starting
from her head. She looked an image of tragedy
itself. The moment Claude entered she saw him,
for her wild eyes were fixed on the door; she sprang
up with an hysterical laugh, and, rushing upon him as
a lioness on one who had robbed her of her young, she
uttered, in tones that pierced his heart and froze his
blood, the dreadful words:
Ah! and now then!
where's Charles?
He ishe is
Is he here? Is he here?
Nonot herenot this instant.
Where is he, then?
What
have you done with
him?
My dearest madam
Is he alive? Is he
dead?
No, noGod grant  I hopenotnot dead,
muttered Claude, trembling beneath the powerful
agitation
of this scene.
Is he safe? Will he come? What do
you
know?
Is there any hope?
I thinkI believe
What do you
know
? Speakas before your God.
If
you deceive me!
Claude turned away, and, pressing his extended hand
against his forehead, shook as one by the bed of the
beloved and the dying.
She released her hold on him, and her hands fell
nerveless by her side.
Then he is
dead
. Oh God  oh GodI have
often feared this. She sank back into a chair.
Charlesmy husbandit is a dreamit is
impossible
.
Claude approached her, and took her cold hand in
his.
My dear friend, hear me. It is too late to deceive
you as to what has occurred. Your husband
has
gone
out to comply with a strange custom, but we have no
news of him, upon my honour. It is very possible he
he may returnaliveunhurt. Believe me, dearest
madam, there are many reasons to hopeindeed,
indeed
there are.
I'm sure there are, said Ellen, climbing up and
again winding her arms around her neck, and covering
her lips, forehead, and face with kisses.
You do not
know
anything, then?
Nothing.
And he
may
return? His step may be heardhis
beloved image may once more bless my eyes? Hark
harkher face lighted up with intense pleasure
it isit isha, ha! ha, ha! She screamed with
joy, and darted towards the door, which opened and
admitted
a
stranger.
The shock was too much for the poor girl. She
would have fallen at full length upon the floor had not
Claude caught her on his arm. He lifted her to the
sofa, and, consigning her to the care of the maid, turned
to the new-comer.
Who are you, sirand what is your message?
Sir, said the man, I am a Commissioner of the
Hotel. I have been sent to the lodgings of Lord
Elkington
with directions to let you know when he
returned
.
And he
has
returned? said Claude, in a low tone,
and with a shudder of inexpressible horror.
He has.
Alone?
Alone.
There was a pause. The commissioner then added,
He will leave town to-night.
Did you see him?
I did, sir.
What was he doing?
He was at breakfast, sir.
Breakfast?
Yes, sir; he said the eggs were boiled thirty
seconds
too long.
The eggs?
And appeared in excellent spirits!
Oh, it is certain, said Claude, Charles and he
have settled it. I was sure
The man shook his head.
What do you know? said Claude.
Nothing.
Claude paused.
I will goI will see him myself. I cannot
endure
this. And he instantly set off for Elkington's
lodgings.
CHAPTER VI.
Lord Elkington
is at home? said Claude to
Scarlet.
No, sir, said Scarlet, touching his hat; he has
been home, but is now gone out again. I told you
he'd come back!
Has anything happened?
Yes, a good many things has happened, said the
man; things is always a happening!
For God's sake, my good fellow, if you know
anything!
Egad, I know a good many thingsbut there's one
thing I don't know. I don't know what right you've
got to stand a questioning me in this here style about
private affairs. Mum's the word! But master said you
might see him if you called, and only you, or some
one from you.
Where is he, then? I will see him!
Well, he's now at Count Carolan's, with several
other people. Count Carolan gives a great `
dejooney
dong-song
' to-day.
Claude instantly bent his steps towards Carolan's.
It was too early for the general company to arrive,
but several carriages were before the door. He
entered
and mounted the stairs. They were arranged
with flowers and orange-trees, and the air was full of
perfume. The sound of distant music reached his
ears.
Whom will you see, sir? said the servant, for
neither Claude's face nor habiliments indicated one of
the ordinary guests.
Your master, or Lord Elkington.
They are in the boudoir of Madame la Comtesse.
Lead on.
E 2
And the man went forward, opened the door, and
announced him. He walked in. There was Count
Carolan, General St. Hillaire, Elkington, and the young
princethey were all engaged in earnest conversation.
At Claude's name there was a sudden pause, and his
entrance was remarked with much attention.
Oh, sir, said Elkington, you come. You had
better have sent a friend.
Mr. Wyndham, said Carolan, you must be brief,
for a trifling circumstance has occurred which renders
it necessary for Lord Elkington to absent himself a
while; and let me take the occasion to observe, in the
most marked manner, sir, that, in remaining here when
he might easily have gained the frontier
merely
from
a high and imperative sense of honour, and a generous
determination not to escape from youhe has shown
a character which places him far above your
calumnies
,
and far above reproach. I presume, sir, you
have come to demand satisfaction for the injuries
inflicted
on you last night. It would have been more
comme il faut
to send a third person.
I come to demand my friend, said Claude.
Your friend! Have you not selected one?
I speak of Mr. Denham. I come to ask of his fate.
He has a wife in a state of distractionin suspense,
and to relieve her I have undertaken this disagreeable
visit. Is Mr. Denham dead?
Mr. Denham is as he is, said Carolan; and
permit
me to remark, that if you were more
au fait
to the
way of the world, you would not prefer such questions
to persons not likely to answer.
Mr. Wyndham, said Elkington, if you are not
really a more despicable character than even I take
you to be, you will not now decline the invitation
which I tender you. Is it your intention to give me a
meeting?
No, sir. I regard you as a murderous ruffian, and
beneath contempt.
You are a dishonoured man! said Elkington;
and words from your lips have hereafter no
meaning
.
By those who honour
you
, my lord, I hope I shall
be always despised. By frequenting your society, they
sanction your deeds and degrade themselves to your
level. If woman, knowing you, touches your hand,
she falls from her purity; and if Providence sleeps
not, your own character will prove to you a sufficient
shame and a sufficient curse.
You have received
a blow!
said Elkington,
pointing
his finger at him.
I have, said Claude; and an insult thus given
and thus endured, recoils upon him who inflicts, and
ennobles him who receives. My character lies in the
tenour of a stainless life, and cannot be permanently
injured
by a tongue uninspired by truth, or a hand
unguided
by honour. I appeal to
Him
who knows my
motives for protection against you. He knows also
that, if you are yet alive, you have to thank my fear,
not of you, but of
him
.
There was a calmness in his manner which carried
conviction to the very soul of St. Hillaire, and awed
even Elkington himself. Carolan only said, Ah,
bah! fine notionshigh ideas, sirbut, since you are
not come here to redress your honour, the house is
mine, and
He waved his hand towards the door.
I forgive you, Carolan, said Claude; and may
the time never come when you shall know, too much
to your cost, the difference between an honest man
and such a person as you have made your friend.
How great! how noble! said St. Hillaire.
Let him say his worst. He is a blighted man, and
the blow I publicly inflicted on him will never be
forgotten
.
If, however, he dares again said Elkington.
Stop, young man, said St. Hillaire, in a deep
voice. You cannot, you shall not again persecute
this person. If he
be
destitute of the courage which
leads men into danger, is it proper that you should
therefore thus pursue him? And if he be, as I believe
he is, gifted with all your bodily courage and ten
times moreand if he be acting as he does, with the
forbearance almost of God, solely from a
principle of
right
, in what light do
you
then appear? You have
raised the hand of a fiend against true grandeur and
the sublimest courage which, even at the blow and
hiss, does not stoop from its course. What have you
then done? You have smitten as the Jew smote the
Saviour. I do not approve your course. The blow
you have struck will sink into your own forehead and
your own soul deeper than into that of this
unoffending
being. My young friend, I do not envy you. I
had rather be in his place than yours. You have no
other course than to ask his pardon.
His pardon, sir? said Carolan, in a tone of
astonishment
.
I? an apology? said Elkington. Never.
Go, then. You are rash, young, and ignorant of
the true uses and meanings of life. That may be
some excuse, but I believe you will suffer more than
your victim from the occurrences of last evening. I
believe, sir, in your cooler and better moments, they
will haunt you as a curse, and that they will leave a
stain upon your reputation as a gentleman.
By Gd, sir, said Elkington, do you mean
I mean that you are in the
wrong
, young man,
said St. Hillaire, sternly; and that, for one, I
disdain
you as an associate. I have watched your course
in reference to this matter, and I
despise
you, sir.
General St. Hillaire, said Elkington, do you
know to whom
General, said Carolan, I protest
Gentlemen, I wish you good-morning, said St.
Hillaire.
CHAPTER VIII.
Has
he come home? Is he here? Have you
seen him? Have you heard anything of him? were
the fearful questions from every lip as Claude returned
to his hotel.
Madam Denham is nearly distracted, said the
landlord. She calls for you. Pray go to her.
I dare not, said Claude, with a shudder.
She has demanded to be informed the instant you
come in, said the man. She is in a state of intense
excitement and agony. She walks the floor with
frantic
steps, as pale as a sheet. Sometimes she groans
and weeps, sometimes she prays. She's in a terrible
way. It's quite dreadfuland the poor little girl, too,
is so distressed. My God! what sort of a man must
her husband be, to leave her in such a condition?
A servant here came for Mr. Wyndham. He
must go instantly to Madam Denham. It was with
a faltering heart that Claude complied with this
request
,
and once more approached the door where so
lately he bade adieu to the friend who, perhaps, was
now in eternity. As he did so, he heard the hasty
steps of the bereaved widowher deep groansher
bursting sobs. He entered. Her look made him
shudder.
Speak! cried she. Charles
I know nothing, said Claude.
Have you seen Lord Elkington?
Claude hesitated.
Is he living?
He is.
Oh, Mr. Wyndham, for the love of God, tell me
all. You know, I am sure you do. I can bear it
better than this suspense. Tell memy husband is
woundedis perhaps she clasped her hands with
quivering lips and sobbed convulsively
dead!
I do not know. I have heard nothing distinctly.
He may be alive
Oh, God bless you for that word. He may yet live.
But
where is he?
Why does he not return?
Perhaps
he is wounded. Perhaps he is this instant
dying
?
She pressed her hands against her brain.
Ah, cruel, cruel Charles! Is it you who have
abandoned
me thus? you, who have torn my heart
inflicted
these horrid pangs? I will no longer wait. I
will go seek him.
She rushed to the door.
My dear, dear sister, said Ellen, you cannot go.
You do not know where he is. You are not dressed.
If he were in the street, he would soon be here. If
not, where would you go? Stay with me, my dear,
dear sister. God will take care of us; and the sweet
child again folded her in her arms, and pressed her
ashy cheek against her little bosom.
He might come, too, during your absence, said
the maid, respectfully.
Oh yes! true! she said, with a frightful smile.
Hours passed away as if they were ages. Noon
eveningnightand still Denham came notand no
news. Claude had again addressed himself to the
police
.
They were abroad in search of the parties, but
they could obtain no intelligence as to where they had
gone, or what had become of them. Elkington was
not at his lodgingsLady Beverly had left town the
day before for Hamburg, as if in anticipation of some
difficulty. It was reported, too, that Elkington, early
in the morning, had also gone, but whither no one
knew. His escape had been connived at by so many
gentlemen, who thought they were aiding a gallant
fellow
out of an unjust danger, that the police could get
no trace of him. Indeed, from many considerations,
they conducted the pursuit with no great activity.
Although
duelling was strictly prohibited in Prussia, and
particularly by the great Frederic, whose clear mind
had seen all its folly and wickedness, the crime was
thenas we fear, alas, it is nowconsidered as one of
those genteel misdemeanours of which a large class of
educated, and many excellent men, are rather proud
than ashamed. The magistrate who sternly sentences
a poor, ignorant creature for having stolen
wherewithal
to support fainting life, cannot condemn the
passionate
fool who submits his disagreements with his
friends to the chances of mortal combat, and who shows
so little respect for himselfhis adversarysociety
and God, as to stake two lives on a throw, and thus
sanction one crime by joining it with another. The
police also felt that the parties were Englishmen
that securing a surviver in such a case would place
them in an awkward dilemma. Lord Elkington's
rank and fortune, moreover, threw a sort of exemption
over his actions in the public opinion, and it was
understood
also that the injury had been words
offensive
to his
honour
as a
gentleman
.
Poor Mrs. Denham. It seemed impossible that she
could endure the interminable length of this day; but
the very intensity of her apprehensions prevented her
from sinking into the insensibility which nature would
otherwise have provided for her relief. As the night
approached, her agony had reached a state of nervous
excitement, which rendered it necessary to call in a
physician; but she would take nothing, and permit no
remedies to be adopted, till she should receive direct
intelligence of Mr. Denham.
Nine o'clock struckteneleventwelve; still
Denham came not, and no news of him could be
obtained
.
It was now near one. The widowfor all
felt that she was such except herself, and she still
hopedwas almost deprived of her senses. At every
whisper she started, at every step in the street she
trembled. Sometimes the sound of horses' feet would
advance from the distance. Her features would light
up; the noise approached, and seemed about to stop
at the door, but went on, and was lost again in the
distance
;
now a shout in the street startled hernow an
oath. Sometimes she heard the tramping of the
soldiers'
feet, as the guard were led round to their posts;
and once a party of riotous young men went by, and,
by a cruel coincidence, stopped immediately beneath
the window, shouting forth a glee, which was
interrupted
by peals of laughter. Then they departed
singing
,
their voices softening as they retreated, and dying
at last utterly away; leaving, they little knew what
silence, solitude, and despair behind them.
Mr. Wyndham, said Mrs. Denham, suddenly, in
a voice of sternness, which made him think her senses
were failing,
you
are the cause of this!
My dearest madam
You
coward!
Great Heaven!
You
knew my husband had the heart of a lion.
You knew
he
couldn't see his friend abused, and you
you
meanly took
a blowa blow!
a base, blasting
blow! and yet you
live
coward! and he, my brave,
my noble, my lion-hearted Charles, for your infamy
has risked his lifewhich, God in his mercy be
praised
,
is but a risk. He will not perish. It is
impossible
.
He will come. He is wounded, doubtless, but
what do I care for wounds? He will come, or he will
send for me. I shall nurse him. He will recover;
but
you
, sir, must never look for his friendship again;
nor his, nor mine, nor the world's esteem, nor your
own. You are a dishonoured man. I had rather be
Elkington
than you. A blow! coward!
There was suddenly a knock at the door. Mrs.
Denham fell back in her chair, laughing hysterically.
The intruder was a messenger of the police, to know
whether any news had been received of the affair.
One o'clock. The heavy peal went floating and
quivering over the silent town, and struck into the
hearts of all present, for they now foreboded the worst.
The solemn sound, as it died away, called forth new
groans, sobs, and hysterical screams. All
conversation
ceased. There was as little room for remark
as for hope or consolation. They sat like those
unhappy
beings we sometimes read of on a wreck,
waiting
in mute despair till the broken hulk goes down
with them for ever.
Two o'clock struck. Mrs. Denham had sunk into
a state of exhaustion, when a sharp, heavy knock
announced
an end of this suspense. There was decision
in it. The door was opened by a servant, and a step
was heard in the hall, quick, light, buoyant. It
approached
,
and all eyes were turned towards the door.
Ah God! he is here at last, cried Mrs. Denham,
with a smile of ineffable happiness, and gasping for
breath. The new-comer entered. It was again a
stranger. A start of horror went round the room, and
a low shudder was heard from Mrs. Denham, who
buried
her face in her hands.
Mr. Wyndham? said the stranger, who was a
gentleman in dress and appearance.
Claude stepped forward and recognised Beaufort.
I beg your pardon, said that gentleman, with a
polite smile; will you permit me to have one word
with you?
He cast a glance around upon the rest of the
company
,
but without in the least changing his manner. He
was a man of the world, and well knew what he was
going to see when he undertook the mission.
Claude followed him into an adjoining chamber.
Devilish painful duty, my dear fellow
disagreeable
thingin fact, dd awkwardbut
Speak out, and tell me what has happened, said
Claude, sternly;
I
also have my duties.
Sir! said Beaufort, your tone is very
extraordinary
,
but your excitement excuses any liberty; I
promised to let you know that your friend is hurt.
Hurt! Oh, Beaufort! Oh, Heaven be praised!
is he only hurt?
Vol. II.F
Why, his wound is baddd bad. Hehein
short, he's
dead
, sir.
Dead! said Claude, with awe, with horror
unutterable
.
Denham! my friend!
Yes, dead enough, sir. This is possibly rather
annoying to you. I'm devilish sorryI am, positively.
Dead! echoed Claude, the sound of his friend's
living voice ringing in his ears; his beaming, laughing
eyes flashing full before his imagination.
To say the truth, this morning at P. He
behaved
very welldevilish wellI'm quite sure you'll
be glad to hear that. The thing was perfectly well
managed, I assure you. Perfectly. Nothing could be
handsomer or fairer. Elkington missed him the first
shot. Devilish odd, toowasn't it? The second he
hit him. He's a terrible dog. The ball went
directly
through the heart. He leaped six feet in the air,
and he was a dead man before he came down. I
protest
I never saw anything so handsomely done.
And I am to bear this news to his wife!
Certainly! I've done
my
part. I stood by him
to the last, and have brought the corpse in town. It
will be here inlet me see, half past twoit'll
certainly
be three. By-the-way, madam is a fine-looking
creature. Devilish pretty in that dress. Poor girl!
I'm devilish sorry. You'll take good care of her,
Wyndham? Egad, you're a lucky dog! Where are
you going to have the body put?
Diddid my friend leave me no message?
Oh, aproposwhat a forgetful dog I am!
Certainly
a
note for
you
.
Give it me.
Yes, devilish queer that I should forget that, as the
poor man isn't likely to trouble me with another in a
hurry. He put it in my hand the very last thing. He
behaved immensely well, positively. I really thought
at first that he was going to touch Elkington; his ball
grazed his sleeve. Elkington smoked a segar through
the whole affair. He's a capital fellow. WhyI've
lost your letternoyes I havenoah, here it is.
Who has the body?
Two men. We hired 'em to bring it in town in
the carriage. Egad! it's been all day in a windmill.
We had to disperse, you see. Elkington's gone this
morning at 12; I start to-night. I shall run over to
Carlsbad. This cursed German
cuisine
plays the
devil with one's stomach. Won't you smoke?
Claude did not answer. He was reading the note
he had just received, which struck his nerves and soul
with an agony of horror and grief, traced, as it was, by
one now in the grave.
Welladieu, said Beaufort.
Leben sie wohl,
mein freund! Au revoir!!
And the young man, lighting his segar and
arranging
the curls around his forehead, went out.
CHAPTER IX.
Trembling
thrillinghalf blinded by horror and
griefClaude, after several vain attempts, read the
letter. It was written in the writer's usual flowing
hand. There was no tremour, or sign of haste, or
agitation
,
except that two drops of wax from a candle
showed that it had been the work of the night.
My dear Claude
,
This will only be put into your hands in case of
my death. You will, before then, be informed on the
circumstances which produce it. I saw you struck
last night, and I lost all prudence; I interfered, and
received a blow myself. I have always been brought
up to think a
blow ought not
to be borne. Death is
preferable to dishonour. I know Elkington is a shot,
but I can't help it. The custom of society
must be
complied with. Do not blame me, my wiser and more
thoughtful friend. You have your opinion, I mine.
I am determined to kill Elkington if I can, unless he
make me the humblest apology. This is not to be
expected, and I am prepared to fall. I need not say
that I have not called on you to arrange the thing for
me, as I know you would have taken measures to
prevent
it; otherwise there is no man on earth I should
so readily have chosen. Beaufort I had a slight
acquaintance
with, and he consented at once.
I do not allow myself to think of the future; it
would be useless, and might unman me. My uncle's
fortune, you know, most unfortunately, reverts to other
heirs at my death; but I have ensured my life for
2000, which will keep
I cannot write her name
out of want. You are in a fixed position in
society
,
calm, wise, and good; and with leisure to make
this blow as tolerable as possible. She is an
angel
,
Claude. Never has she brought one frown to my face,
one shadow to my heart. She is all beauty,
compliance
,
sweetness, lovea being as rare as diamonds are.
I do not write to her. I
dare
not. I cannot. I have
tried, but there my firmness forsakes me. I love her
to adoration, the extent of which even she cannot know.
I have kissed the glove she has worn, the flower she
has touched. I have often blessed her with all a lover's
rapturein her absencein her beautiful sleep; and,
were I to suffer my thoughts to dwell longer on her,
I should let this Elkington goI should defy all men's
opinion
. But a
blow!
Destiny calls meI have no
alternative left.
You will find in my portfolio, third drawer from
the top, in the secretary of the little room I occupied
as a reading-room, a paper of directions which I have
prepared for you. The life ensurance company will
pay, I presume, without hesitation. I am quite
certain
she can never want the firm and wise protection
of a brother while
you
live. At this moment, my
fancy recurs to what may happen to-morrow; to the
pain it will inflict on her sweetsweet bosom; to the
scene which must follow any accident. I am almost
ready to acknowledge that I am
wrong
in thus
pursuing
this act; that you are rightnoblysublimely right
in your higher, milder, and
braver
course. Yes, I do
you justicefullfull justice. As my eye glances from
this sheetthe last, perhaps, I shall ever writeto the
face of
my wife
who has trusted her happiness to
me
now sealed with a calm and happy peace, which my
infatuation is so soon to destroyI feel like a scoundrel
and a fool. Yet this custom of society
must
be
complied
with. Protect her, ye angels! Pity her, oh
God!
Adieu, my friendmay we meet again!and, once
free from this affair, I here record my oath never to
engage in another. Kiss Ellen for me, should the
worst happen; and bear my blessing, my farewell to
my wife.
Ever affectionately, my dear Claude,
Your friend,
Charles Denham
.
P.S.And our journey to Italy, too!
As Claude finished reading, there was a slight stir
behind him. He turnedit was Mrs. Denham. Her
pale faceher wild eyesher long loose hairthe
singular expression which terror and long agony had
called into her countenance, now heightened by the
certainty that Denham was no longer living, gave her
the aspect of a spectre escaped at the dead hour of
night from the abodes of eternal wo: she had read the
letter over his shoulder, and she stood pointing at it
with the grin of a lunatic.
Well, then, she said, calmly, I know all. Charles
is
dead
. Charles! Charles!my life!my love!
my husband!my own beloved Charles!
She wandered back again to her room. Claude could
not conceive, indeed, how she had been thus sufferedto
escape from it. He had not time to follow her before
F 2
he heard the wheels of a carriage rolling away from
the door, and he understood at once that the body had
arrived, and that the attention of the rest had probably
been attracted to that new and appalling scene in the
tragedy. Shuddering with a horror which he had
never experienced before, as well at the thought of the
shock which the approaching scene was about to
communicate
to himself as to the appalled heart of the
widow, he overtook her once more in the room, which
was now deserted by everybody. Even Ellen was
gone.
Where
are they all? said she, in a voice
perfectly
calm and natural. Have they gone to bed
already
,
without saying good-night? No.
There
they
are! Where have they been?
What
is going on?
These queries were drawn forth by several figures
which came in, with their backs towards the
apartment
.
As they turned, their faces were all white and
terror-stricken. Two or three men next appeared
waiters and strangers, among whom were some mere
chance passengers, apparently attracted by curiosity
from the street. A noise was heard in the corridor,
as the uneven tread of men with heavy shoes bearing
a burden, and a dead silence overspread all. Then
the landlord entered and whispered Claude, who took
Madam Denham's hand and led her into the adjoining
room. She accompanied him passively. Ellen, pale
and terrified, followed, but instantly darted back. The
tramping grew nearer. The adjoining room seemed
full of people.
Lock the door! said a voice, in a low but
business-like
tone. Shut this one.
There was a pause, interrupted only by the heavy
tread of feet.
Take away the little girl! said the same voice.
The other tablenobreadthwaysnow! steady!
there! a sheet!
There was another pause.
Claude held the hand of his companion with
firmness
,
but, disengaging herself with a sudden start, she
darted forward and threw open the door. Therein
his usual clothes, boots, and spurshis cravat off
his face stark, stiff, whitehis long, glossy hair
hanging
back from his headhis arm fallen lifeless from
the tablehis marble forehead and lip touched with
bloodlay the dear, the revered, the happy husband
his stately form extended in death. The wife saw it
as she threw open the door. There was a quivering,
broken shriek, but low and short. She darted
forward
.
She pressed her hand against his browhis
lipshis heart. She touched his closed eyeshis icy
cheekshis stony forehead. Her fingers were chilled
and stained with blood.
My husband! she cried, with a convulsive sob.
Then, without a word, a tear, a murmur more, she fell
upon his bosom.
The rude men stood apart.
No one broke the silence.
And thus came back the duellist to those whom
Providence had appointed him to protect; to his wife
to his childto his home; but yesterday full of
happinessof peaceof hope!
CHAPTER X.
The
day broke again, and all the noises of a busy
city rose upon the air as usual. The birds were
singing
in the groves, the shining river lapsed slowly
on in the sunshine, the careless passengers flowed in
the same ceaseless tide through the streets, intent
on their own affairs, of business or pleasure, of folly
or vice. How few in the serious resolutions of
virtue
!
Night fell with its coolness and silenceits
dewy odoursits glittering starsits silver clouds
its hidden scenes of mirthof revelof rash crime
of dark wo.
During the day, the early dawn of which had brought
to Mrs. Denham the dead body of her husband, and
while it remained extended in bloody state upon the
spot where, so few hours before, his gay voice had
sounded, and he had held aloft the sparkling wine in
the full security of life, health, and hope, the unhappy
widow appeared able to restrain her feelings by their
very intensity, as if none of the ordinary modes of
grief could adequately give them vent. She even
spoke with Claude calmly and rationally on the
subject
of her affairs; begged him to make several
necessary
arrangements preparatory to her departure;
alluded
to the anguish the news would cause her father,
and inquired in what way Charles was to be buried.
Since the first sight of him, when she had fainted on
his cold and cruel bosom, she had not ventured to see
the body, which had undergone the sad ceremonies
preparatory to interment, and been duly clad in the last
apalling toilet of the grave. It was considered
necessary
to commit it to the earth in the most private
manner, and as soon as propriety would permit. Poor
Claude! who had not slept for two nightsworn out,
staggering, and exhaustedattended himself to these
painful dutiesanswered for the expensesordered all
the necessary articles, each one of which, even to name,
strikes heavily on the heart, and calls upon us like a
trumpet to remember the fleetingness, the nothingness
of life. Mrs. Denham without him would have been
alone, and it is frightful to think of the rude shocks her
anguish-stricken mind would have been subjected to
but for his firm, able, and watchful forethought and
attention
.
She had no arrangements to makeno men
to seeno bills to payno attempts at fraud to
withstand
.
The door of her room leading to the body was
locked, and she was seen by and she saw nobody.
Her piety was fervent and sincere; and this solitude,
which she employed in imploring support from her
Creator, strengthened her soul and calmed her despair.
Night came againnightupon the widow. The
cool, sweet shadows which
he
had loved so muchthe
bright, unweeping starsand the round, soft moon,
which he was never to see again. At her request,
Mrs. Denham was left alone with the little Ellen, in
whom this trying occasion showed a mind beyond her
years. These two sweet beings were bound up in
each other, and both, like two limpid rivers stealing to
the sea, had poured all their affections upon him who
had deserted them. The night seemed to open afresh
the tenderness of their nature. Ellen stole into the
lap of her sister, who folded and pressed her in her
arms.
We are alone in the world now, Ellen.
My dear sister, was all that the affectionate and
thoughtful child could utter.
In a few moments Mrs. Denham asked for her
portfolio
.
It was in a little room adjoining the bedroom,
looking out on a garden. Denham had been writing
there the day before. Ellen went to get it. Instead
of returning, she remained, and Mrs. Denham heard a
sob, and followed herself. On entering, her eyes were
struck by the various objects of the room. There
was his chairthe desk he had been writing onhis
caneand a pair of gloves, carelessly flung upon the
table by himself, and wearing the impress of his hands.
A book lay open, with a pearl paper-knife under it,
and his pencil-case. A sheet of paper half filled with
his writing. The ink seemed scarcely dry. He had
left it at her call the day of Claude's last visit. It was
a letter to her father. She read it. It was full of
gay anticipations of their intended visit to Venice.
His cloak and his travelling cap hung against the wall;
and the bereaved wife heardso illusive is
imagination
the
tones of his voicenow in light mirthnow
in kind affectionor directing a servantor reading a
passage in poetry; then his laughthen a tune
hummed
unconsciously, peacefully.
She fell upon a sofa, and tears, as if her very soul
were dissolving in torrents, gushed from her eyes,
and her throbs threatened to suspend the functions of
life.
Claude had voluntarily slept in the room with the
body. Locking the doors, wrapping his cloak around
him, he threw himself upon a sofa at a late hour.
Even exhausted as he was with mental and bodily
fatigue
,
the proximity of the cold remains of the man
he most loved, and the sobs of the unhappy widow,
still, for a time, kept him from the sleep which nature
demanded. For a few moments, as he laynow the
only protector and guide of that helpless woman,
whose rash, unreflecting husband, had abandoned her
to such horrorshe could not but feel that he had
acted
rightly; that, however gallant and chivalric might
appear the course of Denham to the eye of vain pride
and worldly reason, he had acted not only unwisely,
but cruelly, and even wickedly. By submitting his
quarrel to the chances of a meeting, he had made the
pistol of a profligate duellist the arbiter of his own
honour and his wife's happiness. He had
ignominiously
thrown away a life upon which rested heavy
responsibilities
,
and thereby gratified Elkington's wish.
What was the result of this fierce and desperate
arbitrament
?
Had he resented the blow? Had he wiped
out its stain? Had he punished the aggressor? No;
the aggressor had struck him with the deliberate
intention
to provoke a combat, in which his skill made
the result almost certain. In yielding, he had weakly
run into the trap of a designing foe. That foe had
triumphed.
He
was laid low in death. His fortune
was forfeited; and even the policy of ensurance, upon
which he had so strangely depended in the hurry and
whirl of his last hour, he would have known, at any
other time, could, under the present circumstances, be
worth nothing; death in a duel being one of those acts
which break the contract between the ensurer and the
ensured. Mrs. Denham, then, was left penniless and
helpless in a foreign country. Her bursting sobs
betrayed
her pangs. Where was the ear that should be
first to hear, the hand nearest to sooth them?
At length he dropped asleep in the midst of these
reflections, and for all the distress he had suffered, he
felt that secret support which attends the
consciousness
of having done right. Deeply agonized as he
was at the thought that the very act of virtue which
he congratulated himself upon had caused the death
of his friend, his firm and unwavering sense of reason
taught him that the consequences, however fatal, were
the decree of Heaven. Amid the grief they
occasioned
him, there was no feeling of self-reproach.
His sleep, though unbroken, was filled with dreams.
Dark forms of bloody phantoms the dim shadows
of the waking world hovered around him. Again the
lifeless form of his friend was borne in to blast the
eyes of his distracted wife, who raved and shrieked in
her despair. Little Ellen again moved about, pale and
terrified; and the strange faces and heavy tread of
common men came and went in the details of those
arrangements, so cold to those who perform, so
thrilling
to those who behold them.
Morning again dawned. Long before the gray light
had paled the stars, Claude was up, and all things were
ready to bear for ever away the sad remains of the loved
one. The rude men came in again, their heavy steps
echoing upon the uncarpeted floors and corridors.
The coffin, that uncouth shape which differs so
strangely
from the same melancholy image in England and
America, was about to be closed.
The solemn, awful dead! Claude gazed long and
deeply. The features were settled from the stern look
which they had worn, into a peaceful smile and an
unearthly
beauty, such as often comes over the dead ere
they are withdrawn for ever from the light of earth.
Alas! he thought, as he perused those fixed and
rigid features, cold habitant of abodes we know not
of! thou seest not! thou hearest not! Thou wast
as I am. I must be as thou! Mayst thou carry with
thee into the dark realm of eternity the peace thou hast
taken from those who remain behind!
Ready, sir? said the undertaker, offering to lift
on the lid.
At this moment Ellen, her cheeks almost as white
as those beside him, came to the door and beckoned
Claude. He went to her. He stooped down and
kissed
her little quivering lips. She returned his embrace
with a fond affection, as if she appreciated the
kindness
and wisdom of his character and conduct. Then
she drew him by the hand along into the room of Mrs.
Denham without saying anything.
Mr. Wyndham, said Mrs. Denham, one
farewell
look!
Claude had dreaded this, and he turned away his
head.
I entreatI implore! I am perfectly calm. Only
one!
I will be silent. I will be all myself. There is a
power above. He will hold, He will sustain me. One
parting look! do not fear for meoneonly!
Come, then, said Claude, feeling that the shock
might perhaps be of service, by bringing her feelings
to a crisis.
Step by stepfaltering  tremblingquivering in
every fibrethe agitation of the moment thrilling them
both, they passed slowly into the room. The homely
menials stood away as they approached, and Claude
regretted, long ere he reached the spot, the permission
he had accorded. It was, however, too late. Mrs.
Denham advanced. She uncovered the face. The
faint gray beams of the early day fell coldly upon it.
She gazed a moment. The silence was unbroken,
when a shriek, piercing and wildanotherand
another
,
announced how much she had overrated her own
strength.
The early labourer stopped in the street; the
peasant
woman rested her burden, stood and listened; and
the windows of the surrounding houses were thrown
suddenly open, while Claude bore a senseless form
upon his arm from the room.
The last star was yet visible in heaven as he
returned
from the neglected spot where the
duellist
was
committed
to the bosom of our common mother, hastening
unbidden into the presence of his Creator, and leaving
behind him broken hearts and broken fortunes.
CHAPTER XI.
Some
days passed away. Time goes on, however
it is with us. There are events which seem great
enough to stop him, but he still goes on. He stays
not for the lover. He whirls away all his light dreams,
and he equally carries on the wretch to the end.
After
all, it does not so greatly matter how we fare in a
vessel which crosses but such a narrow sea, and which
no opposing wind can keep back a moment from its
destined and dark harbour.
Mrs. Denham recovered from the violence of her
grief. She was pale, thin, and haggard; but she was
again as others are, moving about, with her particular
grief treasured in her own bosom. It seems strange
how much we can endure, and yet eat, and drink, and
sleep, and smile, and run the daily routine of familiar
life. But the heart is made to endure. It is like a
ship sent abroad upon the ocean, framed not only to
glide over the smooth seas, but to cope with the billow
and the whirlwind. There are in it corresponding
principles of buoyancy. Behold it careering loftily,
with swollen canvass and flying banner, moving like a
god almost, over the beautiful, obedient deep. The
tempest bursts upon it, and fearful is the struggle. It
is worn, and torn, and broken. Its tall sails are rent,
its gay banner is gone, and its spars strew the ocean;
but, when the sunshine comes again, lo! it is there.
Not the same, but it is there.
To Claude this unhappy girl now owed everything.
Vol. II.G
She was actually penniless. The money they had
brought with them in cash was absorbed in the
expenses
of the funeral, mourning purchases, paying
servants
,
of which they had two, a courier and a
femme
de chambre
, whom Mrs. Denham was now obliged to
pay. The courier was saucy, and demanded more
than was just. He would have been paid but for
Claude. The man was extremely insolent, and,
seizing
the valuable watch which Mr. Denham had worn,
swore he would carry it off unless paid. Claude
entered
the room at the moment, sent to the police, had
him arrested, and compelled him to make an humble
apology and to beg for pardon, which, but at the
request
of her he had so brutally insulted, would not
have been accorded.
The letter of credit, usually carried by travellers,
Mrs. Denham instantly enclosed to the bankers who
had given it; knowing that the money she might draw
on it would not now be refunded.
I am totally ruined, said she to Claude. I have
positively nothing. Even were we at home, I should
be in a state of destitution. My father has been
unfortunate
,
and is not in a situation to offer us a home.
Here I am worse; I am even in debt, and without the
means of returning to England.
No, madam, said Claude. You must excuse me
for the liberty I have taken, but I have procured you
another letter of credit upon my own account. I have
ordered in all your bills. They are paid. This is the
letter of credit. It is for one hundred pounds.
Mr. Wyndham! faltered Mrs. Denham, while
little
Ellen stole up to him, took his hand, and pressed
it against her lips.
I am your husband's friend, said Claude. He
has, however rashly and unnecessarily, sacrificed his
life in my cause, and he has bequeathed you to my
care. I will hear of no denial. Indeed, it is already
done. You had better return to London at once. I
know a ladythe kindest, the best in the worldwho
is going almost immediately; she will be a mother, a
sister, a friend to you. It is Madame Wharton, of
whom I have so often spoken.
But this moneyI am entirely without resources
I can never repay it. Proprietydelicacyhonesty,
all demand that I should decline it.
It is very well to talk in this way, said Claude,
but I must tell you plainly, if you were ever so
disposed
to resist, you cannot. I must exert the
authority
with which I am invested; and, if you will not
permit
me to be your brother, I am, in my own right,
your guardian.
Dearest Mr. Wyndham, said Ellen, coming to
him as he sat, and putting her arm round his neck,
how good, how kind you are! God will bless you
for your generosity to us. If she will not take the
money, give it to
me
. I know you are sincere, and
that you will be glad to help us out of Berlin. Oh, if
uncle Charles had acted like you. What harm did
Mr. Elkington do him, after all, by striking him?
You
were struck, and you are as well as you were before,
and as good; and if he had killed you too, we should
have had no friend. I'll take the money, and carry
sister Mary back to London, and we shall bless you
and pray for you, night and day, as long as we live.
Sweet child! said Claude, folding to his bosom
the ingenuous little being, whose mind saw truth
unclouded
by sophistry or worldly example; and, since
I am to transact business hereafter with you, not with
your disobedient sister, I shall tell you what else I
have done. We need not care whether she likes it or
not.
No, indeed.
I have directed 100 to be annually held by my
banker, payable to your sister's order. See, she's
going
to contradict us; but we must teach her obedience
to her new masters.
Mrs. Denham buried her face in her handkerchief.
At nine o'clock the next evening, Claude
conducted
Mrs. Denham and her young companion to the
office
of the
poste
, where he presented them to Madame
Wharton. He had taken the
coup
, and they were
comfortably arranged alone.
The merry horn sounded again, and the clattering
horses' hoofs struck fire from the pavement as they
stood stamping in the court. Madame Wharton and
Claude were already so knit in the bonds of friendship
that he seemed to have known her all his life. Their
parting was in a corresponding degree warm and
affectionate
.
She folded him to her bosom, and,
somewhat
to his astonishment, imprinted a kiss upon his
forehead. He was going to make some lively
comment
upon the rapid progress of their friendship, when
he perceived her cheeks bathed in tears. As he bade
farewell to Mrs. Denham, the poor girl's convulsive
movements betrayed how her soul was shaken; but
she took the handkerchief from her face one moment,
and her eyes met his.
Mr. Wyndham, she said, extending her hand, I
cannot replyI cannotbut God will bless your
future
steps. There is one thing I must say before we
leave, if my heart breaks with it; in my delirium the
other day, I wronged you by charging upon
you
the
catastrophethe fatalthe
She paused a moment, unable to proceed.
I wronged you, she at length continued; and
every step I have heard of yoursevery tone of your
voice sinceand every act of kindness and
generosity
,
reproaches my folly and guilt in having done so.
Claude was deeply moved by this address, though
it fell upon his burning soul like a balm.
You have acted rightwiselynobly. Charles
has
The new agony of grief impeded her utterance.
Allons, messieurs,
en route
, cried the conducteur,
cracking his whip.
Mr. Wyndham  dearest Mr. Wyndham, said
Ellen, putting up her lips, her eyes streaming with
tears, good-by. Oh, I wish we could live with you
always.
And remember, dearest child, Claude whispered
in her ear before he lifted her into the carriage, in
me
you have a
friend
. Write to me sometimes. My
address is at my banker's; and I promise, whatever
you ask, I will always comply, as if I were your
father
.
The
portires
were closed with a slam. The
voyageurs
in the
voiture
were ready. Adieus full of
mirth and joy were exchanged between parting friends.
The cumbrous vehicle dashed off into the street; a
handkerchief was waved to him out of the window as
it was lost in the shadow, he could not distinguish by
whom; and tears, sad but sweet, relieved his aching
heart, and enabled him to breathe more freely, now
that the curtain had fallen over the closing scene of
the tragedy in which he had borne such a painful
rle
.
As he walked home through the crowded streets, the
cool air fell soothingly upon his face, as if the breath
of angels were mingled with it. He paced on through
the narrow
Knig Strasse
crossed the bridge, where
the colossal equestrian statue of the great elector
frowned upon him through the shadowsand beheld
the vast Schloss rising against the summer heaven, as
it had stood for centuries, and beneath whose roof he
had spent so many happy hours amid those royal
gayeties
which fascinated him so much on his first arrival.
He had calm but high thoughts of life, and, man as he
was, wended his lonely way homeward. He walked
the earth as one willing to quit it, and certain of a
brighter abode.
Strange life! he thought; yet why should
he
mourn who has done no wrong? Already the events
which have so harrowed me are swept into the past;
already they have become shadows. The frowns and
the cold looks of that gay society, who have
condemned
me unheard for following the dictates of reason,
humanity, and religionthe blow of Elkingtonthe
G 2
thoughts of the rashthe sneers of the unfeelingthe
dead face of Denhamthe bursting sobs of the
newmade
widow  the horror and anguish of my own
soul, swerving from its path at the shocks of fortune
already they have ceased to be realities. They are
memoriesthey are vanished dreams. Is it for these
that I would sacrifice
right
, which is eternal?
It was ten when he reached his hotel. The
responsibility
which had rested on him was now at an end.
He felt exhausted, and tired nature asked repose. The
thoughts which had preyed upon him ceased their task,
and a tender languor overspread his soul. The world
was against him. He had disregarded its rulesits
vile customsits antique, bloody opinions. He had
received
a blow!
It had not stained him. It had
left him free to act, as the pale moon is free to keep
on her Heaven-appointed course, even when the dog
howls at her, and the maniac treads on her uninjured
light, and swears she is unchaste. Was
he
to blame,
that Denham, knowing his opinions, had sought his fate?
Well
he knew (and the thought gave him perfect
quiet on that point), had he been able to prevent his
meeting his enemy by sacrificing his own life, he
would have done so without a moment's hesitation.
He had done
all
in his power, and the dark
consequences
were shaped by Heaven's inscrutable decree,
which the blind mortal must bow to without seeking
a cause. It is the privilege of principle to be able to
turn to Providence, whatever may grow out of its
conscientious
action, without fear. It can murmur to its
Creator, It is not I, oh God! but
thou
.
As he threw himself upon the bed, a voice beneath
the windowsome wandering lover, perhaps,
serenading
his mistressbroke forth into the following song
by Curran. The voice of the singer was clear,
melodious
,
and gave to the music, of no common sweetness,
the charm of taste and feeling.
Oh sleep! a while thy power suspending,'
Weigh not yet my eyelids down;
For memory see! with eve attending,
Claims a moment for her own.
I know her by her robe of mourning,
I know her by her faded light;
When, faithful with the gloom returning,
She comes to bida sad `good-night.'
Oh let me hear, with bosom swelling,
While she sighs o'er time that's past;
Oh let me weep, while she is telling,
Of joys that pine, and pangs that last.
And now, oh sleep, while grief is streaming,
Let thy balm sweet peace restore,
While fearful hope through tears is beaming,
Sooth to rest that wakes no more!
CHAPTER XII.
Claude
now made the necessary preparations to
leave Berlin. He had laid before the police an
account
of the manner in which he had been twice
attacked
;
but, having no information to give, they could
do nothing for him but offer him a passport with as
little delay as possible. He was resolved, however,
not to leave till he had in some degree counteracted
the calumnies of Elkington. He had written to the
Marquis of E, who, with Lord Perceval, was
perfectly
acquainted with his curious history, and perhaps
knew more of it than he felt at liberty to disclose.
The reply was a letter so decisive and flattering, that
he almost hesitated to submit it to any one's
inspection
.
He, however, concluded to send it to Carolan;
and, fearful of having it returned, like the last,
unopened
,
he determined to enclose it to General St. Hillaire,
who had so nobly, and with such dignity, defended him
against the last insolence of Elkington. He
accordingly
wrote him the following note:
My dear General
,
I am about leaving Berlin, but cannot do so
without
performing a certain duty to myself, the necessity
of which imboldens me to address this request to you.
It is also proper that your generous confidence in me
should be confirmed; and I beg therefore to enclose to
you the accompanying letter from the Marquis of
E; a gentleman, I believe, whom Count Carolan
corresponds with, and whose opinions may have some
weight. I have a kind of right to press this letter
on Count Carolan, who has openly exhibited an
acquiescence
in the misstatements of Elkington. I leave
to his own sense of right the task of protecting my
name hereafter. As to my
courage
a suspicion of
it can only be removed by those occasions which
Providence
sends, enough to try the temper of our souls
on earth, and to furnish us an opportunity to display it
to the world when vanity requires. If circumstances
have raised a doubt of mine, it is a misfortune which,
like shipwreck or pestilence, every man is liable to,
and which, if chance does not remedy it, patience must
endure. Having deliberately adopted a principle upon
this point, I shall adhere to it and abide the
consequences
.
From all
other
doubts the letter of the
Marquis
of E rescues me; and, after perusing it, Count
Carolan will at least do me the justice to express
himself
satisfied, and to acknowledge that my past life has
been as irreproachable as it has been unfortunate.
For yourself, my dearest general, accept my thanks
for the manner in which you have interested yourself
in my favour. That there are many persons above
the prejudices of the day, and who can find other
motives
for the course I have chosen than vulgar fear, I
am convinced; but as the first who boldly took part
with the poor and the insulted, and whose superior
wisdom comprehended his actions, you will never
be forgotten by your sincere and grateful friend,
Claude Wyndham
.
Claude to Count Carolan.
Sir
,
I send you, through General St. Hillaire, a letter
from the Marquis of Efurnishing a brief history
of my past life, from his knowledge of my character
and conduct. The apparent indelicacy of presenting
an eulogium so partial, as well as my repugnance to
open any farther communication with one whose good
opinion has been withdrawn with a publicity so unjust,
would secure you against further intrusion of me or my
affairs; but a name which, however unadorned with
rank or affluence, I have endeavoured to keep at least
unstained  gives me the right to deny with proof
whatever has been asserted with falsehood and
believed
with haste. I bestow no attention on Elkington,
because he is wilfully wrong; and I offer this
explanation
to you, because I think you only carelessly so.
That you
are
wrong your perusal of the letter enclosed
will compel you to allow, and my slandered character
induces me to
demand
the acknowledgment.
I have the honour to be, your obedient servant,
C. Wyndham
.
An hour afterward, the Marquis of E's letter
and his own were returned unopened to Claude in one
from Carolan, containing the following lines:
Mr. Wyndham: Sir
,
I enclose the letter of the Marquis of E, as well
as your own, without any other reply to the `
demand
'
you make for an acknowledgment of `error' than
that men's opinions are their own, and differ in many
points more doubtful and important. There is an
account
at my banker's of 50, which I will thank you
to settle.
Your obedient servant,
Carolan
.
Claude tore the letter into pieces and dropped it on
the floor. Its injustice and insolence he felt for a
moment
bitterly; but he thought him an ass, and then
dismissed
the subject from his mind, he trusted, for ever.
He had scarcely done so when the footman brought
in two more letters. One was in his banker's hand,
which he welcomed with pleasure. He had not only
long since used all his ready cash, but he had
considerably
anticipated his income. His late payments for Mrs.
Denham had caused him to do this; and as for the
50 for which, in a casual transaction with Carolan
respecting
a horse, he had become indebted to him, and
which that gentleman so singularly demanded, he had
really, until now, forgotten to repay it. Nor did he
find, in the pertinacity with which it was demanded,
anything more than the desire of a little mind to avail
itself of the most trifling opportunity of offering an
insult
.
Since his payments for Mrs. Denham, in fact,
he had not the means to refund it till the receipt of the
usual remittance from his London banker, which he
had some time before written for, and which he now
every day expected. He opened the present letter,
therefore, with a feeling of pleasure, as affording the
means to settle his accounts and quit Berlin
immediately
.
It was not without reading it over two or three
times that he was able to comprehend its full import.
It was as follows:
London, .
Sir
,
We beg to inform you, for your government, that
the sum hitherto deposited in our hands on your
account
has been withheld for the ensuing year, and we
are instructed that it will not hereafter be continued.
We are also grieved to inform you, that, upon the
presentation of your last draught, we were under the
unpleasant
necessity of declining to accept it, on account
of the irregularity attending your having drawn it
considerably
in advance of your income.
We annex a statement of your account, wherein
you will perceive that your draughts amount to
when, as your income up to the 1st of June
563
amounts to
525
leaves at your debit
38
of which we request you will take due note, in order
to reimburse immediately the balance, which we are
instructed to desire with the least possible delay.
We remain, sir,
Your very obedient servants,
N. B. & Co.
CHAPTER XIII.
It
often happens that a misfortune falls upon us
precisely at the time when we are least able to bear it.
This was now the case with Claude. He had not
overdrawn his salary at any former time, nor had he
ever been in debt. But Rossi had been a
considerable
tax upon him. The 100 to Mrs. Denham had
taken all his means. He was naturally careless of
money, and he now found, with alarm and horror, that
his expenses amounted to considerably more than he
had the power to pay. He would be unable even to
discharge his hotel bill. He owed about 30 besides
the 38 to the London banker, and a small protested
draught. The note of Carolan now startled him. It
now wore a different aspect, but it was still as full of
mystery as of perplexity. It was a demand of
payment
of the 50, couched in terms intentionally
insulting
,
and implying a suspicion that it might not be
liquidated
.
With all his fancied self-discipline, his blood
boiled at the idea of an insult; but one thus
deliberately
preferred by a man to whom he owed money
he could not pay, had a character of its own not at all
agreeable. He had promised Carolan at their last
interview
to settle it at once. He had thus far
neglected
doing so, in consequence of the whirl of affairs
in which he had been involved.
Perhaps of all the evils which can befall a man,
poverty
,
if not the very worst, is, as society is
constructed
,
the most difficult to endure with cheerfulness, and
the most full of bitter humiliations and pains.
Sickness
has its periods of convalescence, and even guilt
of repentance and reformation. For the loss of friends
time affords relief, and religion and philosophy open
consolation. But poverty is unremitting misery,
perplexity
,
restlessness, and shame. It is the vulture of
Prometheus. It is the rock of Sisyphus. It throws
over the universal world an aspect which only the poor
can see and know. The woes of life become more
terrible, because they fall unalleviated upon the heart;
and its pleasures sicken even more than its woes as
they are beheld by those who cannot enjoy them.
The poor man in society is almost a felon. The
cold openly sneer, and the arrogant insult with
impunity
.
The very earth joins his enemies, and spreads
verdant glades and tempting woods where his foot
may never tread. The very sky, with a human
malice
,
when his fellow-beings have turned him beneath
its dome, bites him with bitter winds and drenches
him with pitiless tempests. He almost ceases to be a
man, and yet he is lower than the brute; for they are
clothed and fed, and have their dens; but the penniless
wanderer, turned with suspicion from the gate of the
noble or the thatched roof of the poor, is helplessly
adrift amid more dangers and pains than befall any
other creature.
In an instantfrom his easy stationwhen,
self-dependent
,
he could smile at Elkington, and turn his back
upon Carolan and the worldthe proud and haughty
Wyndham was reduced to utter and hopeless
destitution
.
He was literally beggared. He was worse than
beggared. He was in debt, and he saw no means of
extricating himself. One of his debts, too, was to a
man who hated and despised him, and who had shown
himself capable of insulting the more openly as he
found his victim the more defenceless. This was a
position which startled him with peculiar horror.
What was he to do? How was he to pay the
liabilities
he had contracted? How was he to leave
Berlin
?
Where was he to go? In what way was he
hereafter to maintain himself? These questions
pressed
themselves upon his mind with a fierce importunity,
resembling nothing which he had ever before
experienced
,
and producing the strangest effect upon his
thoughts and feelings.
Well, said he, pacing his room to and fro slowly,
I am then a beggar. I am a debtor. From what
cruel hand can this new blow proceed? What can it
mean? Can I live? How? With what hope of
happiness
or honour? Life to me was already deprived
of nearly every charm! What will it now become?
Had I not better have fallen beneath the aim of
Elkington
?
Had I not better, as a Roman would, leave
voluntarily the earth, where I seem to have no more a
right to dwell?
But these thoughts soon gave way to others
calmer
and more sensible.
I am in the hands of Him who can lift up and put
down at pleasure. Were suicide even right in itself,
it would not be so in me. I am a debtor. I would
rest in my grave without wronging any one of a
shilling
.
I am young, strong, and healthy. I will not be
idle. I will seek some occupation, I do not care how
toilsome or mean. The world? I have already shown
that, while I respect its honest opinions, I despise its
prejudices. Its scorn and hisses are nothing to me
when I do not deserve them. I will descend into a
lower class of life, as the taunting Carolan advised me.
I will labour, if it is at the plough. I will do anything
rather than live dependant, idle, or in debt.
Nervous and agitated by this formidable prospect,
he continued walking to and fro, endeavouring to calm
Vol. II.H
the tumult of his mind, and decide instantly upon some
future line of conduct. Many were the singular ideas
which occurred to him. He was now unable to
escape
from the assassin who pursued him so
mysteriously
.
Mrs. Denham would find the annuity he had
settled upon her stopped. He must write to her
immediately
.
What would Carolan say when he found
he had broken his promise to deposite the money?
What would the banker say on receiving news of his
protested bill? What would the few who still
defended
him in the society where he had once been so
flatteringly
received  what would they think and say
upon finding Elkington's prophecies true? That he
was an adventurer without means? Madame
Wharton
,
General St. Hillaire, Monsieur and Madame de
N, and half a dozen others, who had always
remained
kind towards him, and who even generously
and confidingly offered their intimacy with himwould
not even they now fall off? Would not the pompous
and conceited Carolan, whose mind and heart seemed
filled with egotism, to the exclusion of sense and
feeling
,
now have facts of his own to state against him?
Had he
not
broken his word? Had he not borrowed
money which he was unable to pay? Sharp was the
pang with which he revolved these thoughts; another
day passed away, we will not describe how painfully.
The next morning he determined to go forth into the
air, hoping that a walk, his favourite resource in
moments
of agitation, would cool the fever of his blood,
and suggest some more favourable view of his
prospects
.
He had taken his hat and was about leaving the
room, when a man entered. He was a chasseur of
Count Carolan's. He had known him previously, and
had remarked in him a watchful attention to his wishes,
and a profound respect almost ludicrous. There was
now a change in his manner. He came in without
knocking, slammed the door after him, and neither
took off his hat nor raised his hand as was his custom.
Monsieur le Comte sends this letter, and begs an
answer.
Claude looked at him with astonishment, then broke
the seal. As he did so, the man walked around the
room, examined the pictures upon the walls, and half
hummed a tune. The letter ran thus:
Count Carolan begs that Mr. Wyndham will give
the bearer the 50, or that he will name an hour
during
the day that he will deposite the sum at his
banker's
.
He will please to communicate with the bearer.
Do you know the contents of this letter?
demanded
Claude.
Oui, monsieur.
Tell your master I will see the banker upon the
subject in the course of the morning.
Non, monsieur. It must be done at once.
Monsieur
le Comte requested me not to leave you without
either the money, or your distinct promise to pay it at
a fixed hour to-day. Monsieur le Comte has sent to
the police also to stop your passport.
My passport! The police!
Oui, monsieur, said the man, with a smile; at
the same time arranging his cravat and collar
somewhat
affectedly.
There is something in petty insolence more difficult
to endure than in insults more pronounced. Claude
felt all his self-government necessary to restrain him
from thrusting the fellow down stairs.
I will see the banker at two this morning, said
Claude; or, if your master wishes, I will see himself.
Non, monsieur; Monsieur le Comte does not wish
to see you. He wishes you to transact business with
me.
With you?
Oui, monsieur; and he sat down upon the sofa;
and I wish you to make haste, if you please, for I
too am a little pressed. Monsieur might as well give
the money, or worse may come of it.
When your master sends a messenger whom a
gentleman can receive or a gentleman would send,
said Claude, I will return an answer.
Oh, very well, monsieur, said the man. You
mean to be impertinent, I see. I shall wait, however,
till Monsieur le Comte sends another messenger, which
he will probably do presently.
And he very coolly raised his legs upon the sofa,
and, reaching a book, opened it with the air of a young
lord looking into the last new novel.
It is said that there is an end to all things.
However
that may be respecting other matters, there was
certainly an end to Claude's patience. He grasped,
very leisurely, the fellow by the throat, and lifted him
unceremoniously to the door.
You shall give me the satisfaction of a gentleman,
you shallor I'll
post
you, said the man.
The next moment he was thrust down stairs at some
peril to his neck.
Well, said Claude, heated and indignant, I
commence my new condition well. Is it possible that
Carolan can have already heard the change in my
fortune
?
Who could tell him? What mystery
surrounds
me? What devils are sporting with my
destiny
?
He once more took his hat, but he was again
interrupted
by the waiter of the hotel.
Ah! by-the-way, said Claude, I forgot I had
rung; but did you see that fellow whom I put out of
my room just now?
Yes, said the man, bluntly.
Well, never let him enter my door again.
He's got as much right here as others, said the
man, quietly; perhaps more.
What do you mean, you scoundrel? said Claude.
Civil words, mein herr, said the man. There's
your bill!
My bill! I did not order it.
No, I suppose not.
The truth crossed his mind.
Well, put it on the table. I'll look over it.
The man went out and left the door open.
Come back, said Claude, and shut the door
after you.
The fellow turned his face, whistled, and went on
his way without paying him the slightest attention.
Ah! I forgot, thought Claude. I am poor. It
is already known. And, with a heavy heart, he made
a third attempt to walk, which was luckily successful,
though, as he went out, the landlord and waiter eyed
him a with suspicion which almost indicated an
intention
to stop him.
Sad were his thoughts as he sought once again his
favourite retreats in the
Thiergarten;
and it was
characteristic
of him, that the disappointment to which his
adversity would subject Rossi, and particularly Mrs.
Denham and Ellen, gave him much pain, even amid
his gloomy views of his own future affairs.
Embarrassment
,
humiliation, and actual want stared him in
the face.
It was deep noon as he found himself in the centre
of the wood. The Park at this hour, in the middle of
a summer day, appears like the cool abodes of the
blessed. It is almost entirely deserted by human
intruders
.
The labourers are at their toil; the
fashion-hunters
are generally abroad elsewhere at the various
watering-places in search of pleasure, and those in
town postpone their drive till the sultry heat has
given
way to the cool afternoon shadows. Scarcely any
one is seen, except some student with his book, his
long hair, unshorn beard, open collar, and velvet coat,
giving to him the appearance of an Italian of the
middle
ages; or perhaps a bronzed peasant-woman
dropping
beneath a heavy burden, or an officer riding
along the deeply-shaded avenues, his bright uniform,
nodding feather, and horse glancing through the trees.
The breath of this charming wood was cool and
fragrant
,
as its moist paths and fanciful bridges are
profusely
H 2
fringed with flowers. The little islands lay in
the motionless water fresh and green. The birds
called
to each other through the silent glades. The beak
of the woodpecker made the forest resound, and the
squirrels leaped, paused, and listened in the road; and
the swans, those most beautiful objects in creation,
when throned on the water, gave to the landscape the
air of some enchanted island, which might have
intreasured
the perennial bowers of Calypso and her
nymphs; and never, thought Claude, did the son
of Ulysses meet danger more formidable, and the dear
guide of his steps far away.
Beautiful did this calm, bright world look to Claude
on that morning; but the topics which pressed
immediately
upon him left him little leisure for his ordinary
and almost voluptuous enjoyment of nature.
Something
must be done at once; actioninstant action
was demanded. He could not, without a kind of
dishonesty
,
sleep that night in the hotel. Where was he
to sleep? He had no friend to whom he could
disclose
his new calamity; and if he had, taken in
conjunction
with all that had happened, could they
believe
him? How was he to pay his debts? How
was he to procure food for the sustenance of life?
He had a valuable wardrobe; watch, rings, diamond
pin; a horse, saddle, bridle. He thought these might
bring enough to pay Carolan, the banker in London,
and his bills in Berlin. He determined, without
hesitation
,
to sell everythingto the very coat he had on,
rather than wrong any one. He resolved to dress
himself at once in clothes befitting his new state.
He resolved to listen to no false pride or shame.
Honour, he felt, was in itself, not in the trappings
and the suits in which men too often look for it. As to
occupation, there was but one. His own taste had
rendered him a proficient in languages. He made a
wry face at it, but, before he had walked an hour he
had come to the resolution to offer himself that day as
a
teacher of English
. The smilethe sneerthe
scornful whisper of those who had predicted his
downfall
,
when they should witness it, rose before him.
But his mind was
really
brave, and the habit of
looking
to itselfand to its Maker for right, enabled him
to bear up against these painful anticipations. As for
the blow
which he had at first thought could never
leave his mindalready, in the wholesome exercise
of action, in the preparations to meet the real
exigences
and sober duties of life, he had forgotten it.
Even Ida, now that occupation had displaced idle
reveries, he regarded with cooler judgment. His love
for her was far from being abated. It was even
increased by what had happened. But it was divested
of hope. It had assumed the character of an
enchanting
dreamto sooth sometimes hereafter his solitary
momentsto compensate him for the homely cares of
lifeto be gazed at, as the mariner watches the polar
star, who, without thinking to reach it, makes it the
guide of his steps.
While pursuing these thoughts he had penetrated
into the most solitary and unfrequented recesses,
where indeed there was no regular footpath, but only
green lanes winding through thick shrubbery, and lofty
trees for the accommodation of single horsemen. He
had reached the end of his walk and was preparing to
return, when his foot struck against something heavy,
which he would have taken to be a stone but for a
peculiar
sound. He passed on for several moments, but
retraced his steps. He had even some difficulty in
discovering the spot. It was moist earth, and the long
grass and thick surrounding shrubbery showed that it
was rarely trodden by the foot of man. After feeling
about for some time with his foot, he struck the object
again. It was half buried in the ground. He picked
it up. It was a stout leathern purse, quite full. He
opened it. The contents were Louis. He sat down
and counted them. There were two hundred and
fifty. He emerged from the shadowy recess and
looked
around. Not a person was to be seen. He gazed
upward. The branches hung motionless and solitary.
Though he half expected to behold some human face
gazing on him, the wood was as hushed as at
midnight
,
except occasionally the woodpecker tapped the
hollow trunk of the beech; or an acorn fell, dropping
through the leaves; or a squirrel stood erect, listening
and starting, close to his side, as if watching against
every intruder; or the crow, which slowly floated
over him close to the tree-tops, uttered his hoarse cry.
He looked at the purse again. It was wet, mildewed,
and nearly decayed. The clasp was covered with
mould. It had possibly been monthsperhaps years
where he had found it.
He advanced towards home. A ragged man met
him. His features were bloated with intemperance.
His face was haggard, and yet vicious in its expression,
and he was almost destitute of clothing.
A penning! said he, holding out his hand.
Claude gave him a groschen. He looked at it,
surprised
at receiving so much more than he had asked
for, and went away looking back once or twice. He
little knew how near he had been to wealth. Claude
thought of the blessing which that money would be to
him and to himself, but he thought of it without
wavering
.
He knew the course of right was fixed, and
was not only the noblest, but the most advantageous
to pursue.
Elkington has accused me of dishonourable
intentions
,
he thought. I could have shot him for
the slander. But what would that prove? Here
Heaven sends me an occasion to confute the charge
by my conduct!
And, had he been about to expend the money in
pleasure, he could not have felt more impatience than
he experienced to return the new-found treasure to its
owner.
CHAPTER XIV.
On
re-entering the town, Claude cast his eyes upon
the walls, trees, and fences where public bills were
usually posted, and which he never thought of
regarding
before. There were the advertisements of
concerts
in the gardensof fireworksmenageries
theatres
auctions,
etc., etc. At length one larger than
the rest, conspicuously headed 100
thalers reward
,
met his eye. On examining it, he read as follows:
Lost, on the 1st of January, in or about the town,
a leathern purse containing 250 Louis. The finder
will receive the above reward on presenting the purse
at the
comtoir
of Monsieur Khl, No. 433 Kloster
Strasse.
The bill was blackened, weather-worn, and nearly
effaced. A part of it had been torn off by some idle
hand, and a staring new advertisement of a
Grosses
Concert
was pasted nearly over it, as a thing passed
and forgotten. Claude instantly bent his way towards
the counting-house of Monsieur Khl.
On arriving at the house, he entered the comtoir,
and found himself, after passing an antechamber, in a
large apartment filled with clerks behind high desks
and counters; he inquired for Mr. Khl, and was
asked
for his card, which the young man, after reading,
not without marks of interest, carried into his
chef
.
The young man presently returned, and desired him to
walk into a private room. Mr. Khl was writing.
He was one of the richest bankers in Berlina large,
plain-looking person, not dressed with much neatness.
One could scarcely have conceived, from his
appearance
,
that he was worth millions. He looked up and
rose, and himself handed a chair.
I have the honour of speaking to Mr. Claude
Wyndham, the gentleman lately connected with the
dreadful affair which has happened in our town, and
created such a sensation.
Claude acquiesced.
I am very happy to see you, Mr. Wyndham. Do
not blush, young man, said Mr. Khl, for Claude
coloured
at the allusion. I am the father of three sons,
as hot after gunpowder as if it were good wine; and
I have learned, with great admiration, your whole
conduct
in this affair. Don't blush, sir, to have set your
face against duelling. You have acted nobly. Every
father  every motherevery wife and child in the
universe ought to bless and support you. Such an
example is worthy a hero. Sir Walter Raleigh did
the same; and I think I have heard that Washington,
the great American soldier and statesman, did the
same. Sir, in the name of my familyin the name
of mankind, I thank you.
And the honest man, who had risen in his
enthusiasm
,
seized his hand and shook it heartily.
Sir, said Claude, I have acted according to my
conscience; and your approbation, as a stranger, is
grateful to me.
Conscience, sir? I'm glad to find a man of your
appearance, and moving in your exalted rank of life,
has one. The young folks of the day generally are
without it. Egad, their corsets are laced so tight that
there isn't room for it.
And he laughed loudly at his humour.
I shall always be too proud if Mr. Wyndham will
honour me by a visit; my wife and daughters want
to see you. You are prayed for in our family. You
have saved bloodshed.
I? Indeed, sir!
My son has met you somewhere, and, it seems,
has a great esteem for you. I don't wonder, sir;
egad! now I look at you, I don't wonder. Well, sir,
this young whipper-snapperhe's only nineteenmust
get into a quarrel with another blockhead. My boy
was
struck
swords were chosen  the ground was
selectedand the young fools would have cut each
other's ears and noses off as sure as fate, if Madame
Wharton had not happened to come in. I'm her
banker
,
sir. She visits our familyGod bless her! and a
noble creature she is. She gave us your history, sir.
My son heard how you had borne a blowpassing it
over with the contempt it merited rather than commit
a crime. It made a deep impression on himfor the
boy has a soul. He went to his adversary, and told
him he had come to exchange apologies. They did
so, and are now the best friends possible. One bold
example goes far, particularly with the young. Let
a few more men like you thus discountenance
duelling
,
and it will fall into the hands of vulgar
black-guards
and cutthroats, where alone it deserves to be
sanctioned. Sir, I honour you; and if ever I can serve
you in any way, command me to any extent. My house
my purse are at your service.
I have not come to take purses to-day, but to give
them, said Claude, whom this narration had restored
to a part of his natural ease and gayety of manner.
You are named as the person to receive a large
sum of gold lost in January.
Well, sir!
Here it is.
Why, where on earth did you light upon it?
I found it this morning in the Park.
By Heaven! you know not what you've done.
He seized his hat. You shall take a walk with me.
It is not far. I will show you something which will
repay your trouble.
Claude began to think the old gentleman was crazy,
from the rapidity with which he went puffing and
blowing
along through the streets, muttering half-uttered
exclamations of impatience and joy.
Here we are, said Monsieur Khl.
They stopped before a little, low, poor-looking
house in Frederic Strasse. Monsieur Khl hurried
up to the fifth story and knocked. The door was
opened
by a little old lady, neatly dressed, but with a pale
countenance. Nothing could be more scanty than the
furniture of the room. Upon a mean bed, lay the
form of another femalean invalidand a little
poorly-clothed
child sat on the floor, eating a piece of dry,
black bread.
Come in! come up! ha! ha! ha! Mon Dieu!
I've brought a visiter. Come up, monsieur.
The little old lady courtesied with an air of good
breeding, which strangely contrasted with the
poverty-stricken
appearance of the things around her.
Pray be seated, said she, handing the two broken
chairs.
I want you to relate to this monsieur your history,
said Mr. Khl. Be brief, for he's a hard-hearted dog,
and won't bear any amplifications.
The old lady looked rather surprised.
I really don't know, said she, in French, why I
should trouble monsieur with miseries which he
Nach! obey me, said Monsieur Khl. Tell it.
I am sure it will amuse him. He's extremely fond of
tragedy.
I do not know what you mean, said the old lady;
but I know you are my only friend, Mr. Khl, and I
shall comply.
And in the very fewest words possible, added
Khl.
Well, then, we are two poor sisters. Our parents
were rich, but lost all their fortune, and then their lives.
We had one sister. She was governess in the family
of a Russian nobleman. For twenty years we scarcely
heard anything of her, till one day the news arrived of
her death. She had amassed, sir, a considerable sum,
about 250 louis-d'ors. We were old and destitute, and
she had consigned this money on her dying bed to a
servant of her patron, who had permission to travel.
He brought it to Berlin, and here he
lost it
so at least
he says. His master had reason to believe that he had
gambled it away, and he is at this instant in Siberia.
This has been the last we ever heard of our little
property
;
my poor surviving sister is an invalid, and we
are struggling along with as much resignation as
possible
.
There is your money! said Khl. Hand it out,
Mr. Wyndham.
And it was with a sincere feeling of satisfaction that
Claude laid the purse upon the table.
Count them, said Mr. Khl.
She did so.
There are 250.
Now you are happy, and independent for life.
And that poor innocent being in Siberia! said she.
Tears came to the eyes of the desolate little old
lady, and the invalid half rose in her bed to gaze.
There is a reward, you know, said Khl.
Not a cent, said Claude. I would not mingle
this pleasure with any interested feeling for the world.
I thought as much, said Khl.
Who are you, sir? said the lady, turning to
Claude.
No matter. I will come and see you again
by-and-by
.
In the mean time, you had better let Mr.
Khl take charge of your new-found prize, for it would
not be pleasant to lose it again.
CHAPTER XV.
The
mightiest changes which take place in the
human
heart affect but little the outward world, and
revolutions
of the affairs of an individual interrupts but
slightly the order of affairs. The
societ
of Berlin, as
well as a large part of the people, went to Spandow to
behold the mock seige of that fortress. Claude had
Vol. II.I
determined to take no notice of the late occurrence
which had so materially altered his condition, and not
to
shrink
from being seen from any false shame. He
determined to see this interesting military festival, and
to mount his horse for the last time before he sold him.
He therefore rode out with the crowdcarriages full
of ladies and gentlemen, royal equipages, and
thousands
of equestrians and pedestrians: it was a general
fte
. When he reached Spandow, he left his horse at
an inn and ascended the ramparts. The scene was
already
beginning to be animated. Large bodies of troops
were disposed for defence upon the walls, and at the
windows of the houses overlooking the ramparts,
amounting to about twenty thousand; as many more
were also disposed before the walls preparatory to the
attack. For a long time crowds of spectators came
thronging into the town. Claude secured a very good
place on the ramparts, surrounded by troops,
bombshells
,
cannons, etc.
As he stood here, with a group of gentlemen,
awaiting
the opening of the attack, a young man of genteel
address, but whom he had never met in society,
addressed
him in French.
This is a very pretty scene, sir. We shall have
a good view as we stand.
Claude replied politely, and the stranger was
pleased
to continue the conversation.
Do you reside in Berlin? inquired the young man.
I am a traveller, said Claude. I have been in
Berlin during the winter.
I hope you like our metropolis.
Very much.
Have you been much in society?
Yes, a good deal.
It is very brilliant, I believe.
Very.
Pray, were you acquainted with the parties in the
late affair which has made so much noise?
What affair? asked Claude.
The duel and the
poltroonerie
of this Mr.
Wyndham
.
Yes, I know the parties.
Then, sir, you can perhaps give me some
information
upon a subject which is so generally talked of
in all circles. Elkington, they say, castigated
Wyndham
,
who dared not take up the quarrel, and who had
been caught cheating at cards.
I heard no such report, said Claude, quietly, but
shocked to find how little justice he could expect from
common fame.
There was a dreadful fracas. Lord Elkington
caught Wyndham with marked cards, and horse
whipped
him.
No, no, said another gentleman, standing near,
it wasn't cheating at cards, but the fellow was
impertinent
to a young countess whom Lord Elkington
has come over here to marry, and Elkington
challenged
him. He was a great coward, as any one must
be, sir, you know, to offer a rudeness to a lady; and,
finding no other means available, Elkington tweaked
his nose, kicked him down stairs, and afterward
horsewhipped
him. Pray, sir, were you there?
I was.
Did you witness the affair?
I did.
Then do tell us something about it. They say
this Mr. Wyndham took as sound a drubbing as
possible
,
without the slightest resistance.
Why, what a sneaking rascal! said the first.
That Elkington is a fine fellow. He drives a
splendid
turn-out. I've often seen him in the Park. He's
a capital fellow, and perfectly the gentleman.
He must be, said the other. I wish to
goodness
I
had been there. It must have been very
amusing
.
Pray tell us exactly how it was.
Why, I fear I shall have to spoil your story, said
Claude, smiling. But, if you wish, I will state the
circumstances as far as I can gather the truth.
Dopray do. I've been these several days
running
about trying to get an authentic statement. I do
like to see these explosions in high life. They're
capital. Do tell us
Lord Elkington, said Claude, attacked a
gentleman
who was from principle opposed to duelling,
and who had openly and often declared his
determination
never to fight
Well, that showed he was a coward at once, said
the young man.
To be sure it did, said the other. For what
reason could a man have for not fighting a duel but
cowardice?
Certainly, said the other. He must be a
contemptible
rascal.
The gentleman had been guilty of no wrong,
continued
Claude, but that of exposing a very dishonest
trick of Elkington, and the latter gentleman struck
him
Struck him? Well, after thathe had to fight,
then?
No, he declined; and, being of a peculiar mode
of thinking on the subject of duelling, he rather
preferred
to bear even
a blow
than to deviate from what
he thought the path of right
Ah, bah! rejoined the other. You may depend,
he is an infamous coward. A man who talks about
`principle,' and `virtue,' and `conscience,' and such
trash when he is
struck
, you may be sure is a
sneaking
sort of fellow. What! take a blow? Why that's
what no gentleman would do, sir, under any
circumstance
,
right or wrong. If any one struck
me
, I would
shoot him, and never after feel sorrow for it. I would
I would indeed. I would, sir, upon my honour.
Wouldn't you, Bob?
Certainly would I, said Bob. A man that
would stand a blow would stand a kickand a man
that would stand a kick would stand having his nose
tweakedand a man that would stand having his nose
tweaked must be a blackguard, and can't be a
gentleman
for
what but cowardice
could
keep a man from
fighting when he had been
struck
and had his nose
tweaked?
Ah, there's the question. I agree with you
exactly
.
Claude moved a little away. There were a number
of ladies and gentlemen standing around. Some of
them he knew. They bowed to him coolly, and
regarded
him with curiosity. Once he heard a lady
whisper to a young companion, There, that's he!
and another lady touched her friend's shoulder, and
whispered, The person that was horsewhipped the
other night by Lord Elkington.
And several lovely faces were turned towards him
with curiosity and derision.
As he stood, some time after, with his back turned
to a group of young ladies, he heard them talking of
the affair, which he perceived had excited universal
attention.
Oh, good Lord! said one, little aware that they
were within hearing of the object of their remarks,
what a strange person he must be!
Oh, Dieu! If I were a gentleman, I would rather
be killed! said another.
He will never be able to look any one in the face
again, added a third.
I was on the stairs the whole time, said another.
Papa had just called us down; and we were stopped
by the crowd, and then I stood and saw it all.
Oh, I wish I had seen it; it must have been very
interesting.
Oh, yes it was, very, I assure you. Lord
Elkington
is so brave. He went up to Mr. Wyndham, and
called him all sorts of names. Why, if he had done so
to
me
, I couldn't have helped boxing his ears to save
my life. He said he was a rascala cowardand all
sorts of things.
And what did Mr. Wyndham do then? Didn't he
draw his sword?
I 2
No, poor man; he was so extremely afraid, he
didn't say a word.
Ah, poor fellow! cried the rest.
And here was a general laugh.
Well, that is exceedingly funny. Pray go on.
Then Mr. Wyndham said he couldn't fight a duel,
and Lord Elkington walked up to him and struck him.
I screamed right out. I thought I should have died
with fright.
Well, what then? I
wish
I had been there. It
must have been so exceedingly interesting.
Oh, it was, I assure you. It was as good as a play.
Go ongo on.
Well, then, after he had struck Mr. Wyndham, and
kicked him about a little, till he was out of breath,
poor Mr. Denham ran up, and called Lord Elkington
a villain, and then Elkington struck him too; and Mr.
Wyndham stood by all the time, and never said a word.
The horrid wretch!
Then poor Mr. Denham half drew his sword. He
was just going to kill Elkington, and I was just going
to faint, when out jumped little old General Le Beau,
and Mr. Denham went away. And the next morning
he was shot dead.
And Mr. Wyndham never did anything about it?
Never. Only think how horrid!
Didn't shoot him?
No.
Isn't it ridiculous? What a pity Mr. Wyndham
is such a coward?he is such a handsome fellow.
Oh,
I
never could endure him.
How can you say so, Emily? He is the most
beautiful
young man I ever saw; so tallso nobleoh,
Heaven! what a pity he's such a coward.
Dear me, said the first, look behind you.
There was a moment of deep silence, and then they
all tripped away to another place, with a very
unsuccessful
attempt to suppress their laughter.
Claude quietly kept his position. Presently a group
of young men came by. He knew them all. Like
everybody else, they were talking of him.
Well, I say, said one, no gentleman, whatever
may be his principles, has a
right
to go in the face of
society. If he's right, we're wrong. It's as much as
to say we're ruffians.
Certainly! said another.
I don't think so, said a third. I find something
noble in a man's adhering to his principles, whatever
they are. They say any religion is better than none;
and I say any principles are better than none.
Ah, bah! cried a gruff voice, it's all stuff; the
fellow's a coward, and takes this method to conceal it.
I've no respect for a man who will not fight. He's a
cowardand
a blow
, too! ah, bah!
Oh, don't talk to me of principle. No one can be
a gentleman
Yes, who can stand a blow? demanded another.
Sir Walter Raleigh had a fellow spit in his face,
and he did not return it, said the advocate of Claude,
though rather feebly.
Very well for Sir Walter Raleigh said the other.
But why,
why
, said the voice of Lavalle, who
now spoke up for the first time, why is that
magnanimous
in Sir Walter Raleigh which is the reverse in
Wyndham?
I
find him a noble fellow. In my
opinion
no
offence to any onehe is the bravest man I
ever saw, and a man of high character and superior
genius. I never saw anything so splendidly done as
the manner he took the blow. I saw he did not
really
believe that Elkington would go so far after what he
had said. He started aghastand I thought he would
have torn him limb from limb. Elkington was no
coward, but he quailed himself before Wyndham's eye.
I believe he
would
have killed him on the first impulse
had he not been held. Talk of that man's being afraid,
indeed! How calmlyhow noblyhow beautifully
his mind has quieted, and put down the fiery passions
in his breast. I love that man. He is too noble for
this age. I would rather have his friendship than that
of any one's I ever saw!
Well, well, perhaps so; he did look like the devil
when he caught it. I'll do him the justice to say that.
You may depend upon it, messieurs, he's a very
fine fellow, said Lavalle.
Well, I don't think so, exclaimed another. I
think, after all his cant about principle and religion, a
man who takes
a blow
is  must be a coward. A
blow, you see, gentlemen, is a devilish serious thing.
It'saadd serious thing. It's, as one may say,
the devil.
So it is, said another. I would take anything
but a blow.
Or a kick, cried one.
Or a tweak by the nose, said another.
These are insults which
ought
to be paid for with
blood
.
That is the creed among gentlemen, said another.
But, said Lavalle, these things depend upon
one's character and mode of thinking. Honour is in
the mind, and the disgrace of a blow is conditional.
If one receives it passively because one is
afraid
to
resent it, then certainly a blow is a disgrace of the last
extremity; but if one receives it, and refuses to seek
the ordinary redress from a pure principle, because he
believes that an intellectual man and a Christian ought
to suffer any outward indignity rather than violate the
law of God
, I say that man is a character of the
noblest
order; and, just in the proportion in which he
shocks the prejudices of mankind, and exposes himself
to ridicule, misinterpretation, and odium, just in that
proportion his abstaining from the vulgar mode of
vengeance
is grand and brave; and, since we are created
in the image of our Maker, it should be our object to
think and act like him.
There was a silence of a few moments; Claude
had already wished to escape the impropriety of
listening
,
but he was confined within a narrow compass
by the crowd and the troops, and it was impossible for
him to avoid it.
The conversation was resumed by Thomson, who
said,
In my opinion, Mr. Wyndham is a
good-for-nothing
fellow.
Yes, he's a fool, said a gruff voice; even if he's
not a coward, he is a fool for putting himself in a
position
so awkward and equivocal.
I
am no coward
neither, continued the gruff voice. Egad, I'm not
afraid of either Elkington or the world;
but
, from mere
motives of policy,
I
wouldn't draw the eyes of all
mankind
on meas the moral person who was kicked
as the religious gentleman who was knocked down
as the man of principle who got his nose tweaked.
There was here a general laugh.
Now suppose I were as much of a wag as I chose
to be, and wanted some sport! Why, what would I
do, you see? Why, the first time I saw my moral
gentleman in a coffee house, I'd walk me up to him,
with a `Good-evening to you, sir,' and give him a kick.
I'd then take an ice or two, and, before I took my leave,
what would I do? Why, just walk me up to him
again, and fetch his nose a tweak, with, `Adieu,
monsieur
,
au revoir!' Well, what's he to do to this?
Nothing
;
he can't fighthe won't strike. Egad, every
mischievous schoolboy might give him a kicking on
their way to schoolevery garon at a restaurant's
might cuff his earsthere's no living with such
principles
.
That's very true, said Thomson.
If we were in Heavenah!why, very well; but
we aint.
No, certainly not, said Thomson.
Nor likely to besome of us! said Lavalle.
No, said Thomson; and here again there was a
general laugh.
Well, I'll answer to that, said Lavalle, that
the wag who should strike a man wantonly, merely
because
he was secure against retaliation, and that man
one who refrained from taking personal vengeance out
of respect to the laws, society, and religion, would be
a scoundrel so despicable, that I, for one, would not
associate with him, nor frequent the company he keeps.
Against such a person the laws would interfere, and
probably he would find himself in a prison before long.
I begin to think with Wyndham, that men who grope
about for ages in darkness, till some superior being
shows the way out of it, only want a few resolute
persons
of undoubted courage and honour to
set their
faces against duelling
, and to surrender to the laws
the charge of punishing personal assaults as well as
all kinds of insults, to render duelling unfashionable
and boxing vulgar. What a world of misery would
then be saved to societywhat widows' and orphans'
tears and groans!
But society would become a pack of fellows
without
chivalry, without honour, and men would spit in
each other's faces with impunity.
No. Where, among the leaders of society, and
particularly among
women
, the duellist was looked
upon as the
thief
now is, and he who had even dared
stirred on by his vulgar and blind passionsto
desecrate
God's holy image with a blow, would be
considered
as base as the destroyer of female innocence, or
the blasphemer of God himself; then, instead of brute
force, mechanical steadiness of hand and practice of
the eyeinstead of vile, undiscriminating vengeance
and beastly fury, all the differences of men would be
referred to tribunals, and the inevitable evils which
might be detected in such a state of things would be
only incidental to mortal affairs
But such unresenting men would be trampled on
by some one.
No. Who strikes a woman?
Ah, but that's different thingthat's disgraceful.
But why? Because it is the custombecause she
does not fight.
But would you make women of us all? said the
gruff voice.
If you must be either women or brutes, yes, said
Lavalle, quickly.
The booming cannon, which had for some time been
heard at times and in the distance, now approached and
shook the air at shorter intervals, and the besiegers
advancing, directed a heavy fire against the part of the
walls where Claude stood. It was immediately
returned
;
and cannon, musketry, bombs, and all the
dreadful machinery of war filled the air with fire and
smoke, and caused the earth to tremble. The tumult
and roar became at once so general as to cut short all
conversation.
In the confusion which reigned everywhere, he was
several times in contact with his old acquaintances, of
whom some were affable as usual, but by far the
greater
part were cold, and many pretended not to recognise
him in the least. Among them he saw the Carolans.
None of their party perceived him but Ida. Her eyes
met his a moment as he passed. They were full of
gravity and sadness, but he made no attempt to offer
her any token of recognition, but followed the example
she had set, and they parted thus coldly and in silence.
A short time afterward he found himself nearly alone.
The crowd of soldiers had been repulsed by the
assailants
,
who had gained an entrance in the fort, but had
succeeded in rallying, and were driving them back in
their turn. Claude did not follow them. His heavy
heart took no share in this animated and beautiful
spectacle
,
which presented a perfect counterpart of a fierce
battle, every spot being crowded with combatants, and
even the very windows and house-tops pouring forth
their sheets of fire and smoke; whose heavy masses,
rolling slowly through the air, rendered the striking
scene only dimly visible here and there. He leaned
against a post which had been lifted at some distance
from the present scene of action, which was nearly
hidden from him by the volumes of smoke; and he was
conscious of the wish, that, instead of a mock battle,
the wild uproar raging around was a real conflict.
Perhaps, then, he thought, some ball might end
a life which seems doomed to humiliation and sorrow,
or at least I should have an opportunity, by mingling
in its dangers, to forget the events that are pressing
me into the dust.
It was one of those thoughts which sometimes come
across the most sensible mind in a moment of idleness
and despondency. As if for affording him an
opportunity
to test its sincerity, a whizzing sound in the air
caught his ear, and, at the same instant, a sharp shock
struck the post within a few feet of his head. On
examining
it, with surprise he perceived that a bullet had
lodged in it. Greatly startled at an occurrence which
he concluded to be purely accidental, he sprang back,
without any remnant of the desire which had just been
so inopportunely realized; but that the shot was not
the result of chance was immediately made manifest,
for another ball whizzed by his ear, and struck a large
stone on the bank beside which he was standing.
Appalled
with a mysterious horror, he looked in the
direction
from which this dark attempt had proceeded.
Through the smoke he could just see a line of houses,
the outskirts of the old town within the walls, from the
upper windows of each of which the troops were
pouring
a rapid discharge of musketry, although not in the
direction in which he was standing.
CHAPTER XVI.
It
was night when Claude reached his hotelamid
all his troubles, happy in the consciousness that they
were incurred without wrong on his own part, and
delighted
with the happiness he had been the means of
communicating to the poor old lady, and the acquittal
which he had caused to the innocent stranger.
There is a pretty company waiting for you up
stairs, said the waiter who had presented the bill.
A pretty company?
Oui, monsieur. Very pretty. Keh! don't be
impatient
.
They be not run away.
At a loss to conceive to what this impertinence
referred
,
he mounted to his room. In the little
antechamber
sat three persons, of whom one was a youth
dressed in a very pretending way. The other was a
plain-looking man; the third an athletic person of forty.
His uncommon stature, brawny hands, and broad
shoulders
gave token of great muscular strength. Each had
a bill in his hand, and each stepped up to him at once
and handed their accounts. They were messengers
from a tailor, a livery-stable keeper, and a barber. The
latter was he whose toilet had at first made upon him
the impression of a young nobleman, with his long
mustache, his carefully dressed hair, his elegant clothes,
the whiteness and delicacy of his hands, and the
general
imitation of a person of rank. His bill was for
soap, perfumes, brushes, honing razors, cutting hair,
and numerous other matters. It amounted to 20
thalers
.
The coach bill, and that for keeping the
saddle-horse
,
amounted to the more serious sum of 100
thalers
;
while the tailor held out a rechnung, at the
bottom of which a total of 290 thalers stared him in
the face. Perhaps few novel-writers could subject
their hero to a crisis so unromantic, but they could
scarcely lead him into one more disagreeable.
Haunted
castles, blood-stained floors, and gliding spectres,
with all the paraphernalia of Mrs. Radcliffe's or
Maturin's
stories, would have been more tolerable to Claude
than these three bills of paper at the present moment.
The idea of being in debt mastered his fortitude. It
was precisely the thing for which the consciousness of
virtue offered no consolation, and wisdom and
philosophy
no remedy. He could neither advance, stand still,
nor retreat. He could neither tell the truth nor remain
silent; and the intruders, who had thus early come,
Vol. II.K
like ominous seabirds before a storm, to give him a
melancholy foretaste of poverty, were not long in
discovering
his confusion; and their manners changed at
once from their usual exuberant respect to mingled
astonishment and insolence. There are few men who
look upon a
debtor
but as in some degree their
property
.
Pecuniary responsibility generally breaks al
tiesabsolves from all courtesyraises the creditor
to the eminence of a despot, and often inspires him
with the desire of exercising the arbitrary power of
one. The helpless debtor must be suspected, accused,
insulted in silence. The attacks of others are
unsupported
by self-approbation and the natural
independence
of a
man
. He is a slave, chained to be spit upon
by the angry and laughed at by the unfeeling; and his
own heart, alas! joins his enemies, and pleads against
him.
You must come in next day after to-morrow, said
Claude.
Ah, keh! said the barber. Diable, monsieur!
Do you believe I have nothing to do but run after
afternon, monsieur!
You are going to quit Berlin, said the groom.
No, upon my honour.
Ah, keh! honour!diable!when you don't pay
your debts! said the barber, putting on his hat,
knocking
it down over his eyes, and thrusting his hands into
his trousers pockets.
I assure you, said Claude, quietly, I do not
mean to leave Berlin.
That's a lie, monsieur, said the groom. Your
passport has been stopped, or you would have been off
before now.
Claude stepped towards the last speaker, and was
going to put him out of the room, when he reflected
that the man knew no better, and that, alas! he had
some cause to think as he spoke. He paused, with a
shame and incertitude which the debtor must often feel.
You are a very impudent fellow, said he.
Eh, bah! said the barber; a pretty gentleman!
awhhonour! ha! ha! ha! Voila! monsieur.
There's my bill; I don't stir till it's paid.
The tailor's man now stepped up.
Mr. Wyndham, can you give
me
the money or any
security?
No.
Well, sir, you are aswindler, sir! and, if I had
you in a field, I'd give you the soundest drubbing you
ever had in your life. Mind, sir, I warn you, the first
time I meet you in the street, I'lla gentleman, indeed!
an adventurer! I've half a mind
The man shook his huge fist so near his face that it
touched his nose.
There are few men who could avoid plunging into
a brawl upon such provocation, and fewer novelists
who would have the hardihood, in spite of the
prejudices
of the age, to represent a patient sufferer of such
opprobrious terms and insulting actions. But Claude's
mind was high, calm, and reflective; and it is one of
the blessings of great sacrifices that they render minor
ones more easy. Claude, who had borne
a blow
from
the hand of a
gentleman
, under the most aggravated
circumstances which could attend such a humiliating
infliction, saw nothing to drive him from his balance
in the brutality of uneducated and coarse men, in the
exercise of what they deemed their duty, and who
would have been much better pleased with him had he
been imprudent enough to put himself on a level with
them by commencing a collision. He said, therefore,
without passion,
My good friends, I owe you money. I am unable
to pay you at present, in consequence of a misfortune.
You have your remedy, if you think it worth adopting.
I shall not leave Berlin, andyou must take your
course.
His calmness appeared to puzzle the men, and even
to abate the indignation of all, except the barber. So
true it is that a mild word turneth away wrath.
You must be aware, monsieur, said the tailor,
that 290 thalers is a large sum to lose for a poor,
hard-working man like mewith a large family, too.
Indeed, said Claude, I will do all in my power
to prevent your losing it. I shall not leave Berlinbe
assured I shall not; and you should remember that,
in using the language of insult towards me, you are
condemning me before you know whether I deserve it.
Eh, keh! diable! said the barber;
laissez nous!
Have you any prospect of ever paying me? asked
the tailor.
No, frankly, said Claude, in money; I have not,
at least, any certain prospect. I am totally ruined;
but I shall do my best to prevent any one's losing;
and, moreover, the greater part of the clothes you have
made for me are in that wardrobe; you may take them
if you will, this moment.
The man seemed as much surprised by the
beginning
as by the end of this reply. He answered with
greater respect,
Well, I will take the clothes.
It is but just you should, said Claude.
And, opening the wardrobe, he laid out the whole
contents of his wardrobe, much of which was scarcely
worn, besides the court suit, which our poor
fortune-hunted
traveller did not see thus pass away without a
sigh over the brilliant associationsthe royal halls
the midnight suppersthe delightful dinnersand the
hours spent in company of one he was now, perhaps,
never to see again, which it conjured up.
The man swung them on his shoulders, and with an
awkward bow went away.
Claude then sat down and wrote an order for the
horse.
For you, said he to the groom, you can take
your master this. It is my authority to sell the horse,
and indemnify himself, as far as possible, for the loss
I have occasioned him.
The man took it and also went away.
Et moi, monsieur! said the barber, folding his
arms insolently, and standing close to Claude with his
feet a yard apart.
There is your money, said Claude; write me
a receipt.
The man did so. The money was, by a curious
chance, the very last groschen he had in the world.
There was even a penningthe smallest coin
deficient
.
Monsieur, there is wanting a penning, said the
man.
I have no more.
I can change a bill, said the barber.
I have no bill, said Claude.
Eh! keh! said the little dandy. It appears,
monsieur, that I am just in time. Ha! ha! ha!
parbleu
!
Au revoir, mon cher!
Well, now I am at the worst.
But he was not at the worst. Poverty never is; low
as it may be, there is always a chosen step lower in
humiliation and misery. It is at the worst only in the
grave.
Ah, Ida! thought he, little do you dream, amid
your stately grandeur
His reflection was cut short.
The door opened without a knock, and a stranger
entered. He had under his arm a large package of
papers. He was followed by a seconda polite little
man, plainly dressed; behind him stood two more
stout, rough, grave-looking fellows, each with a large
club; and in the shadow of the corridor, half seen, stood
yet a fifth, whose stature and proportion were greater
than those of his companions, and who also leaned
silently
upon a heavy cane. Claude started at this
apparition
.
I beg your pardon, said the first. I have come
to arrest you, at the suit of Count Carolan, for 50.
It is not possible! said Claude.
I am very sorryit is a most painful dutybut it
is
a duty, and my instructions arepositive.
K 2
There must be some mistake, said Claude.
Certainly Count Carolan would notcould not
I beg your pardonI received his commands in
person, said the polite man. I am his lawyer. I
hope you will excuse us; but you know, my dear sir,
our profession has its unpleasant featuresand in this
we are but the mere instruments of another.
And where must I go?
To the debtor's jail in  street.
Why, I have been told
that
is the receptacle for
the refuse of the town, said Claude, drawing back
with considerable alarm. There is a more
respectable
prison?
Unfortunately, that is full.
But there is a mode, said Claude, by which I
may be arrested differentlyby which I may be
guarded
in a separate room.
These are privileges reserved only for people of a
certain standing in society.
ButI said Claude, my positionI was
assured
my
claim to belong to that class
So we thought, said the lawyer; but Count
Carolan refused to listen to it. He said you did not
belong to that class, and had no claim to the privileges
of
une personne distingue
.
I am ready, said Claude.
Will monsieur like me to call a
droskey?
said
one of the men.
Yes, certainlyno, said Claude, remembering he
was penniless.
The sturdy bailiffs, shouldering their clubs,
surrounded
him, and he passed into the street. As he left the
door of his hotel a splendid equipage drove by, the
coachman and two chasseurs in the richest livery. He
recognised the carriage of Carolan. The count
himself
was in it, with Ida. He caught a rapid glance at
her face as they dashed by. They were probably
going to a ball. Perhaps it might have been from the
light of the street-lamps, but the face of Ida appeared
sad and pale.
Go on, fair and sweet girl, thought Claude; thou
to the bright haunts of pride and pleasureI to prison
and despair.
He went on his way to the prison, envying the
meanest
of the careless crowd about him, who, whatever
were their privations, had at least their freedom. He
passed by many a gay-lighted shop, full of people
many a
caf
, where young officers and
legans
were
sipping their cream or coffee. He passed the
theatre
its
windows lightedand the armed horseman
stationed in the middle of the street before the door,
guarding the votaries of pleasure from any interruption.
Some of the passengers were hastening by, humming;
the little boys, as if prisons and miseries had no
existence
,
were shouting in their careless sports;
laughter
and music met his ears; and the very barking of
the dog had in it something careless, something free,
which contrasted mournfully with his situation. Once
a sudden melody from a band of wind instruments broke
from a neighbouring street. Softplaintiveslow,
it swelled upon the air till he passed close to the
musicians
,
who retreated behind him, their sweet strains
dying away like the last relic of happinessand of the
world. His way lay through the
Schloss
, that vast
and gloomy pile, whose immense courts, towering
walls, and heavy sculpture impressed the mind with
a vague sense of horror and grandeur. A part of it
was white in the moonlight, while its broad angles and
massive buttresses threw the rest into black shadows.
Often had he lingered amid these stately courts,
touched
with their huge and solemn character, and many
an hour had fleeted away in their gorgeous apartments.
The guards paced to and fro before the arches and
along the balconies. Several domestics in the royal
livery were passing formally across the broad and
worn pavement. A carriage, easily distinguishable as
that of one of the royal family, was drawn up at the
foot of a broad flight of stone stairs. So susceptible
was Claude to picturesque beauty in the common
scenes of life, that he paused to gaze with a kind of
pleasant awe at these high-towering walls, crowned
with statues, and their dark irregular summits marked
along the skyand the starsthe moonthe all that
was visible above through the few filmy clouds,
drifting
with a soft, silent motion, apparently close along
the high roofs. He forgot that he was a captive as
his eye measured these lofty walls.
Allons, monsieur, allons, said one of the men,
touching his shoulder slightly with his extended
fingers
,
we have no time to lose.
And he proceeded on his course, without again
looking
around or above till he reached the prison.
The building was a large, dark-looking edifice of
great extent. The windows were in the shadow, but
the grated bars were distinguishable, and their lower
parts were strongly boarded up. One look around at
the broad square, of which this receptacle formed the
prominent featureat the shoreless, tranquil,
ever-bright
heavensand the door was opened with a
clanking
noise of chains and bolts, was shut again with the
same ominous sounds, and he was within the walls of
a
jail
. His reflections on entering it were not
rendered
less gloomy by the consciousness that he was there
for a just debt, which he scarcely believed it would
ever be in his power to pay. His conductors led him,
with a sinking heart, into a low, smoked room, dimly
lighted by a tallow candle. There were some white
pine-board furniture, consisting of desks, dirty
engravings
,
&c. Here they demanded his money. He had
none. They required to search him. He submitted.
The man exchanged a few trivial remarks upon
matters
in no way connected with him, and had one or two
jokes about something which had happened during the
day, and at which they laughed heartily. In the midst
of these a new face appeared with a large key. It
was that of his jailer. He was an athletic man with
a good-humoured countenance.
Bon soir, monsieur, said he. Allons, you must
come with me.
He led the way up one flight of naked, desolate
stairs; long, dismal corridors stretched from the
landing-place
on either hand. They mounted yet another
flight. Things here looked even more dismal. The
air was close and fetid, and impregnated with
sickening
odours, among which the fumes of bad tobacco
were pre-eminent. He followed his new masteras a
felonto a door, from which he withdrew the bolts,
and which he then unlocked. The massive key
turned
twice with a clanking spring ere the last barrier
between
poverty and the happy world was passed, and
Claude found himself in a filthy and extremely
bad-smelling
apartment, crowded with unhappy wretches,
the smoke of a just extinguished candle filling his
throat and nostrils. A dozen common straw beds lay
on the floor, each belonging to a prisoner. It was
eleven at night. The men, although they had
evidently
been upand Claude detected near the candle the
end of a pack of dirty cards thrust hastily beneath
some clothesmade a great parade of rising and
putting
on their clothes. One said, Light the candle;
another, Where's the phosphorus? and presently
their candle was again lighted and their garments put
on.
Good. Here you are at last! said the jailer,
with a benevolent smile; and then withdrawing, he
closed the door and doubly locked it, the whole
company
shaking their fingers at him, with many
expressions
of derision or rage, as he disappeared. All was
now curiosity among the prisoners. They gathered
around the new-comer with a freedom and a
familiarity
which he knew not how to avoid as little as to
endure
.
His tall, noble formhis air of good-breeding
and affluencethe elegance of his dress, created as
great a sensation as that produced by Gulliver when
found by the Lilliputians. At length one of them came
up to him, and asked, with marks of curiosity,
Are you here for
debt?
Yes.
Have you got any money? demanded another.
No.
But how are you arrested at this time of night?
That's not legal, said a second.
No, indeed, rejoined a third.
And then they drew up together in a corner, and
held a kind of council of war, canvassing the cruelty
and illegality of such a measure, and declaring that he
would be out to-morrow. In the mean time, one
took his hat and another his gloves. One offered to
make teaanother proposed coffee; and,
notwithstanding
his attempts to withdraw himself from such
friendly
obligations, one of his companions had a spirit-lamp
lighted, and by the aid of some hot water, and in an
old, broken, dirty teapot, with three or four leaves of
bad tea, boiled for ten minutes, he presently produced
what he was pleased to offer as a good, strong cup
of tea.
Claude took it and attempted to drink. It seemed
a type of his bitter and mean destiny, and he felt that
he could not too soon begin to accustom himself to the
loathsome draught. Besides, he was reluctant to
offend
the unhappy beings who, however rude and
different
from the polished companions of his past hours,
seemed, at least kind in their intentions. They were
coarse, vulgar, and repulsive, but alas! they were all
the friends he had left. A vacant bed of straw was
pointed out to him as that he was to occupy. Before
they retired he found great differences in their
character
.
One was a dissolute knave in every word and
action, and he was the most familiar with him. Another
was really kind, and comparatively disinterested. The
rascal (who one of them whispered had once before
been in another prison for robbery) approached him,
and joined him as he walked up and down the narrow
floor. He told him, in a few words, how the prisoners
lived. They had two meals a day, handed up in large
pails. The coarsest, cheapest food which could
support
life. They had one hour a day to exercise in a
kind of court a few yards square, itself full of putrid
odours. The light was to be put out every night at
ten. All friends coming to visit them were to pay at
the door two and a half groschen. Some of the
prisoners
were here for fifteen cents; and whoever
remained
a
year
, had the right to go out at the end of that
period, and could not again be confined for the same
debt.
Now I, said the man, have come here of my
own accord. They dunned me to death at home; so
I've come here to spend my year like a gentleman,
and thenkeh! I'm free as the best of 'em. Pooh!
don't be down-hearted, my buck! it's nothing when
you are once a little used to it. We smokeplay
cardssmuggle in our bottle of rumand live like the
king. Look here, said he, and he opened a kind of
brown paper coffer full of pipes, cheese, black bread,
bottles, tallow candles, tobacco, and half-smoked
segars
.
Here is some rumtake a dropit'll make
you sleep. They don't generally sleep the first two
or three nights, but you'll soon get used to it. If you
don't go out and in for two or three months, you won't
feel it at all. I have been here now nine months.
I'm quite sorry I'm getting through so fast. Come,
cheer up!
And he laid his hand somewhat facetiously on
Claude's shoulder.
He shook it off, not from anger so much as a
repugnance
,
which he was not aware he had expressed so
clearly.
Ah! you're particular in your acquaintance, maybe.
Well, that's all very well; but beggars shouldn't be
choosers. A gentleman as can't pay his debts oughtn't
to carry his head quite so highno offence, I hope,
sir
.
CHAPTER XVII.
Claude
walked the room till morning, grasping at
a thousand expedients to extricate himself from his
disagreeable dilemma. The
idea
of imprisonment has
a moral effect upon the mind which no one can
conceive
who has not experienced it. The
circumstances
of his own confinement, too, were peculiarly
painful
.
Had he been thrown into a dungeon for a crime
of which he was innocent, he could much better have
supported the misfortune than he now found himself
able to do the consciousness that he was imprisoned
for a cause held by all mankind to be a good and
sufficient
one. He racked his brain for some means of
paying Carolan, whose cruel conduct sunk deeply into
his heart as he contrasted the dark, dirty wallsthe
miserable, dilapidated room and furniturethe greasy
and ragged beings who were his companions, with
the brilliant circle and magnificent halls, in the midst
of which his oppressor was probably moving at that
instant. He did not feel indignation or a desire of
vengeance so much as he felt surprise and wonder,
that one in Carolan's position could be so deaf to the
dictates of common humanity and common decency
as to crush so remorselessly into the earthwithout
examination or forbearanceone who, at least, was a
fellow-being. Sad and dark were the thoughts with
which he beguiled the hours of that long and sleepless
night, walking the floor after all his fellow-lodgers
were asleep. How strangely the scenes of the past
year rose upon his memory! How varied and yet
swift had been his course to his present condition!
All those whom he had made acquaintance withthe
young, the fair, the happy, the free  appeared to
him. Idabright, radiant, gorgeousas he had first
seen herand pale and sad, as she had crossed him
that nightwas he beloved by that tender and
beautiful
being? Amid the scenes in which she moved,
was her heart with him in this rude abode? Ah, yes;
and for a moment the idea of her sympathy touched
the rough walls with sweetness, and made the stained
boards beneath his feet soft as a path of roses. Poor
Denham's pale and bloody face here rose to him,
startling his tender dreams with the ghostly visage of
deathand the mysterious assassin, with his uplifted
daggerand Elkingtonand
the blow
.
His frame was agitated, his blood heated and
feverish
;
and human life seemed such a solemn and strange
medleysuch a mockerythat again dark ideas of
self-destruction dashed across his mind, and he thought
that in one moment he could end his gloomy and
harrowing
pains, and sleepwith poor Denhamwhere
poison nor fire could touch him farther. It
required
all his habitual self-command to shake himself
free from these excited thoughts. Nor would he,
perhaps, have been able to do so but for
one reflection
,
which is a support to the upright mind in the darkest
hour of distress and peril. He had nothing to accuse
himself of. He had not, at least knowingly, done
wrong. Nay, more (for his principles were so fixed
that they did not waver even while enduring the
painful
consequences of them), he had done right. He
had sacrificed himself to his sense of duty. Thus far
the results had been ruin and humiliationa stained
namecooled friendstriumphant enemies. But he
knew that, as in the game of whist, although bad play
sometimes succeeds, and the observance of skill fails,
these results are but accidental and temporary chances,
and in no way alter the general value of fixed and wise
rules of action.
One hope struck him: that by the aid of St.
Hillaire
LavalleDigbyKhl,
etc., he might procure
such a security against his departure from Berlin as
would release him from the actual limits of a prison.
Vol. II.L
It was then his intention to boldly and openly abandon
all pretensions to admission in the
societ
to which he
had been accustomedto give lessons in English or
French, for he was perfectly capable of bothto live
with an economy as strict as health and decency would
permitand to toil with ardour till he could
accumulate
sufficient to discharge all the obligations he had
contracted. Rossi, who depended on him, and poor
Mrs. Denham, occurred to him; but the pang which he
experienced on account of not being able to continue
to them the assistance he had promised, he felt would
be manly to bear with patience, and yet wiser to
dismiss
altogether from his mind. He repeated the line
from our great poet, What is done, is
done
, and
Things without remedy should be without regard.
Wisdom, although flowing from the murderer's lips.
The pale morning broke upon his meditations.
As daylight dawned his companions arose. They
looked, in the clearer beams of day, more repulsive and
hideous. Their clothes were miserabletheir
persons
filthytheir breath rank. Many wore no other
article of dress than a large
robe de chambre
of greasy
sheepskin, the wool turned next their skin. They
had diseases, some of themeyes sore and inflamed
by debaucheryand noses red and carbuncled. These
were the men who, in a general spirit of benevolence,
he had wished to receive on some terms of equality.
Now he shrunk from them with an aversion which he
could neither conquer nor conceal. They were his
fellow-creatures, with immortal souls like his own, but,
thus fallenby whatever causehe found them
loathsome
and unendurable. Fearful decrees of
Providence
,
which renders one unhappy mortal so far
beneath
another that nature revolts, and the sweet
theories
of humanity fall before their touch!
The breakfast was brought up at eighta mass of
greasy soup, which he could not eat.
You have no money? inquired the jailer, who
perceived he did not eat.
None!
Ah, but you'll get nothing else. You must come
to it at last.
Perhaps the gentleman would like a roasted
chicken
and some Champagne! said his rude acquaintance
of the previous evening.
Bring us a few strawberries and cream, cried a
second.
Will you take them with or without sugar? asked
the first; and there was a general grin.
The prospect of being without food was seriously
alarming, and Claude begged paper, pens, and a
messenger
to carry a note.
Where's your cash to pay for these things? said
the man.
I am surethat is, I hopemy friend will pay.
Ah! so, said the man.
And cannot I have a room to myself?
Keh! diableno, said the man. Is that a
reasonable
request? You're not in a hotel. Why you
more than they?
The gentleman is of a thoughtful disposition, and
fond of solitude, said his persecutor. I myself
should like an apartment looking out on a garden, with
a balcony.
This facetiousness was received with a general
laugh.
Take my watch, said Claude, and let me have
a little money on it till I can see my friends.
The man shook his head.
On a greasy table, with broken legs, and polished by
being used not a little as a seat, Claude wrote a letter to
Digby, begging him to come and see him. The
messenger
took it, and soon returned. The gentleman was not
at home, but Claude felt relieved. The idea of
quitting
the room and company in which he now found
himself was his principal desire. It seemed that this
alone would almost make him happy. Alas! how
were his wishes narrowed since the time when he
dreamed of palacesand equipagesand Ida hanging
on his arm, a fond and happy wife! Every moment
in his present position was almost insupportable. The
rough humour, mixed with malice, of his enemyfor,
although he had not been twelve hours in this den of
common misery, he had (poor human nature!) already
an enemyhad gained the rest to his side. His
undisguiseable
repugnance to their familiarity, and his
desire to escape from contact with them, were
observed
,
and resented by nearly all; and they endeavoured
to make his situation as uncomfortable as possible, as
some meaner birds of prey might pick at Prometheus
while chained and writhing under the beaks of his
fierce vulture.
Don't mind 'em, sir, said a wretched little
hunchback
.
They're a rough set, and don't know how to
behave. Forgive them. They don't know what they
do.
The words of our Saviour, unconsciously uttered by
this ignorant creature! Claude held out his hand for
his, and shook it heartily.
My honest fellow, one day you and I shall be
better
acquainted, perhaps.
His air and manner struck even those rude eyes,
and for some time there was a cessation of hostilities.
In the mean time, where was Digby? Every time
the door opened, he started. A hundred times his
heart beat quick, as he thought he heard his friend's
step; but still he did not come. The day wore away.
Night came. No reply from him. At ten, Claude,
exhausted, lay down upon his couch, but he could not
sleep. He fell sometimes into that dreadful state of
dozing, when all the stings of reality seem sharpened,
and the soul is given up to its horrors without the
support of waking reason. He was oppressed with
frightful dreams. He started often. Sometimes he
thought himself falling off a precipice; sometimes the
ghostly image of Denham glided over him, and once
he woke screaming, with the dagger of his assassin
glimmering over him in the shadow, and in the act of
piercing his heart. He thought now he should be
obliged to remain a year in prison. What hope had
he of relief? How could he ever pay his debts? A
year with his present associates would cause him to
contract foul diseaseswould make him, perhaps, as
unclean and gross as they! He rose again to escape
from these dreadful apprehensions. His eyeballs
burned, his head ached, and he found vermin
crawling
over him.
Ah! Carolan, he thought, may Heaven forgive
you. I fear I never can, ruthlessbitter oppressor!
And this is the bland and polished man I met with so
much pleasurethe smiling, elegant, hospitable,
affluent
leader of rank and fashion. How little do we
know men from seeing them in societyfrom dining
with themfrom being with them in assemblies of
pleasure! How few reflect, while they enjoy this
person's profuse hospitality and accept his courteous
attentions, that, were they once beneath his grasp
were they once to offend his pridethey would be
thrust, unpitied, into a loathsome dungeondeprived
of light, air, exercise, foodleft to mournto die,
perhaps
,
within these dismal walls, while music, and
laughter, and the giddy dance are going on almost
within sound of their groans; and when this man
comes to dieas the richest, the greatest
must
will no
stern image of his victim frown pale and accusing by
his bedside? Will he be called to no account for
the pangs his jewelled hand has inflicted? for the
misery
which a word from his bland lips could have
spared? Ah! cruel and thoughtless enemy. The
ways of God are fearful, and you may one day feel
with horror the bitterness which the captive drinks
the cruelty of trampling on the helpless!
Morning again broke, and again the breakfast came.
He took a cup and ate. His face was so pale and
haggard, that, although his tormentor ventured a jest
upon the recovery of his appetite, it was received in
L 2
silence by the circle of by-standers, who proceeded to
light their pipes without paying him any more
attention
.
The food, which had looked so loathsome,
tasted
better than he expected. It was clean, and not
disagreeable
.
Besides, thought he, it is my fare. Hunger
brings down pride, and misery learns to bow. Alas!
it is a useful lesson.
He now wrote a note to the English embassy, with
the members of which he had a passing acquaintance.
It was answered in an hour, by an order from the
director
of the prison to put him in a room by himself,
and give him every attention compatible with his
security
;
and his heart leaped within him in being shown
into a cleaner room down stairs, fronting on the square.
The lower half of the windows were boarded up, but
there was a small hole in each one of them through
which he could look into the street. There was also a
bedstead and a bed, a wash-hand basin and water, a
wooden chair, and a table with four legs. Moreover,
he was here alone. His first moment of solitude in
this new chamber was one of exquisite pleasure. The
man said he had also procured 50 thalers on his watch
and seals, which he held at his orders, and he agreed
to send in better food from an adjoining restaurant.
The good-humoured jailer seemed to sympathize with
him in his delight, and said,
You'll be better here, won't you? I'm glad they
gave you this room.
This expression of kindness touched Claude's heart.
He had scarcely been an hour alone when Digby came
in. His face wore an expression of the deepest
indignation
which Claude had seen there yet, and there
was also perceptible in his manner a certain
roughness
and want of respect very different from that he
had usually adopted towards him.
Well, how are you, Mr. Wyndham? said he.
Sorry to see you hereaathese things willa
happen; but you musn't think yourself the only
unfortunate
aaman
in the world;
I
Ialso have
my griefs.
What griefs? said Claude, who, even in his
misfortune
,
had a heart open to those of others.
Maryour Marythe littleungratefulaa
foolhasaaeloped from us.
Great Heaven! said Claude.
Yesand with thata (he looked around as if
to assure himself that his formidable foe could not hear
him) infamousprofligate Elkington. She left a
noteto mestating that `he had promised to marry
herthat I must not be either alarmed or angrythat
we should meet again in Londonand that she should
receive us as the Countess of Beverly.'
What incredible infatuation! said Claude; what
black-hearted villany!
I think, moreover, that her mother wasaa
privy to her flight, sir; Ishe he drew out his
handkerchief, and wept a few moments in silence.
Indeed, this pains as much as it surprises me, said
Claude.
Dn them, let them go! said Digby, rising in
wrath; she is no daughter of mine. I disinherit her
I disown her; and as for her mother
This intelligence greatly astonished Claude, and he
sympathized deeply with the bereaved father.
Let them go, said Digby. I shall never utter
her name again. What did you want to see me for?
he demanded, abruptly.
Ah, at this moment I cannot think of intruding my
affairs upon you.
I'm very sorry for you, I'm sure, said Digby;
but these things happen every day, and they must be
borne. I was in jail once twenty-four hours myself.
I did not mind it. It's nothing, after all. Imagine
yourself in a shipor indisposedor that it rains. It
is the very same thing. You've an excellent room
here. What's the amount of your debt?
Fifty pounds!
Ah, fifty pounds! Bless me! a good round sum.
How are you going to pay it? You have funds, I
hope.
No, not a cent.
Ahah! that's bad! What are you going to do
about it?
Claude, although chilled by this cold and careless
air, which he did not expect, related to him his plan to
procure security and teach English.
Ahah! securityfor your appearancehey?
Yesbut whom have you fixed upon? You have a
plenty of friends, I believe. I'll tell you who'd be
your security in a minuteif you'd ask her; and I
have no objectionfor it sha'n't be said of me that I
deserted
a friend in distressto see her privately
myself
.
She'll plank the money in two secondsI'm quite sure
she will. I should not mind asking her right up and
downright out and outthat's the way to do
business
.
Whom do you mean?
That young Countess Ida!
Claude started.
What, you won't?
Certainly not.
Ohah! you'll think of it, perhaps. You'll take
a different view of it when you have been here a week
or so. Well, I've an engagement myself at present;
my head's so battered with the thoughts of my poor
Mary, that I scarcely knowaaI'm on my head
or my heels. If
I
can do anything in the world for
you, you may command me.
Mr. Digby, said Claude, I will be frank with
you. I am here under extremely disagreeable
circumstances
,
and I wish to be released on bail for my
appearance
.
I intended to solicit this favour of
you
. It
is but a nominal risk. I need not explain that you are
liable for the debt only in case of my running away,
which I hope you feel there's no danger of.
What's the amount? said Digby, turning very red.
Fifty pounds. If I get out I can make my living;
if I remain here, I really can't see how I am to do
anything.
Well, well, I'll think of it. I'llsee Mrs.
Digby
,
said Digby.
No, said Claude, it is not requisite; the service
I ask of you is not one which requires consideration.
Say yes or no, and relieve me from farther suspense.
Will you deposite the money in court for my
appearance
?
Why weyou seeaIthe fact is, my dear
fellow, since we left London, theaatimes are
harddevilish hard. My agent writes me of very
serious
losses. Nothing on
earth
would give me greater
pleasure than to oblige you; but money, you know, is
aamoney; and I have long agoaamade a
resolution never to become security, under any
circumstances
,
foraaany man. Besides, I'm
going
back to London immediately; and, in fact, I come
to make my parting visit. I hope, with all my heart,
you'll get out of your difficulty, he continued, shaking
very heartily the hand which Claude did not refuse;
I do, Wyndham, upon my soul I do. Any commands
for London?
None.
Well, adieu  good-by. God bless you! My
heart bleeds to see you here; and, very red in the
face, Digby withdrew.
He was no sooner gone than several officers of the
court came to prosecute the suit against him in behalf
of Carolan. He had been arrested so abruptly in
consequence
of Carolan's complaint that he was about to
elude the debt by flight. He confessed the amount
at once, without defence or explanation. By this
proceeding
about a hundred thalers were added to the
original
sum.
Several more days passed in this way. No one came
to see him. At length he was brought up to court to
hear the judgment pronounced. He was ushered into
a neat, small room, where three gentlemen on the bench
and two clerks, with two or three bailiffs and Count
Carolan's lawyer, composed all the company. One of
the judges had dined in company with him at
Carolan's
several times, and discovered a disposition to
cultivate
his acquaintance. This same person now
regarded
him with cool, quiet indifference, with which
he would have looked upon any other prisoner. The
sentence was read, and he was condemned to remain
in prison till the debt was paid.
He was at once reconducted to his dreary dwelling;
and, with a fainting soul, he felt, as the doors once
more closed upon him, as if he were stepping into his
grave.
A week more elapsed. No one visited him; and he
was determined, after the unexpected rebuff received
from Digby, not to solicit the attention of any other
friendnot of St. Hillairenot even of Lavalle. He
borrowed a few books, but his money was rapidly
gliding
away, and he trembled to lay out a cent for
anything
but the actual necessities of life. He found he
was obliged to pay two thalers a month for the bed;
and every sheet of paper he used, and every message
he sent, cost him something. His food was also
expensive
;
and, although he denied himself all luxuries,
he could not avoid spending comparatively a great
deal. Hereabandoned  sad  hopeless  without
occupationwithout companyhe learned the use of
money. Every groschen he expended was first
carefully
considered. He had no soap, no napkins; his
washing was obliged to be curtailed, and the luxury of
clean linen to be surrendered. In four weeks he had
altered in appearance. Accustomed to much air and
exercise, the confinement debilitated him. His face
grew thin and pale, and his spirits sad. He felt as if
about to lose his health. Pains and aches came over
him. He was pining for airfor the sight of men
of nature. He thought the world was a passed thing
with hima vanished dream. He thought he should
speedily step from his dismal abode into the last, and,
perhaps, scarcely less cheerless refuge of the captive
the grave.
CHAPTER XVII.
One
day, after he had been about two months in this
situation, he heard, early in the morning, the tread of
several clumsy feet on the stairs. There was a small
aperture in his door filled with glass, through which
the turnkey could look into his room at pleasure
without
coming in. On looking through this place, he saw
four or five persons carrying down a rough pine-board
coffin. Some one was dead. It struck upon his soul
as a mournful presentiment. Alas! he too might soon
be thus borne away by rude hands to a neglected grave
unmourned  unmissed. On inquiring, when his
turnkey came in, who had died, he found it was his
rough persecutor, who had come here voluntarily to
live like a gentleman. Poor fellow! he felt glad he
had made no return to his taunts.
Did he suffer much? asked Claude.
No. It was all over in five hours after the first
attack.
What was the matter with him?
The man shook his head slowly, and went out
without
answering.
The next morning but one Claude was again
disturbed
by the same unusual sound of heavy feet at an
early hour. He addressed himself once more to his
little keyhole. It was another coffin, resting so
weightily
on the shoulders of its bearers as to leave no doubt
of its contents.
A vague suspicion arose in his mind that some
pestilence
had broken out among the prisoners.
When his attendant came in again, he asked him if
it were so.
You've hit it, said the man, nodding his head in
the affirmative.
What is it? asked Claude.
A horrid thing. It strikes you like a bulletracks
you with crampsturns you blue in the faceand
pops you off in short order.
Is it contagious?
Rather.
Are there any sick with it now?
One. None that has caught it has survived. One
of'em is just a-going, I'm afraid; and the worst of it
is, the doctors don't understand it, and no one'll go
near this poor fellow for fear of catching it. It is the
poor little hunchback, you know, that battled the other
ones for being cross with you.
And is he dying so, unattended?
Yes. What can one do? It's as good as death
to go near him, and he is too ill to be removed to the
hospital. I think the poor devil don't get his medicine
half the time.
May I go to him?
You? said the man, with surprise.
Yes. I will stay with him, if I can be
permitted
.
The man shrugged his shoulders.
Yes. You've a right to the room, and it will be
very good of you; but
Let me go, then, at once!
He led the way as he spoke, and Claude again
entered
the room from which he had escaped with so
much pleasure. It presented an appalling appearance.
The invalid lay in a cornerlivid, and apparently
dying
.
The rest were withdrawn as far as possible.
He was, as the man had said, too ill to be removed to
the hospital; and they had not yet come to arrange
what ought to be done with the others. Gloomy and
haggard faces were around. The hardy mirth, which
sometimes flourishes in a prison, had disappeared.
All was ominously silent.
On approaching the patient, Claude found him very
low. His head lay in an uneasy position, the
pillow
having fallen aside. Claude shook and replaced
it. A draught of a cooling nature was standing
beyond
his reach on the floor.
Drink! drink! drink! said the poor sufferer.
It's death to go near him! said one of the other
prisoners, in a low voice.
Claude handed it to him according to the directions.
He seemed refreshed by it, and turned his eyes
gratefully
upon his benefactor.
I'mmostgone! he said, with a faint, difficult
voice. Half an hour more!
My good, kind friend, can I do anything for you?
Pray! pray! said the poor fellow, pointing to a
book.
Claude knelt, and read a prayer selected for the bed
of the dying.
I have
a child!
said the man, when he had
done, with a stronger effort. Take her that book!
They will tell you down stairswhereto find her.
Say I blessed herand youGod bless you. Oh!
I am cold
He fell back.
Claude gazed upon his face for several minutes.
A change came over it, but the spirit passed calmly.
He closed the eyes.
To a better world, poor friend! said Claude. I
will do your bidding, and more, if in my power.
He thought the scarce parted spirit heard him as it
left the body.
As he descended again to his own room, the poor
fellows around bowed to him respectfully. Some of
them blessed him. It was a simple tribute to
goodness
and courage, and he felt how much more brave
as well as rational it was to turn even from the
grossest
insult with patience, and to risk life only in the
cause of humanity and virtue.
Vol. II.M
In the afternoon the turnkey presented him a bill
for dinners of five thalers, stating that he had no more
cash on hand, and the restaurateur would supply no
more till he was paid. The gross prison fare rose to
his memory. He felt already his appetite failing. He
was full of pains. He believed he should soon lose
his health, and perhaps his life, if obliged to return to
a diet so repulsive and so unlike that which habit had
rendered necessary. He sat down and wrote to
Count Carolan.
Monsieur le Comte
,
I have been now in prison two months. I am ill
without money, without foodreduced to the
common
fare of the unhappy inmates of this mournful
dwelling. I have to inform you, also, that a fatal
pestilence
has broken out in the building, and carried off
three victims in two days. I request you, in the name
of humanity, to release me. I offer you my word of
honour not to leave Berlin without paying you. If
your object is to get the money, you can never
succeed
by keeping me here. If your object is to
humble
my pride, it is humbled as far as a man's should
be. If you desire my lifeunless I can breathe the
air and take a little exercise, your desire will
speedily
be gratified. My freedomif you grant itI shall
employ in honourable labour, of which you shall have
the first fruits. Believe me, sir, incapable of
falsehood
.
I am, Monsieur le Comte,
Your obedient servant,
Claude Wyndham
.
It was with the last two groschens he possessed in
the world that he despatched the messenger with this
note. He felt that in writing it he had not humiliated
himself; for he considered Carolan a man whose
weak understanding caused his present obduracy more
than his bad heart. He had yet to learn how
prosperity
and pride inflate and harden even the best heart,
unless watched over by a sensible mind.
The messenger returned in an hour. Claude's heart
beat and his hand actually trembled as he perceived
that the man had brought an answer.
You found Count Carolan at home, then?
Yes. He gives a great dinner to-day. His door
was surrounded by carriages. Some of the princes
were there, and all the diplomatic corps. They told
me at first that he could not be troubled with this
affair
,
but I would not go away without an answer. I
was determined, sir.
Claude looked at the poor menial. There was
kindness
in his eye, and his face wore the expression of
humanity and commiseration, which, through its rough
and not over clean features, made it look even
beautiful
.
Thank you, said he; I am really greatly
obliged to you.
I don't know, sir, but I fear Count Carolan is a
hard man when any one offends him. You are not the
first he has kept here.
Well, let us see, said Claude. He can but
refuse
.
The letter ran thus:
Sir
,
I have committed the account against you to my
lawyer, who has already received his instructions, and
I cannot interfere with what now belongs entirely to
him.
Yours, etc.,
Carolan
.
The paper was a thick, gold-edged English sheet.
It exhaled a perfume of roses, the wax was sprinkled
with gold, and the impression of the seal was the
finely-cut arms of the family.
Well! said Claude, I thought so. II
He bent his head upon the table. Long
confinement
had made him nervous and hysterical. He did
not shed a tear, but he grew pale and cold as the
thought of the wide streetsthe moving crowdsthe
fresh, sunshiny airthe deep, cool woodsthe sky
the streamsand all the bright outward world,
passed
like a vivid panorama through his imagination.
The man had gone out and closed the door softly.
The poor fellow did not wish to disturb him; and the
delicacy and refinement of this lowly heartalmost
as much immured here as himselftouched him, and
drew the tear which had not flowed at the thought of
his own disappointment.
At this instant there was a sudden rush against the
door, and a loud knocking. It was opened, and
Lavalle
stood before him.
My friend, my beloved friend! cried he, and they
leaped into each other's arms as if they had been
brothers.
I thought cried Claude, I was
sure
something
had kept you.
I have been in France, said Lavalle. To-day
is the first time I have heard of it. I have scarcely
touched the ground in coming. I overturned a fellow
at the door, and expect nothing else than to be put in
here with you for assault and battery.
Who told you? asked Claude, lifting his face.
Ah, that shall be for another time; but, Dieu! how
you are altered! You are scarcely recognisable;
and he gazed at his always handsome face, but which
now, by confinement and reflection, had acquired a
delicacy, a transparency, and an expression of
intellect
and refinement rarely seen in a countenance at
the same time so firm and manly. He had never
before, indeed, remarked how extremely handsome
Claude was. His features were so finely formed
his brows pencilled so definitelyhis eyes so large
and full of souland his mouth cut as if by the hand
of a sculptor, all showing through a complexion which
might have been envied by a woman. Lavalle
comprehended
,
as he gazed on his friend, better than ever,
the impression which he suspected he had made on
the heart of Ida.
The debt said Lavalle. What is it?
Fifty pounds.
And you have been here so long for such a sum?
Pay it!pay it ten times over!'
Generous friend! said Claude. But do not be
offended. You must do me a much greater favour
than what you propose.
I swear to grant it, whatever it is, said Lavalle.
You must
not
pay this debt. I have abased
myself
before Carolan. I must make him feel his wrong.
What! vengeance from you? Have you grown
wicked in your dungeon?
No. The vengeance I ask is to be permitted to
toil for and pay this
myself
. You shall get me out by
depositing the amount in court as a security for my
appearance.
You
are not afraid I shall run away?
I'm afraid you
won't!
said Lavalle.
Carolan must feel the cruelty, the
Stop, said Lavalle; he has more excuse than you
think. He regards you as the greatest obstacle to his
wishes in existence. I have heard a
foule
of things
since my arrival. You know Ida and I are cousins
by the mothers. I have always been as a brother. As
for
love
, she knows my views lie elsewhere. The day
of the duel, Elkington pressed her to accompany his
mother to London, so that on his arrival there, at the
proper time, their union might at length take place.
Well, what did she reply? She dismissed him with
bitter contempt and horrorfor ever; she declared his
principles were as repulsive to her as his personthat
the hand stained with the blood of a duel should never
touch hers in friendship againand she did, somehow
or other, come out with the interesting avowal, that
youfrom the attempts to humiliate youhad risen
superior to all your enemies. No one dreamed the
little devil had so much spirit; and she sent Elkington
M 2
spinning off, in a greater rage than he will get over in
a year. So, in revenge, he has carried away with him
that rosy-lipped Mary Digby. This fact has
confirmed
the evil opinion of him which every one already
began to entertain, and has so completely convinced a
certain lovely young countess that your reported
marriage
with her was all a fabrication of Elkington, that
but this is, of course, all jest. However, it was she
who told me of your situation, and in a way which
why, I'm worse at keeping a secret than a woman!
Lavalle, spare me! said Claude. If you mean to
intimate that I am honoured with the esteem of this
young girl, I will merit it by my conduct. Never will I
approach her. I have had a humiliating lesson. My
firmest prayer is, that we may never meet again. But
for this debt, I would leave Berlin to-night.
Do as you please; but what means are you going
to take to
earn
, as you call it, this money? You can't
plough or cut wood, can you?"
I can teach English, said Claude.
You?
Even I.
Youthe elegantthe flatteredthe admired
Claude Wyndham
Dear Lavalle, your spirits run away with you.
Remember I am weak and sad, or, at least, I have been
so so long, that even joy is a pain. When shall I be
out? I sigh for one breath of sweet, fresh air! and,
in truth, he heaved a deep-drawn sigh.
I shall drive at once to my banker'sto the
lawyer's
to
the court. If it
can
be done to-day, it shall.
I'm off this very instant
But, LavalleI am ashamed to tell youI am
actually
without food. You have come in time. I am
down to my last penning. I have eaten nothing
to-day
!
Trust to me, said Lavalle, tears springing into
his eyes. Trust all to me; and he dashed off as
hastily as he had entered.
As Claude looked around upon the naked walls,
every crack of which he knew, every web of which
he had watched for hours and weeks, he almost
feared the last scene had been a dream, so bright,
dazzling
,
and even painful was the sudden prospect of
freedom.
In half an hour, two waiters, aproned, and bearing an
ample and very odoriferous dinner, entered. There
was everything that could tempt his palate: two or
three kinds of choice winessegarssilver covers
clean tablecloths and napkins. The table was spread
as if for a lord. The waiters desired to know whether
they should withdraw, and, upon receiving his answer,
they retired. Such a meal is as full of consolation for
troubles that are past, as of firm resolutions against
future
evils. As he was commencing it, the
commissioner
looked in for something. Claude made him sit
down with him and share the welcome feast. The
honest fellow ate as he had never eaten before; the
delicate viands disappeared with marvellous quickness,
and the sparkling Champagne was disposed of without
useless ceremonies or unnecessary delay. At the
request
of Claude, the remains of the feastand they
were amplewere conveyed up stairs to his quondam
companions; and in a quarter of an hour the dishes
and bottles were brought down in a state which the
honest commissioner declared would save the
restaurateur
the trouble of washing.
Our people up stairs, sir, said he, make clean
work of it. They don't get Champagne and asparagus
every daypoor devils!
Time flew with rapidity. Evening came, and with
it the jailer, with an order from the judge. It is
probable
Lavalle had already taken the necessary
measures
to procure it before his visit.
I am requested to give you what money you
want, said the director down stairs. He was going
to make some magnificent donation to all his
fellow-prisoners
,
if not, in fact, to pay their debts outright,
when he remembered that he was lavishing money not
his own. He contented himself, therefore, by taking
for himself a more moderate sum than he had at first
proposed, and ordering certain benevolent favours for
the prisoners. The good commissioner was by no
means forgotten, but received a donation which he
appeared
to think a fortune. After a few other
donations
and arrangements, and changing his loose prison
suit for that he usually wore, he once more stepped
outside the door of his dismal abode, from which
several
times he had believed he could never emerge
again till carried by careless hands to a neglected
grave.
Lavalle had sent a horse, which was held by a
servant
at the door. Claude mounted into the saddle
with the feeling of a monarch who is about to return
to a kingdom he has saved, at the head of an army he
has led to victory. His sensations on riding through
the townon feeling himself again amid moving
crowdson passing the old Schlosson reaching the
Brandenbourg gate, and pushing his horse to a full
gallop along the broad, fragrant avenues of the wood,
we shall leave to the imagination of the reader; hoping
that he may, if possible, often enjoy a pleasure as
delightful
,
without purchasing it with pains as
disagreeable
as those our hero had suffered. Suffice it to say, he
suffered no disagreeable thoughts of business to break
upon the sensations of that hour. Again he breathed
the fresh air of Heaven; again the calm old trees,
streams, and flowers were around him, and no object
met his eye without conveying to his soul a sense of
pure hope and exquisite pleasure; for if the past was
without happiness, it had been also without
self-reproach
.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Lavalle
had directed his servant to appoint a
meeting
with Claude, as soon as he should have finished his
ride, at his own lodgings. On arriving there as the
cool afternoon shadows began to descend upon the
earth, he found the groom waiting for the horse; and
he understood the delicacy which had induced Lavalle
to leave him the first few hours of his freedom to his
own reflections, or rather sensations. He now longed
for the meeting with his friend with impatience.
There was much which he had to ask. He had been
completely cut off from the world. He knew nothing
of the great political changes going on around him.
He was ignorant of what had occurred in Berlin
during
his absence. Where was General St. Hillaire?
Where was Khl? He had heard nothing more of
him, nor of the fortunate owner of the purse. Not one
of all his acquaintances had come to see him, so much
had his reputation been injured by the
misrepresentations
of Elkingtonthe statements of Carolanthe
blow which he had received unresistinglyand his
sudden fall from a state of independence to utter
poverty
.
He learned of Lavalle all that he required.
General St. Hillaire had been, ever since his
imprisonment
,
ill in bed. Of Khl Lavalle could state nothing,
except that very probably he was ignorant of the fact
that Claude was confined. Plans were now arranged
for the future. Claude positively refused to accept
of the money as a loan, or that he might advance it to
Carolan, but that he would wait till he had earned it
by his own labour. He had no hope of being able to
resume his station in society, and he determined to
accommodate
himself at once to the new one to which
Providence had destined him. He avoided making
any inquiry of Ida, and Lavalle did not touch upon that
subject, thinking, perhaps, that he had already said
more than he had a right to in the hurry of his joy.
He promised Claude a class of five every evening, at
a thaler an hour; and five at separate hours during the
day, also at a thaler, making ten thalers a day, or sixty
thalers a week; a princely income for a poor
professor
of languages; but Lavalle was an able patron, and
put a heart into his undertakings which did not allow
them to fail. He determined to call on Khl, and
procure
also his aid; and they calculated that, in a short
time, he could pay his debt to Carolan and the London
banker, entirely extricate himself from pecuniary
embarrassment
,
and be in the receipt of a comfortable
income
till circumstances should offer an occupation
more agreeable to his taste. It was decided that he
should go into a plain lodging the next day, call in all
his bills, and Lavalle would state the prospect of a
speedy settlement to the few creditors for their
remaining
small balance. The next morning,
accordingly
,
Claude found a single plain room, kept by a
poor old widow lady, who agreed to board, as well as
lodge him, at a moderate price. Lavalle took the
watch out of the jailer's hands and bought it himself,
allowing for it the sum it originally cost; and
undertook
himself to superintend all the affairs of his friend,
while the latter should devote himself to his new
avocations
.
In less than a week, the whole number of
scholars was procured. Mr. Khl had heard nothing of
Claude; and concluding, from his nonappearance, that
he had left town for the summer, he made no inquiries
after him. He was shocked to learn of his
vicissitudes
,
and delighted to be able to render him any
assistance
.
His whole family entered into his plan, and
agreed to become pupils in English; and Claude soon
found himself completely established in his new
vocation
,
with the most pleasing prospects of success. His
room was plain, but, after his period of probation in
the prison, truly comfortable. The furniture was
ordinary
,
but neat. The good woman supplied his meals
in the house; but finding that it would be more
convenient
for her, as well as less expensive for himself, he
offered to eat at the same table with her, and he
requested
her to make no change in her usual fare,
except
in the addition of the quantity necessary for
another
person.
Poor Claude was now, from necessity, excluded
from the society where he had before been received
with so much attention; and, had this not been the
case, he would by no means have sought it. There
were not wanting severaland they the most
cultivated
and distinguished peoplewhom, had a selection
been in his power, he would, from the first, have chosen
for his friends; who seemed to take a kind of interest
in him, inspired partly by his history as recounted by
Lavalle, and partly by his personal manners and
character
.
The incident of the purse of gold and his
refusing
the reward, at the moment when he had just
heard of his ruin, had been everywhere related by
Mr. Khl, and had reached royal ears. Expressions
of admiration had been repeated from lips whose
opinions
were not likely to be gainsaid; and his character
as an honest man was made apparent, and was
growing
every day more so. His presence in Berlin, his
lowly occupation, his unintermitting industry, and the
nature of the employment he had adopted, brought
him in contact with many people, who were struck
with the modesty and yet quiet dignity of his manners,
the plainness of his dress, and the punctuality and
cheerful conscientiousness which he put into his
labours
.
There was a general harmony and consistency
in his life, which spoke for him against calumny; and
the mild yet steady firmness with which he met, when
accidentally they crossed his path, those whom he had
once known on terms of equality, and who knew he
had not only descended from the rank in which he had
first appeared, but had unresistingly received a blow
rather than fight a duel, engaged their respect and
altered
their unfavourable opinion of him. Rumours,
too, of the assassin who had twice attempted his life,
had awakened all the watchfulness of the police, and
was now generally and implicitly believed, although
at first doubted. This threw a new sympathy around
Claude, and produced another curious effect. The
character of Elkington had begun to be whispered
about; his affair with the officerhis exposure at
cardsthe displeasure of his father, etc. The fierce
brutality with which he had conducted himself in the
quarrel with Denham began now to be more coolly
canvassed, even by those who at first thought it
excusable
.
Although, in the interview with his mother,
where his passions, roused to their highest fury by her
narrative and the dangers impending over him, he had
so far forgotten himself as to inflict a blow upon the
author of his being; although, during that interview,
the outer doors had been locked and doubly locked,
the incident had transpired, the occurrence was
reported
and credited. Indeed, anything would have
been credited of Elkington; and now the attempts
upon Claude's life were laid to his charge. It is thus
that such a character at length becomes an object of
universal distrust and suspicion.
It had been before stated in the journalsbut Claude,
in his prison, knew nothing of itthat the death of the
Earl of Beverly had been announced pematurely. He
had fallen into a fit from which no human skill could
save him, and it was improbable that he could ever
have the use of his senses again, at least until the
moment of his death. Elkington therefore remained
longer in a state of suspense, and had gone to London
with his mother. The Digbys had also gone.
Nothing
more had been heard of them in Berlin, or of
their unfortunate daughter.
Under these circumstances, Claude began to be
regarded
as at least an honest man, and a man of
principle
.
All who had dealings with him acknowledged
even that, when they were not paid, he had made
every possible sacrifice to satisfy their demands. His
very presence in the streets, where he might be
occasionally
seen passing to and from the various houses
of his pupils, was an answer to the principal charges
against him. His hard labourhis self-deprivation of
all the luxuries and amusements of lifethe simple
and even rude dress which he now wore, if without
pride, at least without shameand the constant
friendship
and praises of Lavalle, were all in his favour.
He was not unfrequently invited, poor and
unfashionable
as he now was, to dine at the tables of Monsieur
de N and General St. Hillaire, as well as two or
three others, who believed him to have made the great
sacrifice of his passions and his reputation as a man
of couragethat treasure which an honourable mind
would purchase with lifeto a conscientious principle
of action. These invitations he however declined,
from a feeling that the poor and those in debt should
indulge in no pleasures which might lead to the
slightest
expense. Besides, satisfied with the purity of his
actions, he shrank from the attention which they
excited
;
and his life, in the midst of a great city,
surrounded
by moving armies and a glittering court, was
almost as solitary and simple as that of Robinson
Crusoe
in his island. He had steeled his heart to meet
the world; and, strange to say, notwithstanding his
fall, he was happier than before. He seemed to have
regained his independence. Occupation gave him
wholesome spirits. The direction of his energies to
a single purpose excluded weak reveries and idle
apprehensions
from his mind. He thought of Ida
sometimes
,
but it was as one dead. Respecting her
sentiments
towards him he was still uncertain. It had
happened
two or three times that she had seen him in the
street: sometimes when he was walking alone,
thoughtful
and sad, in the Park, sometimes hastening along
the street to his daily toils. He could not but
remember
that at Monsieur de N's, the last time
they had met in society, when he sought her eye, she
turned away, as if unwilling to address him. He knew
this was an act of obedience to an arbitrary father,
Vol. II.N
but it was enough to keep him from intruding upon
her again, even with a look; and on the occasions of
these accidental encounters, he cast his eyes to the
ground with an humble pride, of which he could not
know the effect upon this young girl. Often, in his
walks, too, he met the various persons of the
societ;
and, although at first it pained him, after a little time
he was only amused to see the unfeelingness with
which some met him. At first he had, from an
unpremeditated
sense of courtesy, bowed to the still
happy acquaintances of his former hours. But so
many among them discovered a disinclination to
receive
even a passing recognition, that he determined to
address no one first. Some had bowed in return, but
hastened by as if afraid to be addressed by him; some
returned his salutation with a stately air of
superiority
;
some replied with an inclination so slight and
cool, and a look so soon averted, as to indicate plainly
how offensive they found the impertinence of
recognising
them; while others, with an ostentatious care,
dropped their eyes to the ground, lifted them to the
sky, or turned them away till he had passed. There
were not wanting some who stared in his face,
without
thinking it necessary to use ceremony in gratifying
their curiosity, but who, on his civil bow on meeting
their glances, only opened their eyes and mouths a
little wider, and, with a steady gaze of astonishment,
suffered his courtesy to remain unanswered, or to be
replied to exactly as would have been the case had
they been unexpectedly addressed by an entire
stranger
.
It would be paying a poor compliment to these
gay circles to say that the class we have described
formed the majority. Often he was stopped by the
gentle, the cultivated, and the refined, with kind and
affable inquiries after his health and prospects. Some
distinguished him thus in his altered fortunes with
more marks of respect than they had bestowed before.
And there were ladiesyoung and oldwho, by the
simplest acts of affability, meeting him with exactly
the same charming familiarity with which they had
always greeted him, appeared to his grateful and
impressionable
mind in such a fair lightthe old so good,
the young so graceful and lovelythat surely, had
the proud, the conceited, and the narrow-minded known
how strong a feeling of admiration could be produced
by such simple sacrifices, there would have been no
superciliousness and arrogance among them; if not
natural
sweetness of character, good sense would have
made them less pretending. But there are people who
have neither. If the limits of the story would permit,
we could find materials for a goodly volume in the
experience
of our hero from the receipt of the fatal
letter
withdrawing his income, to that when he found
himself the possessor of sufficient money to discharge
the amount of Carolan's debt, as well as all else that
he owed in the world. There are two or three
episodes
narrated at large, and an edifying succession in
the manuscript of the king's library, from which this
history is drawn, which it would gratify us to lay
before
the reader, did time and space permit. One
refers
to the illness of a little boy, the son of the poor
old lady with whom Claude boarded, and who, being
ill of a contagious disorder, was attended in person by
Claude, at the peril of his life and against the
warnings
of the physician. The poor little fellow,
notwithstanding
this service, died; and a part of Claude's
earnings were appropriated to paying the mournful
expenses attending the committal of his sweet little
body to the earth. The old lady knew no one to tell
this to. The doctor said the gentleman was a fool,
and always spoke of him as such, without always
giving
the reasons on which that flattering epithet was
founded. Claude himself was not in the habit of
making
his own acts the topic of conversation, and
therefore
this affair was never known till the doctor one day,
on finding that Claude had employed a more eminent
physician, let it out in revenge, and to ruin his
character
as a man of sense.
Another of these episodes describes how old Mr.
Khl had a daughter, Mademoiselle Khlhow she
was about eighteen years of agethat her charms of
person were equalled only by her heart and mind
and how she spent so much time in studying the
irregular
verbs, adjectives, and conjunctions of the
English
tongue, under the tutelage of her handsome and
melancholy young professor, that, before she was aware
of the progress she was making, she found she had
acquired
a considerable knowledge upon other subjects
besides syntax and prosody. She grew so reserved
and cool to Mr. Wyndham, that that young gentleman,
entirely engaged with his grammars and dictionary,
concluded she had taken offence against him. With
a simplicity rather violent in a youth who, however
fond of rural beauty, had not spent
all
his life in the
country, he addressed old Mr. Khl upon the
subject
,
and was made to open his very interesting eyes
wider than he had done for some time by a frank
explanation
of the sudden cause from Khl, and an offer
of a furnished house in the Linden, near the
Thiergarten
a
banker would hold payable to his order the
sum of 100,000 thalers, Prussian money  and the
young lady herself, with a pair of eyes as full of
tenderness
as a star is of light; and all these on no more
difficult a condition than the utterance of the little
monosyllable
Yes. But that word, short and easy as it
may be, is often the source of profound consequences,
and is often found the most difficult, and sometimes,
also, the most dangerous in the dictionary.
Claude was astonished at the proposal of this offer,
but his astonishment was not greater than that of Mr.
Khl upon hearing him respectfully but firmly
decline
it.
What! zounds! hey! refuse a fortune of 100,000
thalers, with such a girl as my Emily! and you
scarcely
out of prison? Refuse my Emily? what! hey!
My esteemed friend, said Claude, with a delicacy
and tact which his kind patron perfectly understood
and deeply felt, I can never refuse what the young
lady has herself never offered, and perhaps would not
sanction; but I may tell
you
, in confidence, that long
before I knew youII
Ah, keh! said the old gentleman. It is sois
it? WellIshewe had better say no more about
it.
I may add, said Claude, that even when I
commenced
with your family, their knowledge of English
was so good that they scarcely required my services;
and now they are almost in a state to teach it
themselves
.
Let me therefore withdraw as a tutor, and
meet you and them hereafter only as a friend. I have
already more than I can attend to, for I believe
everybody
in Berlin has undertaken to learn English.
Be it so, said Mr. Khl. I should feel
awkward
in my present position with any other person,
added he, gravely, and with some confusion; but
youin every breath, in every glanceare a
man of
honour;
a man, he added, with some feeling, whom
a father can trust with the sacredest secret of his
daughter's soul.
The manuscript goes on to say, that for a period
Claude continued his visits to the house, but they
gradually grew fewer and farther between, and at
length entirely ceased.
The third circumstance, which, however useful it
would be in swelling our history to the required size,
had we not on hand metal more attractive, is the
conduct of Monsieur Rossi. He recovered, and
resumed
his toils as a French teacher; but he was pale,
melancholy, and
distrait
. He lived almost on the
bounty of Claude. His manner was strange and
unsocial
.
He exhibited no gratitude for the favours he
had received and was daily receiving; but demanded
more money as if of his banker. Claude tried to sooth
him into some kind of companionship, but his efforts
were fruitless. He was taciturn and gloomy in
society
.
When they met in the street, this singular being
often avoided him. In all cases of want, however, he
N 2
did not hesitate to seek him and solicit his aid, and to
coolly apply the gratuity to luxuries which the giver
denied to himself. With a spirit which a
blow
had
irritated to madness, he did not hesitate to live on the
charity of another, and to spend in selfish follies his
friend's hard-earned gains. Claude at length
perceived
that he was not, after all, an object of real merit, and
one day he frankly refused to give him money. His
demeanour on the occasion was cold, ungrateful, and
mean. He at first begged, and then knelt down and
implored for a few thalers. Disgusted and astonished,
Claude refused positively, and told him to seek
elsewhere
his living hereafter. He offered to exert
himself
,
if he wished, to procure him scholars, but not to
give him the means of living in idleness and
intemperance
.
He told him he had just enough to pay his
debts, and that he was now about to pay Carolan.
Ah, oh! said Rossi. You remember, perhaps,
what I told you about Ida. It was a lie. It was all
my own fabrication.
Be it so, said Claude. I did not speak of it.
But you think of it often, said Rossi. I am not
blind. I have seen youin the night evenlingering
by her house.
Do you dog my steps, sir? said Claude, sternly.
Yesyours and hers, said Rossi. Many an
hour I have watched you both unseen, undreamed of.
She must not suppose I have forgotten the vile blow
I received in her presence and on her account, and
that she touched afterward, in friendship, the hand
that struck me. As for you, sirwhat if she does love
you? what if she has been illto death almost? what
if her health is goneher beauty fadingher heart
heavyher eyes, even, full of misery? Does she think
I pity her? Not a bit. I gloat on these signs of
despair
!
Rossi, said Claude, what madness is this? Who
told you the Countess Ida was ill?
My own eyesmy own heart; and not only that
she is ill, but that she is ill foryou. And
you
, who
have stolen her from meyou deny me the poor means
to live! Look to it! you and she too. I have
waited
and waited, and paused and paused! I have been
by her in hours when she thought herself alonein the
dayin the nightin the crowdin solitude
watching
gazingWeak
fool! the scene must close. The
fire is lighted on the altarthe high-priest attends
the victim is bound. Look to it! sir!
He stamped his foot fiercely. His features were
pale and haggard, his eye flashed with a fearful
expression
,
and he withdrew, slamming the door
violently
after him. This conduct confirmed a suspicion,
which had glanced across Claude's mind before, that
the poor being had moments of insanity, and to that
he ascribed the vague threats which he uttered; but
whether they were directed against himself or Ida, he
could not tell.
At length, however, the money was in his hand to
pay the demand of Carolan, who, through his lawyer,
had demanded the highest rate of interest, and all the
costs of the suit and his imprisonment. The other
debts were already paid. He accordingly met the
lawyer and paid the judgment. It was on a pleasant
morning in the latter part of the summer that he set
off to demand a personal interview with Carolan, the
last, richest, and hardest of his creditors. It was his
intention to ask of Carolan a retraction of the
suspicions
he had expressed against him. He went,
therefore
,
to his magnificent palace, from which he was now
excluded as an inferior being. He was much altered
by the constant labours, events, and feelings of the
last few months. His health was enfeebled. His
cheeks were pale and thin, and his once smooth face
showed lines of care and sorrow. Poverty, which did
not break his spirit, had worn upon his body. The
thought of
debt
had caused him many a bitter day
and sleepless night. It seemed even as if he were
sinking gradually into the grave; a fact of which, by
the sadness on his brow, he might have been conscious.
His clothes, too, were poor and faded. The money
necessary to dress himself better, he had, even from
his slender earnings, bestowed on Rossi, or the little
boy who had perished from the earth like an early
flower, and whom he had ardently loved. He had
sent some, also, to his banker, to be paid to Mrs.
Denham
,
without receiving any answer from or news of
her; and the resolution to pay all his debts before
Carolan's demand had obliged him to spend nothing
on his own person.
As he approached the palace of Carolan there was
about it an air of grandeur which contrasted
singularly
with his own humble sphere. Two or three
serving
men in livery were lounging at the door, and
several
equipages were drawn up in frontthe panels
glittering
with the ostentatious arms of the owners; the
chasseurs, in their gorgeous dresses, lounging about;
and the coachmen asleep on their boxes, exhausted
with late hours and hard work. As he entered the
hall, the servants did not move from their careless
attitudes
the
very men who once, at the sight of him,
sprung up with the violent respect they were taught
to pay alone to the rich and great. Cards were an
expense he had long laid aside, and he had written his
name on a piece of paper.
Well, said one of the men, with a round face and
goggle eyes, and bursting with good feed and lazy
living, what do you want?
To see Monsieur le Comte Carolan.
I don't think it likely you'll succeed in doing that
at present, replied the man, taking the paper
unceremoniously
from his hand, and looking at him from
head to foot. Monsieur le Comte is engaged; you'd
better call to-morrow.
Do me the favour to take my name in, said
Claude.
Why, monsieur, he is with company now; and as
he goes to France the day after to-morrow, he has no
time to lose. Hadn't you better leave your business
with me?
To France? With his family?
Ay, with Mademoiselle Ida.
With Mademoiselle Ida?
Claude's heart felt an old twinge of a malady which
he had striven hard to overcome.
I must see him, then, to-day, and I will only pay
it into his own hands.
Well, if the man
insists
on it, said the other
footman
,
you'd better let him go into the study and wait.
I'll take your name, monsieur. Walk up into the
study.
The two men mounted the broad flight of steps,
whose velvet carpet felt strange beneath his feet. One
went in with the name. The other passed through
three or four of the spacious and gorgeous rooms into
a smaller and most exquisitely furnished cabinet, the
walls clothed with richly-bound books and priceless
paintings, and full of all the thousand elegances and
luxuries of the rich and great. He sat down on a
chair in the embrasure of one of the windows, half
concealed by stands of flowers, curtains, and statues.
He had not been there a minute when a step was heard.
The door opened, and Ida entered. Claude did not
move either to conceal or reveal himself, but he
perceived
at once she did not see him, and was not aware
that any one was present. She passed to a bookcase
and took out a book. Her face was pale and sad.
She was not at all the same careless and happy girl
whom he had seen in the portrait. The time which
had passed over her had left its marks, and she was
really changed. Yet, as he gazed again, with a
rapture
that almost suspended his being, he thought her
more beautiful than ever. There was in her
countenance
more thought and character. It had that
sweetness which patient grief gives, and which
Raphael
has portrayed with such an inspired hand.
Claude could not wholly exclude the idea that the
changes in her face might have been occasioned partly
by him. The fervour of his own love rose again in
his bosom; and to have thrown himself at her feet,
and said one farewell, he would have consented to
die the same hour. But he restrained himself. He
remembered his promise, his duty, and her happiness,
and he sat silent. She was passing out again with
the book she had taken down, when, by some strange
chance, she returned to look at a tuberose, recently
brought in, which she had not seen before. The
flower
,
with a number of others, stood on a large stand
between her and himself, and had hitherto prevented
her seeing him. As she advanced, he rose. His eyes
were bent to the ground, his face was pale. He
scarcely knew whether he felt more pain or pleasure,
and he could not repress or hide his agitation. She
knew him instantly; but at the sight of himhis pale,
thin face, his mean clothes, his dusty boots, and all
the apparel of povertya half-uttered shriek and
shudder
escaped her, and she sank into a chair covering
her face with her hands. Yes! it was loveingenuous,
artless loveunused to the womanly power of
concealment
;
and the deep crimson which succeeded the
pallor of her forehead and neck, and all that those
trembling and beautiful hands sought in vain to hide,
taught her as well as him, that, without words, the
sacred secret of her soul was betrayed.
It seems that, with the innate dignity and purity of
her nature, she recovered her self-possession almost
instantly, for she rose and said, extending her hand
frankly,
Mr. Wyndhamyou have been so long absent
youyou are so greatly alteredthat the sight of you
startled me.
Let me hope, said Claude, and once more she
listened to the tones of a voice so much loved, so long
unheard, and now touched with a tremour that betrayed
irresistible agitation, that neither my absence, nor
anything that has occurred during it, has deprived me
of theesteemofofso valued a friend.
It was mutually clear to both the loversfor so we
trust the sagacious reader has long since found them
that this accidental meeting was to be reduced as
soon as possible from the tone of high feeling which it
had first awakened, to the safer and less embarrassing
courtesy of ordinary society. Both wished it, and
both intuitively felt the delicacy and propriety which
demanded it.
Indeed, Mr. Wyndham, I should do myself but
poor justice if I did not say how clearly I have
perceived
the propriety of your conduct, and how little I
have shared the errors of others respecting you.
You make me happy, said Claude; and with a
deeper fervour, which he could not repress, and
perhaps
was not aware of, he added,
The approbation of such as you is all I dare hope;
and
yours
is all I desire.
We are about visiting France! said Ida,
somewhat
hastily. My father, in doing so, acts against
the advice of all his friends; but he is very firm in his
determinations. My uncle, Colonel St. Marie,
proposed
to leave Paris; but my father is hastening there
to prevent him, and has offered to aid him in the cause
of the king. The strange revolution going on there
my father thinks will be put down very soon; and he
is willing, if his majesty wishes, to enter into his
service
.
You know he spent his youth in the army.
It is a very dangerous journey, said Claude.
But he expects a high office from the kingand
is determined to go immediately.
We shall not see you again, then! said Claude.
No; and I am very fortunate in this opportunity
to bid you farewell. My father will be disengaged, I
believe, in a moment. She held out her hand. I
wish you all happiness, Mr. Wyndham.
This was the weak moment which Claude had
scarcely the strength to resist. He took the hand
extended
to him. He attempted to speak, but after the
first word his utterance failed. To have indicated by
the slightest pressure of that hand the feelings of his
bosomto have expressed with a gesture what words
refused to utterto have raised those soft fingers to
his lips, as they yet lingered in his, were the impulses
of his soul. But he was one of those men who had
learned to govern himself, to make sacrifices, to resist
impulses, and to act with honour in all the most
minute
and secret affairs of life. He dropped the hand
almost coldly; but all his prudence could not prevent
the thought which swelled his heart from finding
utterance
,
Is it for ever?
Her eyes met his, and she replied,
It is for ever.
There was a step. She was gone; and he rose and
hastily dashed the drops from his eyes, to meet the
conceited and unrelenting father of the being whom he
now loved with more fervour than ever, and who was to
bless his eyes no more.
Well, sir, said Carolan, sitting down by a table,
without asking his visiter to follow his example, what
procures me the honour of this visit?
Count Carolan, said Claude, advancing quietly,
and even respectfully, to the table, for he had now not
even the desire to retaliate the rudeness of this weak
man, I have come to state to you that the sum for
which you imprisoned me is paid.
I have no time myself to arrange these affairs with
you, but my lawyer will.
No, monsieur, it is already arranged; but I wish,
before separating from you, without the probability of
our ever meeting again, to inform you, that the debts
which, by a very peculiar accident, I found myself
unable
to pay in the commencement of the summer, are
now all discharged; not by any arrangement or any
accident, but by the results of my personal labour.
I have nothing to do with all this, sir. It may be
true or not. I have neither the time nor the inclination
to inquire, as your character and yourself are equally
indifferent to me.
Could no proof make you publicly unsay, at least,
that part of the aspersions which I learn you have cast
on my honesty in pecuniary matters?
I know nothing of you or your affairs, sir; and I
wish to know nothing of them. When a man has
deceived
me once, I find it quite enough. My hospitality
is sometimes abused by persons whom I take up on
too slight grounds
Take up! Count Carolan.
But I am a little too well read in human nature to
suffer myself to be betrayed twice by the same
person
;
one of the servants will show you out, sir; and,
our mutual affairs being now settled, I hope He
rose and rang the bell.
Adieu, sir, said Claude; if I thought you
capable
of distinguishing between right and wrong, I would
ask you to reflect hereafter that you have refused to
do justice to the character which you have proofs is
free from reproach, and that you have not thought it
unworthy of your courage to insult a person who mildly
claimed your good opinion, and whom you know to be
without the defence usually possessed by gentlemen
under the same circumstances.
I can't remain listening to you, sir, all day; and
you will excuse me
They were interrupted by a loud shriek. It was
sudden and piercing, and announced extreme terror.
It was followed by a confusion of various noises, an
opening of doors, a treading of feet, and several voices
calling out.
What can that be? said the count, his pompous
manner leaving him entirely; and they both hastened
out, Claude as much agitated as he, for he thought he
recognised the voice which had uttered the scream as
Ida's. They ran across two or three rooms, which
seemed to their eager suspense interminable, and
reached, at length, the large hall used sometimes as a
dining and sometimes as a ball room. At the
farther
end a sight met their view which wellnigh
deprived
them of the power of motion. Ida, her hands
Vol. II.O
extended, her face struck with terror, stood shrinking
from the fury of a stranger, apparently in a delirium
of rage and revenge. He held a large pistol in each
hand, of which one was presented at the breast of
the fainting girl. The servants, called by her shrieks,
had crowded the doors; but as the maniacfor it
was Rossi, in a fearful paroxysm of insanity
turned
his dreadful eye and levelled weapon upon them,
they crowded and shrunk back with hasty terror.
Never was a more frightful object than the unhappy
young man at this moment. His livid face wore
the hideous grin of a lunatic. His thick hair was
wild about his head. He mowed and chattered to
himself, and pointed first his long finger and then the
pistol at the terrified being whose charms had driven
his senses awreck. At the same time, he made wry
faces, sometimes at her, and sometimes at beings who
seemed to be hovering around him in the air; and his
motions were so sudden and fantastic, that no one could
have seen him thus abandoned to all the ecstasy of
madness, even in chains, without horror and fear. But
now, thus armed, all gave up Ida as lost. It was a
moment
of most intense and agonizing expectation, and
the wretched being went on mowing and chattering to
himself till the foam stood upon his lips.
Rossi, said Claude, advancing upon him
cautiously
,
while Carolan stood petrified in motionless
despair.
The terrible intruder turned at the sound of his
voice, and laughed till the hall echoed again.
Ah ha! said he, where is Elkington now? He
struck me onceoh Godthe dog! the reptile! But
the sacrifice is prepared! Why does he not come to
claim his wife?
Rossi, my kind friend, said Claude, in a soothing
voice, but one which trembled with horror, lest, ere he
could succeed in grasping him, he might fire upon the
sweet girl, upon whose bloody sacrifice he seemed so
determined.
What! cried Rossi, you will come forward?
Stir an inchstir one hair's breadth, and she dies!
and he levelled both his pistols at Ida.
Carolan started to rush forward, but Rossi extended
his arm with a gesture which arrested at once the
advance
of the agonized father.
Keep his attention this way, said Claude to
Carolan
,
in a low tone, and I will secure him!
I will, murmured Carolan, shaking in every limb;
I will, I will. Here you have not the courage to
look at
me
, you foul madman, he continued.
Not the
courage?
echoed Rossi; and he darted
upon Carolan, but suddenly he stopped. With the
shrewdness of a madman, he suspected a connivance,
and he turned to look for Claude. He perceived him
now fairly in the middle of the floor, alone, and
completely
between him and Ida. At this sight his fury
seemed lashed into new delirium. He stamped his
foot and exclaimed,
Stand aside! You canting, ignominious fool,
stand aside! Will you too fall? Away. I am going
to fire. The hourthe instant has come. I have
gloated for months on this moment. At length it is
here. Leave her to her fate.
Claude stood back before Ida. Had he advanced
to seize him, he could have fired at her by changing
his position. His only hope was to shield her with
his person, even if it could be done only by receiving
the ball in his own body. He placed himself,
therefore
,
before her in such a way as to protect her
entirely
from danger.
No, no, cried Ida, convulsively; noble!
generous
!
no, no
But, as she spoke, Rossi fired, and the ball lodged in
the wall within an inch of Claude's head.
Step aside, I say, reptile! howled the maniac
again, advancing with the other pistol drawn, and
gnashing his teeth with fiendish rage; but Claude stood
firm, lifted his tall figure so as to shield completely the
form of Ida, and fixed his eye steadily on his
adversary
,
who advanced so near as to make the destruction
of one of his intended victims almost certain. He had
approached to within two or three yards, and was in
the act of pulling the trigger, when Ida fainted and
fell heavily upon Claude's arm, who stamped his
foot suddenly, and exclaimed, Fire, and at the same
time rushed forward with his burden in such a way as
to throw the maniac from his aim. He started, and at
the same moment the pistol was discharged. A shriek
of horror burst from all the household who had
assembled
to witness this frightful scene. The ball again
buried itself in a splendid door at a still greater
distance
from its intended objects. Carolan himself,
accompanied
by twenty servants, now leaped upon the
unfortunate wretch, who, in the impotence of his fury,
had dashed the heavy butt of the pistol into his own
head with a force which wounded him dangerously.
All was now confusion. Claude committed the
senseless
form of the fair girl he had saved at such imminent
risk to the arms of her trembling father; who, as
often happens with men of feeble understanding, had
been so bewildered and stunned by the greatness of
the danger, that, whatever might have been his
courage
,
he did not know what to do. Had he advanced,
he believed it would only have been to behold his
daughter murdered long before he could reach her or
the assassin.
A confusion of joy now took place of the despair
which had, till the securing of Rossi, filled every mind.
Claude was the object of universal admiration. In the
dangerous crisis in which he found himself, he had
exhibited
a self-possession and courage which surprised
everybody, and which alone had saved the life of Ida.
That he had ever been suspected of
cowardice
was
now a matter of astonishment; and it was acceded
that few men would have so calmly faced almost
certain
death. The idea that he had suffered a blow
rather than fight a duel now received a kind of
interest
,
which raised him to a rank above that of a merely
brave man. Simple bodily courage is by no means a
rare gift; and, when possessed without moral courage,
does not entitle a man to the high standing which he
sometimes claims on account of it.
CHAPTER XIX.
Ida
had no sooner been safely conveyed to her
apartment, than Carolan returned to seek Claude, with
an embarrassment which he could scarcely conceal.
He had not an understanding sufficiently enlarged to
teach him how to act on such an occasion; and the
dictates of his heart, however naturally good, had so
long been subservient to his vanity, that it had ceased
to serve him as a useful guide. He thanked the
preserver
of his daughter with a gratitude which was not
free from condescension; and, in acknowledging the
debt, he showed that he wished it had not been
incurred
.
He had neither learned to forgive nor to ask
forgiveness
;
graces which belong only to sense and feeling.
On the day after this event Ida had quite
recovered
from the effects of her fright, and Carolan sent a
servant to Claude's humble lodging to say she would
be happy to see and thank her preserver. The note
was couched in terms of cold pride, in which the
inflated
character of the count was easily visible. Claude
was carefully informed that the meeting was at the
request
of the count himself.
Without taking umbrage at the eccentric weakness
of a character in which he felt little interest, on the
next day he repaired to Carolan's house at the
appointed
hour. The count met him in the study. He
wished his daughter, he said, to thank him for her
deliverance
,
as he did himself, with a stately gratitude
and an offer of his purse to any amount.
O 2
After the great service you have rendered me,
said he, I will freely supply your pecuniary wants
to any extent. You may call upon my banker during
my absence in France, whither a high public duty calls
me. My daughter is weak, and I trust you will not
trespass too much
Were it left to my choice, said Claude, I should
prefer not to oppress her with the useless task of
returning
thanks, which you consider so requisite.
You will permit me to say this is at your
request
?
asked the count.
Certainly.
His brow cleared up.
Well, then, be it so; to say the truth, she is not
well, and we start early to-morrow morning. Such
men as I are demanded by the perilous state of affairs
in France, where all the chivalry and talent of
Europe
ought to concentrate itself; and I deem it proper
as well due to myself as from an imperative sense
of duty to his gracious majesty the King of France,
and, indeed, to the cause of royalty over the worldto
offer my poor talents, such as they are. I believe the
cause will not be lighter for my attaching myself to it.
A high consciousness of the manner in which I have
performed all my duties, makes me hope that I shall
not be an unacceptable accession to his majesty's
strength. It would afford me pleasure to ask you to
drive with me to-day; but Prince Lhas begged to
come, and
It would be impossible for me to avail myself of
your politeness, said Claude, his feelings towards the
daughter scarcely enabling him to preserve a decent
exterior of respect before the father.
Then, Mr. Wyndham, adieu; and if, as I trust I
may hope, you deem my friendship worth accepting
he held out his fore finger for Claude to shake
it may be a pleasure for you to know that you have
it. I am going outshall I set you down?
Claude declined the offer, bowed, and, without
receiving
the fore finger so condescendingly offered, took
his leave.
The next day the Carolans took their departure for
France.
In the mean time, the town rang with the gallantry
of the action he had performed, and he suddenly
became
a kind of
lion
. This ill suited his simple habits,
and he withdrew from attentions which he did not
greatly value, and could not accept without
embarrassment
from his limited pecuniary means.
Poor Rossi had been taken from Carolan's to the
asylum, where, in a week, although everything
possible
was done for him, and Claude visited him every
day, he died. With him a strange life was closed
endured
without profit to himself or othersa mind
undisciplined
a
heart not cultivated properlypassions
without restraint or religion to govern them. His
weak understanding had been rendered weaker by the
want of education and moral principle; and to such a
being the world is so full of dangers and painsto be
incurred without support, or endured without
recompense
that
even pity could scarcely sigh over his
early grave. It was observed, in his last ravings, that
the prominent incident in his imagination was the blow
he had received from Elkington. He fancied it had
left a festering spot upon his foreheadthat the
disgrace
was one which could be washed out, not by a
life of equal courage and simple virtue, but by
revenging
himself on Elkington, either by the sacrifice of
himself or some one dear to him. There must be
blood
, thought the poor maniac, ere I shall be able
to recover from the humiliation. Claude witnessed
his closing scene with many serious reflections; and
he was startled to remember what similar thoughts of
blind revenge and reckless passion had filled his own
mind the night when he himself had been struck by
Elkington. He too had been tainted with the Gothic
idea that anything could stain an immortal soul but its
own evil passions, and that it was permitted one weak
human being to solace his own rage by shedding the
blood of another. He too had thought of a duelof
self-destructionof murderof madness. But his
calmer nature had recovered itself amid its
communings
with the elements, had listened to the voice of
God in the air, and seen his lessons in the heaven.
Thus the master of himself, he turned from the
temptations
of the world; and, depending on his Creator
alone, trod the painful path of right with the hisses of
all around him ringing in his ears.
CHAPTER XX.
It
was a curious coincidence in this passage of the
life of Wyndham, that Rossi was scarcely dead when
a message from Carl, his quondam domestic,
earnestly
prayed his presence at the criminal prison, where,
confined after having been convicted of murder, he
was awaiting execution. Absorbed in other affairs,
and partly in consequence of the silence and privacy
with which such matters are conducted in Prussia,
Claude had received no intelligence of this till a note
from Carl made him acquainted with his dreadful
situation
.
He immediately complied with his request, and
was admitted to the convict's cell. It was with
difficulty
that he recognised him, so much was he altered
by confinement and agony of mind. He was pale and
haggard. His manner had lost all its gayety, and he
seemed several years older than before.
It is so good of monsieur to come, said he, on
seeing Claude. I want, before I quit the world, to
ask your pardon for the injury I have done you.
I grant it, most sincerely, said Claude.
I have been a bad fellow, monsieur; but I have
repented, and I die with a full faith in our blessed
Redeemer
.
I am content to die. I deserve it.
Can nothing be done to commute your
punishment
?
asked Claude.
No, monsieur. All has been done that was
possible
.
My father and mother are both here. They
have sought mercy of his majesty, but he has not
thought proper to accord it; and yet my crime was
not without provocation. You have doubtless heard
what goaded me on to kill this man for whose death I
am to be punished?
No, I have not heard it.
He was my master, and a very bad, brutal man.
He was not a good master as you were, but he was
always
scolding me. One day he called me so many
names that I could not prevent myself replying, and I
told him no gentleman would use such terms to his
servant. He instantly struck meand I have never
yet submitted to a blow with patienceI strove to
strike him back, but he was too strong for me. I
asked him if he dared to meet me in the fieldfor I
was born, sir, in a much higher station than a
domestic
but
he only laughed at me. I went to complain
to the police. He declared I had offered to strike him
first, and the police dismissed my complaint. What
was I to do? Where was I to seek redress? I had
often sworn that no one should ever strike me without
my being revenged. I had heard many others swear
the same. A blow I could not bear; and finding all
other modes of righting myself in vain, I killed him
with an axe, set the house on fire, and fled. I was
pursued, overtaken, tried, condemned, and am now
waiting the day of my execution. They say nothing
can save me. But I have repented of my crime, and
am resigned to my fate.
Can I do anything for you? said Claude,
shocked
almost beyond the power of speech by this scene.
Grant me your pardon. It is all I ask. Besides
the wickedness you detected me in, I have committed
many others. I have often robbed you of trifling
things, such as I thought you would never miss. I
often neglected your commands, and told you I had
obeyed you when I had not. Lord Elkington and
Lady Beverly are very bad people; and they paid me
to tell all I could find out about you. But I have
partially
repaired my crime against you, as Madame Wharton
will tell you. I could communicate a great secret,
but she made me promise not to do so, and I shall not
die with a lie on my lips. You can do nothing else
for me, unless, indeed, to be present at the last
moment
.
Promise me you will be there. I shall feel a
consolation in thinking there is one person who
regards
me with mercy and pity.
I promise, said Claude; and, in the mean time,
beg you will let me do all that is possible to alleviate
your situation.
No, no, I do not wish to see you again. I have
done with earthly things, and must prepare forfor
hereafter.
He turned pale, and added,
Ah, Mr. Wyndham, had I but been an honest man,
and served you faithfully, how different would now be
my situation!
A priest here came in; and, as Claude withdrew,
the poor fellow clasped his hand and kissed it
earnestly
.
Adieufor ever. May you be happyand you
will be
. Remember the words of a dying man.
Claude left the prison much impressed in favour of
Carl, who seemed to have been unprincipled more from
the want of reflection than innate hardness of heart.
It was about one month after this interview that
the announcement of an execution caused a sensation
of lively horror throughout Berlin, where these
frightful
spectacles were rarely seen. According to his
promise, Claude resolved to be present. It was on
a magnificent day in July that he went forth, at three
o'clock in the morning, to behold the unnatural
ceremony
of depriving a human being of that life which
has been bestowed by the hand of God. The scene
of this bloody operation was just on the outside of one
of the city gates, on a wide, level sand-plain. The
morning was one of those when the earth, air, and
heaven wear a more than usually resplendent aspect.
The sky was without a cloud. The pale moon was
seen declining in the west, and the sun had just risen
with a brilliancy that promised great heat during the
day. The air was fresh and cool, and the breeze, here
and there wafted over a dewy garden, came full of
delicious odours. There was a stir perceptible over
the whole town as soon as he issued from his door,
and groups of persons might be seen stepping along,
with marks of haste in their air and countenance; as
he continued on his way the number increased, and
carriages
,
carts, wagons, and droskies occasionally rattled
by, till at length, turning into the long, narrow street
which led to the gate on the outside of which the
execution
was to take place, he found a dense throng
walking with a rapid pace all in the same direction;
and the street was crowded with vehicles, of which
the occupants, as well as the thousands of pedestrians,
were, almost without exception, talking together with
loud, gay voices, some jesting and laughing, some
singing and shouting, and a few here and there
brandishing
bottles or huge sausages, which furnished their
morning meal, and which was devoured with an
hilarious
mirth strangely contrasted with the solemn
spectacle
they were hastening to witness.
Half an hour's walk, through a multitude every
instant
growing more dense, on the whole well behaved,
and composed in a considerable proportion of women
and children, brought Claude through the gate and
along one of the suburbs to a road leading into a vast,
open field of heavy sand, in a corner of which a black
mass of human beingsswarming like a cluster of
bees around three dark, massive columns of brick,
placed in the form of a triangle, immediately behind a
broad platform, also built of brick, and surrounded by
an iron balustradeannounced the fatal point of
attraction
.
On either side of the scaffold, at the distance of
fifty or sixty yards, were several small, natural
elevations
of ground, on one of which, and fronting the
dreadful
stage where the dire act was so soon to be
performed
,
Claude took his stand. He could perceive a few
paces from him, and at the foot of the scaffold, a
newly-dug
grave. In a short time the increasing thousands
had surrounded him, and in another half hour his eye,
wherever it wandered, met nothing but the dense
masses
of human beings, packed close as in a theatre. The
murmur of those thousands and thousands of voices, all
blended into one sound, all full of one thought, of one
expectation, could be heard rising into the air, like the
rush of the surf on the distant beach. In a few
moments
several carriagesof the different functionaries
who, from curiosity or duty, attended the scenedrove
up a narrow passage kept open through the crowd by
the mounted
gens d'armes
. Then came a body of
cavalry, who were drawn up in a hollow square around
the scaffold. Several companies of infantry followed,
all silently and briefly disposed in the same solemn
array; and a group of officers gathered in the centre
at the foot of the scaffold, conversing together with
cheerful courtesy, and exchanging gayly the greetings
of the day. It seemed almost a mockery to Claude,
that all this formidable array of forcethese stern
troopsthese glittering and bristling armsthese
trampling horsesshould be gathered together on
account
of one helpless, trembling, feeble creature,
bound, and opposing against the appalling preparations
only his misery, his weakness, his humble prayer, his
ghastly and terror-stricken face.
As yet no one had appeared upon the scaffoldthat
solitude to be presently filled by such unnatural actors.
At length a single form mounted upon it. He bore on
his arm a basket, and sprinkled from it many handfuls
of wet sand or sawdust. He descended, and another
mounted the next moment, bearing a heavy burden,
which he at length deposited. It was set with some
care to secure it a firm stand. It was the block. He
who placed it was smoking a segar. A broad leathern
strap hung from it on one side, and a cord was flung
down carelessly upon it. A hum of horror followed
each of these proceedings; and the attention of the
vast concourse, fixed with an intense interest upon
these ominous arrangements, hushed them to a
profound
silence and motionlessness, except when some
trivial preparation gave a token more of the dire act
about to be perpetrated, and drew forth a new
murmur
of horror.
The hour for the execution was fixed at six o'clock.
It now wanted five minutes. Every face in that vast
multitude was turned towards the narrow channel
which had been kept open through it by the gens
d'armes for the melancholy cortge about to appear.
At length a troop of horse rode up, and a
half-suppressed
cry announced that hethe unhappy object of
this deep curiosity, of these appalling preparations
had arrived. A heavy common wagon appeared. In
it were two priests. Seated on the floor of it, with his
back to the horses, without a hat, was Carl. He
caught Claude's eye as he passed, and kissed his hand
to him. He looked calm, but dreadfully pale.
At the foot of the scaffold there was a pause. They
stopped beside the grave; the unhappy being must
have looked into it as he passed. He alighted from the
wagon, and some moments were occupied in reading
the sentence and other customary forms.
In the mean time, six or eight persons had mounted
the scaffold. They were common-looking men, in
their ordinary dress. They walked backward and
forward
,
turned their eyes towards the vast, hushed
multitude
on every side, or regarded the group of priests
and officers gathered about the prisoner. One of them,
also, was smoking a segar. They had a careless, rude
air, which jarred upon the feelings of many a gazer.
Vol. II.P
The preliminary ceremony being over, several
persons
mounted the scaffold. Among them were two
who struck every eye, and drained the blood from
every cheek. One was the fine-looking, erect young
man about to yield his life to the society which thus
repulsed him. The other was a giant in stature and
strengthhis hair sprinkled with graywithout his
coatand holding in his hand
an axe
. They had no
sooner mounted than some one approached Carl and
spoke to him. He started slightly at first, but,
instantly
complying, took off his coat, his waistcoat, his
cravat, and rolled down his shirt off his neck and
shoulders
to the waist. He then stood erect over the block,
clasped his hands, and lifted his eyes towards heaven
in prayer. His face was turned towards Claude,
whose whole system thrilled with unspeakable horror
at the thoughts of his sensations in that tremendous
moment. The endless mass of heads on every side
was uncoveredmotionlesshushed. Claude looked
around on the scene so fair and beautiful. The
morning
sun mounting up the east, pouring gladness and
abundance on so many millions of human beings
the bending skythe waving treesthe distant city,
whose roar could be heard rising on the summer air,
and then at these vast crowdsthose dark columns
that gray-headed giant leaning on his axeand this
young man, in the fullness of life, health, and strength,
about to be thrust by his fellow-beings into eternity.
Even as he stood thus a moment committing himself
to God, and taking his last look at the nature so bright,
so soft, so fair, so happy, the breeze, full of freshness,
and balm, and gladness, and perfume, came kissing the
murmuring tree-tops, and lifted the hair from that
doomed head; the birds were warbling in the groves;
the flowers were blooming in the gardens; the streams
were gurgling through the wood; and a flock of
pigeons
came floating down to the very top of the
scaffold
,
and made a circle around it, their white breasts
shining in the light, and thenso near that the
trembling
victim might have heard the whirring of their
wings, full of freedom and joyswept off again, and
were lost in the sunshiny distance.
The next instant the wretched being knelt and laid
his neck on its last resting-place; the strap was
instantly
fastened over his shoulders, and his arms were
tied to the block. The executioner advancedlifted
the axe, to lay its edge lightly on the spot he would
strike. There was a blow, and an object fell heavily
and rolled upon the scaffold. Some hand raised it by
the hairheld the face, bloody, turbid, and convulsed,
one instant to the crowdand then wrapped it in a
white napkin, which instantly assumed the same gory
hue. Hasty hands unloosed the cord and strap, and
a headless trunk was carelessly borne down and thrown
into the grave already dug.
It was to avoid the odium of bearing
a blow
that
the wretched youth had sought the fate of a felon.
There are readers who will shrink from this scene
who will find it too revolting to be described. Yes,
it is revolting; but it should be painted in all its
details
,
till the most audacious outrage upon humanity
ever sanctioned by human laws shall be struck from
the code of civilized nations. That which it is not
permitted to describe should not be permitted to take
place in the open daybefore the public eyebefore
boyswomenchildren. Were all to witness the
frightful spectacle, this ancient and barbarous custom
would cease. If we have dared to hold the hideous
picture up, it is that people who never give their
attention
to such things may knowmay see what goes
on about themwhat they are liable to meet in their
morning walkopenly perpetrated in the bright
sunshine
in
the public streets.
CHAPTER XXI.
The
Carolans had not been long gone when strange
reports became general of the increasing anarchy in
France. It was said that the utmost prudence was
requisite in every resident of that unhappy country to
avoid fatal collisions with one or the other of the
raging
parties. Every day brought fugitives who
described
their flight to have been attended with
unheardof
perils. It was at length stated that the frontiers of
France were closed against
all
future departures, and
that the royal family themselves wished to leave their
throne and native land, but were unable to do so.
Day after day the accounts grew more alarming.
Prussia, as indeed all Europe, was becoming more
and more agitated. Poor Claude would have followed
Carolan into France had he possessed the pecuniary
means; but, alas! the interest excited by his private
affairs
was merged in that of the general welfare. The
most enthusiastic admirers of English abandoned their
studies for thoughts of a much more serious kind, and
Claude found himself destitute. His friends had
disappeared
.
Lavalle had gone to France again some
time before. The Prussian army was put in motion.
A tempest, vague and dark, seemed lowering over
mankind. All Europe trembled. The Countess
Carolan
received news of her husband which threw her
into a maladyfrom which she was threatened to be
speedily released by death. Carolan, it was said, had
been seized by the revolutionistsaccused of
attempting
to aid the kingand thrown into prison, from which
it was feared he would not escape with his life. Of
Ida and St. Marie, no news could be obtained. It was
a dreadful year; and as for Claude, in addition to all
his apprehensions for Ida, he was often at a loss for
means to support life. No one would lend money at
such a period; and, had there been lenders, he had no
right to borrow what he saw no prospect of being able
to repay. All occupation was at a stand. Europe
appeared
waiting, as men do beneath a black cloud, from
which they look each moment to see burst the
dreadful
bolt, without daring to conjecture where it is to
fall. In the actual course of necessity, to prevent
himself
from starving, he had contracted a bill at a baker's.
It was for the simplest aliment which could sustain the
body. It was for common bread. He owed the baker
one thaler. The man demanded his money. Claude
could not pay it. This new creditor was a large,
portly
,
broad-shouldered person, with no neck, and a high,
square head, the size of which almost amounted to
deformity
.
His features were all, in a corresponding
degree
,
large and uncouth. His eyes were round, green,
and protuberant, and shaded by large shaggy brows.
His nose was bloated, purple, and with hairs growing
on the end. His mouth stretched from ear to ear, and
his whole countenance, ploughed with time and
debauchery
,
and Heaven knows what volcanic passions,
looked like some ragged rock rent apart by a
convulsion
of nature. No smile ever softened those
deeply-indented
outlines, as no human feelings found their
way into his long-hardened heart. His voice was
hoarse, deep, and guttural; and when he spoke, even
on the most trivial occasions, he grew red in the face
with choler. His head was perfectly whitehis
limbs were swollen and goutyhis feet resembled
those of an elephanthis hands were full of knots like
the gnarled branches of some immemorial oak, and he
had a spirit as unbendable. He was worth, men said,
300,000 thalers, accumulated by grasping every cent.
On finding Claude's inability to pay, this curious old
veteran, who perhaps might be regarded as something
of a maniac in his way, sued him and obtained
judgment
,
and took measures to cast him into prison.
He shall stay there his year, said he, or pay me
my thaler.
P 2
Claude went to him, in company with the sheriff's
officer who had arrested him, and endeavoured to soften
his heart. The old man became furious at the sight
of him. His face, always half purple, grew fiery with
rage, and he swore he would have his thaler or his
body.
You are a scoundrel, said he, to rob me of my
money. You are my slave till you pay me. I hold
to the law. Go! away with him. He is a robber.
And Claude was thrown into the very prisonthe
very roomand with the very people who had
formerly
been his companions under the same
circumstances
,
although with two or three ominous
exceptions
.
In this position, Claude found himself at the lowest
step of the ladder. He was a beggara wretcha
slave. He saw no other prospect than a year's
confinement
.
An unutterable anguish came cold and
deadening over his heart as he turned his eyes about
the room, and regarded the gloomy, pitiless walls
which had enclosed himwhich were to shut him out
from the world. As for soliciting aid, he knew no one
among all his acquaintances to whom he could apply
but St. Hillaire, Lavalle, and Madame Wharton. All of
these were absent. For an instant the thought of
self-destruction once more rose in his mind. The
resources
of his life seemed to be exhausted. He had
struggled against a fate that was too much for him.
Fortune, as if resolved to pursue him with persevering
malice, had stripped him of everything which cheers,
adorns, and blesses human life. No domestic
affection
shed an interior sunshine on his heart. No
revered
and beloved fatherno affectionate and
ever-watchful
motherno sister, with her unchanging
fidelity
and attachmentno brother, bound to him with the
sustaining ties of friendship and truthof old
associations
and mutual confidence. The only affection which
had ever risen in his breast was quenched in dark and
hopeless humiliation; and he felt that, in addition to
all these, poverty, captivity, disgracethe desertion of
his friendsthe disgust he had conceived at the
conduct
of some from whom he had expected nobler
conduct
the
silence and apparent forgetfulness of Madame
Wharton, who had impressed him with a warm esteem
and friendship, altogether seemed to present life
worthless
,
and death as the greatest happiness which could
befall him. He reflected what an old Roman would do
when honour, hope, and all were lost; and the words of
the lofty and philosophic Cassius rose to his lips with
a sad and solemn meaning:
Cassius from bondage will deliver Cassius:
Therein, ye gods, ye make the weak most strong;
Therein, ye gods, you tyrants do defeat:
Nor strong tower, nor walls of beaten brass,
Nor airless dungeon, nor strong links of iron,
Can be retentive to the strength of spirit;
But life, being weary of these worldly bars,
Never lacks power to dismiss itself.
If I know this, know all the world besides,
That part of tyranny that I do bear,
I can shake off at pleasure.
But, happily, he had learned to govern his impulses,
and to seek his rules of action in a better school than
the erring genius of heathen philosophy. A man who
has borne slander, insult, and a blow from a sense of
right, and who has turned from the woman he loved
without a look rather than lead astray a young heart
disposed to requite his affection, will do nothing rash,
but has in it a principle of the truest courage as a
support
in the darkest hour. With an humble prayer to
Him who can cast down and put up, who giveth and
who taketh away, he filed his mindhe turned in
upon himselfrepressed his despair, and resolved to
await with resignation the will of Heaven.
CHAPTER XXII.
He
had passed thus several days with all his
philosophy
and religion, pale, sad, and silent, when the
jailer called him down to receive a visiter.
It was a stranger, booted and spurred in the
English
fashion, and speaking the English language. He
approached and handed two letters. Claude opened
and read. The first was as follows:
London, etc., etc.
Messrs. W. P. & Co., Berlin.
Gentlemen
:
At the request of the Marquis of E, and for his
account, we hereby open a credit with you in favour of
Mr. Claude Wyndham, for 1000 sterling, say one
thousand pounds sterling, which you will please to
supply him with, as he may require the same, on his
presenting to you this letter.
We are, gentlemen,
Yours truly,
N. B. & Co.
The other was from Madame Wharton. The first
words thrilled him with emotion, which would have
been rapture had it not been so mingled with
bewilderment
and incredulity.
My sonmy beloved son
!
You, who have borne adversity with greatness, will,
I trust, meet prosperity with dignity. I have at length
succeeded in throwing back the veil which Heaven in
its wisdom had allowed to fall over us. You are, as
from the first moment my secret presentiment might
have taught me, the child of my bosom. Enclosed is
a package which I have prepared for you. It reveals
your history and mine. I would give you no
intimation
of my convictions till they were confirmed. Not
from my hand should you receive a new
disappointment
.
The bill which accompanies this is your own.
Do not hesitate to use it. It is but a small part of the
inheritance of which you are now the master. Your
father was the Earl of Beverly. That title is now
yours. He has just expired, having previously
completed
all the arrangements essential to your
undisputed
assumption of his titles and estates. This great
blessing of Providence I am fain to receive as a reward
for a life spent in the path of
right;
but, in receiving
it, let us not forget that all earthly blessings come
mixed with calamity, and that there is no state of steady
happiness but beyond the grave. I write to you
calmly
,
my beloved son, from the very intensity of my
feelings
.
I did not put pen to paper till I had calmed
them by prayer, and sought from Him who gives and
takes away the strength necessary to support me in
this mixed hour of joy and sorrow. I have much to
tell you, and my bosom yearns to hold you again, my
son! Come to me as soon as you can, without
neglecting
duties more imperative. I have seen you
sorely
tried, and I know you to be equal to your own
guidance
;
but remember that life is short, and the greatest
happiness I can now know is your society.
Everything
is arranged for you without trouble. On
reaching
London you will drive to your own mansion in
Grosvenor Square, lately occupied by your father,
and just as he left it. The Marquis of E acts as
your agent till your arrival, and begs me to say how
profoundly he rejoices at this important change in your
prospects. Come, my son! I would repeat the
sacred
name, and I would repeat ever, to the Disposer
of human events, my prayer of grateful thanks for
being permitted to write myselfyour affectionate,
Your too happy
mother
,
Ellen Lawton
.
The packet which accompanied this was, as stated
by Madame Whartonwhom, as well as Claude, we
shall continue to call by her old namea full history
of the circumstances which attended her marriage, her
separation from her husband, her subsequent life, the
loss and apparent death of her child, with divers other
particulars, many of which the reader is already
acquainted
with. It is to be regretted that the space
allotted
to our history will not permit us to give this
letter
,
embracing, as it did, not only the past adventures
of the ladywho now showed herself as able to bear
prosperity as she had been to bear adversitybut the
circumstances which first awakened her attention
respecting
Claude  her reveries, her suspicions, her
hopes, and, lastly, her convictions, that the singular
interest
she had taken in the stranger who bore so
remarkable
a resemblance to her husband, from the first
moment she saw him, was not merely accidental. The
manuscript which the gracious permission of the
courteous
librarian who rules over the mute population
of immortal tomes in
la Bibliotheque du Roi
has
enabled
us to consult in throwing together our story,
gives this letter, with many marks of admiration and
wonder at the striking and (the writer says, in a note)
apparently improbable incidents which distinguished
the attempt of this injured lady to regain her rights in
behalf of her son, and to establish her own innocence.
It informs us of a fact, that at the interview between
Lady Beverly and Elkington, where this rash and
wicked person, trained by the habitual indulgence
of his passions, dared to strike even a womanand
that woman his mother, and where all that Lady
Beverly
knew of her history was revealed; it informs us
that
Carl
, who, on having been dismissed by Claude,
had been taken into the employ of Elkington, and who
was all the time ensconced under the bed between two
large portmanteaux, thus possessed himself of the whole
history; and, having already read all Claude's letters,
journals, &c., his active mind commenced examining
the subject as one worthy of his powers; and at length,
by a coincidence which would appear perfectly
natural
had we time to explain it, alighted upon the traces
of Madame Wharton as being one of the characters
in this game of blind-man's-buff. Thinking he might
make a good affair of it, he communicated to Madame
Wharton all he knew; which so perfectly accorded
with the thousand indications she had herself
discovered
,
that she set off for London to institute inquiries
and take the necessary measures. In this she had
been baffled for a long time, occasioning much delay;
but at length, by great sagacity and prudence, and the
aid of several distinguished auxiliaries, of whom the
Marquis of E was oneby recovering from the
heirs of Lord Perceval many of his private
memoranda
upon the history of Claude, which, from his likeness
to his father, Lord Perceval had also suspectedin
short, with Carl's evidence, and by an appeal to the
young noble, Lord , who had, with Lady Beverly,
been one of the instruments of her ruin, and who was
now a gouty, bloated, bed-ridden old man, willing to
purchase by any confession an exemption from the
consequences which the revival of his youthful
follies
would bring upon himin short, the whole
history
was made clear, that Lord Elkington and Lady
Beverly had been all the while absent from London,
the latter being too ill to travel; that it wanted but the
recovery of the earl to an hour's use of his senses to
procure his recognition of an innocent wife and a lost
son, both worthy of him. As if Fortune were loath to
spoil such a fine train of affairs, the earl recovered in
an unexpected manner, and was for several days in
the full possession of his strength and clear reason.
Our unpractised hand must not attempt to describe the
denoument
, nor relate the earl's emotions when
convinced
that he had committed a whole life of injustice
by prematurely crediting a calumny; and when he
beheld once more in his presence her who had left
him a radiant and tender girl, and pure as the dewy
rose, and who now appeared with the transformations
of twenty years in her person. Many traces of that
soft face, however, were preservedfor temperance and
virtue are potent cosmetics; and their mutual
recognition
furnished a scene fitter for the inspired hand of
Shakspeare than ours. Indeed, her visit to London
would itself furnish forth an edifying romance. The
lofty character and personal beauty of his son, when
they were recounted to the earl in this brief but
delicious
interval between life and death, swelled his
bosom
with unutterable joy and a natural desire to behold
him. But this was not to be gratified; for he had no
sooner, in presence of the Marquis of E and
several
others of his ancient friends, freely and legally
completed the arrangements necessary to the
succession
of Claude, and exchanged with his devoted wife
a pardon which strewed the dismal path of death with
roses, than the remorseless tyrant, who could wait no
longer, suddenly laid his cold hand upon him; and
Madame Wharton trembled to perceive that she had
recovered the treasure so priceless and so long lost, only
to behold itfor such is human joyslip again and
for ever from her grasp. Hence her triumph was sad,
and her success so mixed with sorrow, that the
dazzling
revolution in her condition did not disturb the
usual composure of her soul, or produce any
remarkable
change in her manners. A P.S. stated that the
bearer was a confidential valet of the Marquis of E,
and that his honesty, knowledge, and discretion were
to be implicitly trusted.
CHAPTER XXIII.
While
Claude was reading this long
communication
,
the messenger, who had been despatched on the
occasion as one capable of rendering the most
requisite
information and services under the present
circumstances
,
had ascertained the debt for which his
new master was imprisoned, and had sent to pay the
same. Claude had not finished studying this
deeply-interesting
letter when the order arrived for his
release
.
The man respectfully asked for his farther
commands.
Have the prisoners all assembled at once, said
Claude, and ascertain the aggregate amount of their
debts.
A group of poor devils gathered around with
awestruck
looks, for they had just learned that their
fellow-prisoner
was no less a personage than the Earl of
Beverly, and as rich as the king. The sum of their
debt was one hundred and eighty thalers. Some of
them had been confined for eleven months.
Pay them all, said Claude, and give every
man a five thaler note. Find out, also, an appropriate
caf
, and order a good dinner for them to drink my
health. Attend to this
first
.
The crowd of poor wretches, in their greasy
sheepskin
robes de chambre
, looked at each other and at
the beneficent being who, as if fallen from heaven, had
thus suddenly appeared among them. It was curious
to observe the various effects which the announcement
of their release had upon their respective deportments.
Some stood stupifiedsome danced, leaped about, and
shouted like madmensome ran up to him, knelt, and
kissed the hem of his coatsome broke out into fierce
exclamations of delight, mingled with oathsand one
stood perfectly still, betraying his emotion only by his
silent tears. It is possible that a portion of these
worthy
gentlemen would have done society quite as much
service under lock and key as at large; but there were
others who presented cases of homely but real
misfortune
.
The poor fellow last alluded to, whose eyes
filled with tears of gratitude and joy, Claude found
had been imprisoned for one thaler the day before.
He had left a sick, motherless child at home, and had
Vol. II.Q
gone out to buy medicine, when his creditor laid
hands on him, and, deaf to every prayer and
explanation
,
threw him into prison.
Other proper donations were ordered, particularly
to the good commissioner and the honest turnkey; and
James, with that unalterable respect with which a good
English servant always communicates with his
master
,
touched his hat and stated that a carriage was
ready, and that he had already procured apartments in
a hotel for his
lordship
. As one in an enchanting
dream, Claude took up his worn hat and prepared to
bid adieu for ever to this dismal abode. As he
reached
the lower corridor, prisoners, turnkeys,
commissioners
,
gens d'armes
, were all ranged on either side
to see him pass. Every hand was extended, every
face was lighted with joy. No kingly palace in
Europe
showed a happier picture on that day, and many
a one a more sad, than the medley of friends who
greeted, with hearty tokens of respect and admiration,
the now once more uplifted brow of our hero. As the
doors opened, and a waft of fresh air came to his
heated
face, and the honest fellows saw a plain but very
elegant carriage waiting, and their patron aided into it
by his servant, the ordinary restrictions of the prison
were forgotten alike by keeper and prisoner, and
three cheers were given, again, again, and again, so
that they had turned the corner before these
vociferous
ebullitions of triumph had died away.
Lost in astonishment, bewildered, and incredulous,
and fearing each moment to awake and find around
him the naked and blackened walls of a loathsome
prison, which were to bury him, perhaps for life, from
the blessed light of nature, Claude reached his hotel,
ordered a warm bath, some linen, and his old tailor.
He found that James had chosen the most fashionable
hotel in the town, and selected the best apartments in
it. He was, in fact, by a curious coincidence, in the
very rooms formerly occupied by Elkington, and from
which he had gone forth to the fatal encounter with
poor, poor Denham! and this presenting a new idea,
he sat down and instantly wrote his London banker
the name of that lady, and desired that she might be
sought and supplied with what funds she might
require
.
He wrote also to her. By this time his bath
a luxury he had not enjoyed for many a month
arrived
,
the men bringing it approaching him with
profound
salutations and distant awe. James ministered
to him like an angel. He not only supplied all his
slightest wishes before they were expressed, but he
even suggested them before they were formed; and as
if borne floating, without care or effort, on some
enchanting
tide, everything went exactly as it should.
Everybody came exactly at the proper moment. The
tailor had on hand, yet unsold, all his ample and
elegant
wardrobe. James himself was a barber, tailor,
housekeeper, valet, courier, counsellor, and friend, all
in one, and without ever presuming upon a smile or
look of familiarity, or performing his innumerable and
delightful services as other than the ordinary noiseless
and delicate attentions of a thorough-bred English
valet.
The bath was brought to his room. He was left
alone. He sat down on a sofa with a singular feeling.
He was now rich. The secret which had covered
him with odium and sorrow was revealed. He was
placed among the great and opulent of the earth.
Ida
,
who
loved him
all obstacles to their union were
removed
.
His heart, like a goblet full to overflowing,
trembled with the weight of its oppressive load. His
past lifehis lonelinesshis abandonmenthis prison
those dismal, filthy wallsthose rude, coarse crowds
among whom he had been thrusthis povertyhis
anguish
,
came sweeping over him now in such a solemn
and dark train of imagessuch phantoms of horror
such remorseless fiends, from whom he had been
rescued
by that unseen Hand whose aid he had invoked
all that despair and humiliation could not do, this
moment of happiness effected; and, overcome with his
emotions, he laid his face in his handsan agitation
like an earthquake passed through his soulshook the
very foundations of his beingand tears, such as he
had never shed before, rose to his eyelids and fell
silently
to the floor.
And God grant, he thought, as relieved by his
tears, an exquisite sense of the reality and luxury of
his new position came over him, that it may never
make my heart as hard and inflated as Carolan's.
Carolan! his mother! Ida! Thoughts pressed on
him too soft, too daring, too dazzling. His
unaccustomed
mind could not receive them. They pained
and oppressed by their brightness and magnitude.
He turned from them, resolving to give the day to
idleness
,
incapacitated as he was for any serious
employment
or meditation.
He had about half finished dinner when a waiter
announced a stranger.
But my lord is occupied, said James.
Claude startedwas he speaking of him?
My lord is at
dinner!
continued James.
The gentleman
must
see his lordship! said the
man, in an under tone. He says he is an old, dear
friend.
Lavalle! said Claude, with eager pleasure.
Show him in, James!
And with a good deal of noise and in a perturbation
of delight, hastening to him and embracing him with
the liveliest marks of friendship, in rushed Thomson.
My dear Wyndham! my dear, dear fellow! I
beg you ten thousand pardons for interrupting your
dinnerbut old friends, you know! Thank God! I
have found you at last. I have heard it all. I
congratulate
you, my dearest fellowI do, upon my soul!
I am the firstain't I? I have been travelling after
you in a drosky. I went down to the prisonto the
police.
Enfin vous voici!
I am the happiest dog in the
world. But what's the matter? You look illyou
look grave.
Allons!
Take a glass of Champagne.
Garon
, some wine! That will revive you. This is
too much for your shattered nerves.
Dieu!
how I
have felt for you!
James stood motionless, but glanced his eye at his
master.
Pour him out a glass of wine, James, said Claude,
coldly.
Thomson took it and drank it; but all its foaming
inspiration could not counteract the effect of the cold
courtesy with which Claude received him.
What!
Comment! vous ne buvez pas, mon
cher? Que diable!
What's the matter? I hope no
ill news.
Of a kind, said Claude, which will prevent my
enjoying the society of Mr. Thomson any longer;
therefore I shall make no apology for depriving
myself
of it. James, show the gentleman down.
Comment!
Positively!
c'est de rigueur!
Well,
I'll look in again. Don't think to get rid of me so
easily
,
mon cher
. Nothing I love better than old friends.
Adieu! Au revoir! a demain, mon enfant!
Don't
come to the stairs.
Au revoir!
The next dayfor the public journals had given the
news, although erroneously in many particulars, yet
correctly in the general outlinecarriage after carriage
came thundering to the door, and a regiment of
chasseurs
,
with a perfect shower of cards. Claude had
left orders to be out. As each card was brought in
upon a silver salver, by a white-gloved domestic, to
him who yesterday was on the point of starving in a
jail for a thaler! Claude saw, with that quiet
contempt
which the conduct of many people is calculated
to inspire for human nature, that they who had been
most marked in their slights of him in the moment of
his downfall, and who had not recognised him even
when he spoke to them, were now among the first to
call; but he saw also, with a bounding heart, the names
of many whom he sincerely esteemed and loved, and
who had been the same to him in all things, whether
Q 2
prosperity shone on him, or dark misfortune lowered
around his head. He was now on an eminence whence
he could choose his friends; and he resolved, while he
was courteous to all, and while he laid aside every
thought of relaliation against those who had exposed
their meanness and folly (except, indeed, individuals
who, like Thomson, had been offensive by their
impertinence
),
that he would cherish with sincerity those
gentle and refined hearts whose sweetness and purity
had been tasted when they could never expect any
return
.
The poor old woman with whom he had lodged
claimed his attention, and he settled on her a small but
sufficient annuity. He returned in haste the calls of
his brilliant friends, who once more sought him with
new avidity. He made friendly visits to a few
families
whom he really found worthy of lasting friendship.
He spent a long evening with the good Mr. Khl,
whose respect for him almost interfered with his
friendship, and who could call him nothing but
monseigneur
.
A few days were occupied on these matters.
He had written daily to his
mother;
and could we
present to the reader those effusions of his soul, now
for the first time giving vent to affections which had
been so long pent up in its hidden recesses, they would
be found interesting specimens of his mind and nature.
James proposed that they should set out immediately
for London; but then first learned, with a consternation
which he could not conceal, that his young master had
determined to go directly to France.
But your lordship does not know, perhaps, said
James, that France is in the whirl of a revolution
which threatens to swallow up thousands, without
discrimination of rank or innocence. The Marquis of
E is informed distinctly on the subject. If you
venture within the precincts of that unhappy country,
you will never escape alive. You are an Englishman,
and the slightest tinge in your accent will betray you
to the guillotine. Your rank and fortune will make
you but a more conspicuous mark. Your death is as
certain, my lord, as if you walked into the crater of a
volcano. It is infatuationit is madness.
No one
can live there without continual danger. The very
king is trembling for his life. I beg, I implore you
to abandon your design. Nothing but a conviction that
I am pleading for your life could make me so free in
addressing your lordship.
My good James, said Claude, I may confide to
you the secret that a valued friend is almost alone and
defenceless in the midst of these dangers, which you
depict, I do not doubt, without exaggeration. It is
true that my hope of even finding her is vagueof
rescuing
her is more so; but I am resolved to try.
Her?
said James; a lady! Then I fear it is
all over with us.
I may add, that she is one in whom Madame
in whom my
mother
is as much interested as I. You
must prepare everything for my departure to-morrow
morning.
Your lordship will excuse me from accompanying
you farther than the frontier, because I regard going
farther as certain death.
Certainly, said Claude; I shall go alone and
immediately.
James said no more, but shook his head ominously.
The next evening there was a grand
soire chez le
Prince R
. A strong curiosity prevailed to see the
young hero, whom fortune appeared to have rewarded
so munificently for his firm adherence to a principle.
The cause of Elkington's persecutions was now
perfectly
clear. Claude's courage once established, as it
had been by his brave deportment in the affair of Rossi
and Ida, his previous forbearance was found sublime;
and every one longed to greet him, and to repair by
their attentions their former neglect. The assembly
was crowded and brilliant in the extreme; and many a
beautiful toilet was arranged with additional care at
the thoughts that this now distinguished young
nobleman
was to behold it. The disappointment and
surprise
were great when it was understood that he had
that morning left town for
Paris!
Ah Dieu! was the general exclamation.
Il faut
du courage pour a!
CHAPTER XXIV.
It
was on the fifth of August, in the year 1792, that
Claude entered Paris. James had left him at the
frontier, and expressed his determination to remain at
Nymeguen during his sojourn in France, with a supply
of money to be sent in case of need, though he
presaged the most fearful difficulties and perils from
his present undertaking. The best arrangements
which his cool head and great experience in matters
connected with the Continentfor he had been many
years a courier, and spoke the French and German as
well as the Englishthe best arrangements he could
make were speedily agreed upon between them. A
man was employeda trusty and perfectly
confidential
Frenchman, by name Adolphe, long known to
Jamesto remain with him at Nymeguen, that, in case
of need, he might be the messenger between them.
An ample remuneration was offered him should he
be successful in his task. Of his fidelity there was no
doubt. Some plain clothes, such as were worn by the
most violent republicans of France, were procured for
Claude; and it was determinedfor his accent would
have scarcely betrayed the foreignerthat he should
pass for a Frenchman at any risk, and one fully
infected
with the revolutionary views. The address of a
man perfectly known to Adolphe, resident in Paris,
who could be applied to in emergency, and who could
probably supply what money was desired, was also
given. Thus prepared, with 100 Louis in his pocket,
a complete French Jacobin in costume, ready to meet
any peril, our young adventurer set forth on his search
after Carolan and Ida, determined never to abandon the
pursuit while the smallest possibility remained of
rendering
them service.
He entered Paris in the morning. The day was fair,
and imparted a singular beauty to the picturesque
streets and tall houses of this celebrated metropolis.
His first step was to visit Count la Tour, to whom he
had a particular letter of introduction in Berlin, as one
likely to know something of the now mysterious fate of
Carolan and his daughter. On his way to the
residence
of this person, he was struck with the singular
aspect of the town. This great city always awakens
the attention of the newly-arrived by its striking forms,
its streets, its dense, crowded lines of high houses, its
salient points and angleshere steeped in sunshine,
there merged in heavy shadow. Amid the heavy,
grotesque, interminable masses through which the
narrow
streets open on every side, in lines straight, circular,
serpentine, accustomed for some days to silent hills,
open plains, and green and tranquil woods, Claude,
although
perfectly acquainted with Paris, felt himself a
little bewildered. But it was the character of the
population
that now filled the streets which made his heart
tremble for the fate of those in whom he was deeply
interested. It was far different from that which
usually
imparted an air of gayety and enjoyment to the
most charming metropolis in the world. Hordes of
ruffians were seen lurking around, and bands of women
half clothed, having on their countenances the marks
of debauchery and evil passions. These debased
creatures
had an air of insolence which betrayed how
weak was the usual municipal authority, and how
secure
they felt themselves in the exercise of whatever
dissoluteness or misdemeanours they might choose to
be guilty of. They shouted, hooted, whooped, and
communicated
with each other by all kinds of uncouth
noises and obscene gestures. It was at once apparent
to Claude, that some convulsion either had happened
or was about to take place, for the population
presented
that appearance observable when any violent shock
passes over a large town, causing a kind of chymical
separation of the constituent parts of societythe
reputable
classes disappearing to the shelter of their own
houses, while the profligate and abandoned appear
from their dark lurking-places in the light of day.
These ruffians wore filthy jackets, large coarse
trousers
,
and red flannel caps. Many were equipped with
girdles furnished with pistols, dirks, and enormous
knives. He saw, with a new horror, that this rude
costume
,
by its general adoption, was not an accidental
dress, but a kind of uniform, assumed for, he shuddered
to conjecture what dreadful enterprise. Never before
had he beheld a collection of such hideous and
formidable
beings, and their manner was as ominous as their
appearance. Some stalked by him with scowling and
ferocious countenances. Some wore that kind of smile
which a ruffian wears when he feels that he may
perpetrate
with impunity the worst of crimes. Of these
not a few appeared to act the part of guides and
leaders
,
whispering about the mob, giving sometimes
weapons
,
and sometimes drink and money. The under
fiends of the revolution were here doing their work.
Making his way through these crowds, and not
unfrequently
regarded with a scrutiny which would have
made most men quail, sometimes rudely addressed with
a rough jest or a rough slap on the back, he reached
the house of the Count
de la Tour
the friend of
Carolan
.
I wish to see Monsieur le Comte de la Tour, said
Claude to the porter.
If you mean the
Citizen
La Tour, was the surly
reply, you'll find him up stairs.
The domestic who opened the door of the Citizen
La Tour's apartment eyed the new-comer narrowly
before he admitted him.
Claude requested to speak at once with the count,
and in private.
He was admitted, gave his letter, and related the
object of his visit.
My friend, said La Tour, when he had finished,
have you any idea of the things which are going on
here just now?
I see something dreadful is going to happen, said
Claude, but I am determined not to turn back.
The Citizen La Tour looked cautiously around, and
said,
Excuse my frankness, my young friend; but, in
my opinion, you are as little acquainted with France
as the world. CarolanCitizen Carolanwe have no
more counts nowis in prisonin the
Conciergerie
whence he will no more escape with his head than you
would if you were to make the slightest inquiry after
him, to say nothing of an attempt to see him.
Great Heaven! are you in earnest?
As
you
will be if you stay here another week.
Save him?
say you! Save
yourself
, and that forthwith.
Your design is wild, dangerous, and impossible. What
tie binds you to such a perilous scheme? The man
is an ass of the first water. His head is too empty to
be worth saving. He thrust it, like a fool, into the
lion's jaws. Many a better one is doomed to fall
before
this coil is finished.
May I ask after his daughter? demanded Claude.
Ahso! there is a girl, I remember.
Have you seen her?
Yesa pretty creature! She is with the queen
at the palace. It was managed, I know not how, by
the friends of the royal family, that she should be
received
nominally as a
compagnon
of her majesty till
the danger is over.
Then she is
safe!
said Claude.
Sorry to chase that extremely interesting
expression
of pleasure, said La Tour, laughing; but she
is in more danger in the palace, in my opinion, than
she would be in the meanest hut in France.
You cannot mean said Claude.
Yes, I
do
mean the
worst
. Where are you
lodged?
At the little Hotel de France, in the
section du
Theatre Franais
.
Ahthe devil! You are in the very centre of the
Cordeliers
. Take my advice, young gentleman;
abandon
your hair-brained scheme, and leave your pretty
countess to take care of herself. These are no times
for Quixotic expeditions, and there are as good fish in
the sea as ever came out of it!
No, I shall remain; and I am happy to have found
from you the information I desired. Can I by no
means be permitted to see the count, or the young
Countess Carolan?
No  impossible! Communication is carefully
guarded. If you are resolved to follow the silly
example
of your friend, and wait till they come to truss
you like a fowl, take my adviceit is all I can give
you. In France, at present, there is but one crime. It
is being
suspected
of opposing the revolution. They
are all mad. The
nation
is a lunatic. Don't trifle
with it. If you cannot escape from it, humour it.
I have faced one lunatic, said Claude, quietly,
and I will not shrink from another. I shall stay.
Well, then, live plainlymeanly, if possible
make no acquaintancesno confidencessay nothing
burn all letterswrite nothingshout `
Vive la
Revolution
!
'
and `
bas le Roi!
'watch every look and
actiondon't breathe an opiniondon't even whistle
a tune. Three of my friends, who were to have fled
to-morrow, lie this instant in a dungeon, from which
they will never escape alive, because a
parrot
in the
house in which they lived cried `
Vive le Roi!
'
[1]
[1]
A fact.
Beware
of any expressions of sympathyany impulses of
disgust, horror, or disapprobation. There is a danger
beneath, around, and above you. Distrust everybody
your landlord  your friend  your servant. The
whole town are
spies;
and if you see my head
to-mororow
morning carried by your window on a pike, don't
frown, or murmur, or even start. Let no one know
who you are. Become a beggar in attire and a Jacobin
in deportment.
Are things indeed so desperate? said Claude,
greatly alarmed for the success of his enterprise.
You cannot escape, continued La Tour, but by
seeming to abet the revolution. Shout for the nation!
and the republic! Down with the veto! Down with
the Austrian!
Vive Danton! Vive Petion! Vive
Santerre!
A hoarse shout from the street here broke upon
their interview.
Let us see what this is, said La Tour.
They walked to the window. Cries of
la
lanterne
!
la lanterne!
were now audible, and were
mingled with the heavy tramping of a thousand feet.
The mob were dragging to a lamp just opposite an
unhappy young man, livid with terror, by a rope around
his neck. He struggled, strove to kneel, and
screamed
,
but his voice was drowned in shouts. He was
thrust to the fatal spot, and the cord thrown over the
crosspiece.
Let us save him! cried Claude. This is
horrible
!
and he was about to throw up the window.
La Tour drew him forcibly back.
Are you mad? Have you already forgotten? A
pretty fellow for a revolution! Save him, indeed!
ha! ha! ha! Leave him to his fate. Bless your
simple heart, this is nothing new! This is of daily
ha!hark!
They listened.
A hoarse and deafening shout, mingled with screams
and peals of laughter, were heard.
Hark! Poor devil! he's off already! Hark
again!ah! the bloodhounds!
Vol. II.R
How can he have merited this horrible fate?
exclaimed
Claude.
Merited? Why, very likely by turning pale, as you
do, at some similar scene! You are but poorly fitted
for your wise scheme if this trifle makes you change
colour. I have seen so much of this sort of thing that
I am quite used to it, and have no other sentiment than
a secret self-congratulation that
I
am not in the poor
wretch's placethat my turn has not come
yet!!
ha!
ha! ha!
Why don't you escape? demanded Claude.
I dare not. Their eye is upon me; and,
by-the-way
,
I wish you wouldn't come here again. I am
afraid of you. You are so extremely unsophisticated.
That whey-face of yours will get itself into trouble,
and its friends too. I'll call on you at your hotel; and,
if you wish, I can get you a passport to accompany a
division of the army to the frontier; I have that
influence
yet; and, once there, you can escape easily.
No, said Claude; what I have seen only makes
me more determined not to abandon my friends.
Well, you're a brave fellow! butexcuse my
freedom
you'll
regret the refusal of my offer before a
month. This is no child's play. They're in earnest
these fellows. As for the king and queen, and all
around themah! parbleu!
What of them? What
can
happen to place them
in danger? What have they to fear?
Harkin your ear and even La Tour turned
pale as he leaned his head forward and whispered,
The scaffold, mon cher!
Claude started, the blood curdling in his veins with
astonishment and horror.
You are mad! said he, sternly, or you are
trifling
with my fears.
All earthall heaven can't save them. Don't I
know?
haven't I
seen?
am I a fool?
par exemple!
And
you
you, who can't
hear
of these things without
turning white behind your earswhat can
you
do but
flyif, indeed, it be not already too late for that? I
like your spirit, though. You're a brave fellow, and,
if you wish, I'll save you by the means I spoke of.
What! said Claude, sadly but firmly, leave
those I most love to the
scaffold?
Turn from them
in the last hour of deadly danger? No, sir. If you
can help me to speak with her, or to a place in his
majesty's palacefor I hope this tragedy won't be
witnessed
passively
by the people of FranceI shall
thank you; if notadieu.
You are mad! said La Tour. Go your own
way. But shake hands. I never do so now to a friend
without feeling as if one of us was at the foot of the
guillotine. I have an appointmentadieu! May we
meet again! and, egadwho knows!
Claude left La Tour, scarcely able to reconcile the
heartless levity of his conversation with the real
services
he had offered, and at the same time resolving to
adopt such part of his counsel as related to his
residence
in Paris. He walked with hasty steps towards
the garden of the Tuileries, resolving the best means
of announcing his presence to Ida, and of taking
measures
for the escape of herself and fathera task
hopeless
to all but such a lover as he. Such an entire
bouleversement
had taken place in society, that he
knew not a single person to whom he could apply
for aid or information. As he advanced he found the
crowds becoming more dense, and a general gloom,
agitation, and ferocity pervaded them. Many a dark
brow and eye met his sight, cast around, some in
apprehension
,
and some in search of danger. On
reaching
the garden of the Tuileries, he saw that a large
mob was collected in front of the royal chateau.
They consisted of the same desperate class of
wretches
he had already seen, mingled with the most
disgusting-looking
women he had ever beheld; and deep were
the execrationsthe obscene jeststhe dark threats,
and the facetious shouts which were directed by these
formidable vagabonds at the royal chateau and its
unhappy
inmates, and particularly at the unfortunate
queen. Here again obscenity appeared a favourite
weapon; and the gross insults directed against a female
figure which appeared a moment at a window, and was
generally believed to be
Marie Antoinette
, but which
Claude's high beating heart fancied the beloved object
of his search, caused the lady, whoever she might be,
to withdraw immediately.
Come forth! execrable vulture with your
Austrian
beak! cried a hoarse, deep voice, elevated as of
an orator above all the noises of the crowd, which in
some measure disposed itself to listen. Your doom
is written!
The peoplethe people
are up! That
high head shall be laid low!
No, by Brutus! cried another. We will raise
it higher than ever pride and insolent ambition reared
iton a
pike! mes enfans!
These sallies were received with tumultuous
approbation
.
When the noises had subsided, the first
speaker
,
who had raised himself on some object answering
as a stage, began, in the same deep and powerful voice,
to address the crowd. His speech was couched in a
wild, declamatory language, and a part of it ran in this
fashion:
The good work goes well, my friends! he said.
The
people
are up and doing. The tyrants tremble.
Their feet shall be no more on your neck!
A shout of triumph from the auditory here
interrupted
him. Claude regarded this new advocate of
national rights with interest. His appearance
obviously
announced an extraordinary person. He was of a
gigantic stature, a heavy, burly, and ferocious
countenance
,
a voice of singular depth and power, and
altogether
a striking representative and leader of a rabble,
who apparently knew him, and regarded his wild and
reckless style of eloquence with great admiration.
People of France! continued the orator, your
oppressors are about to fly from you. The public
functionaries
are abandoning the country. They are
frightened
.
Every day emigrants are flowing out of France.
What for? To excite all Europe against her. To
come back and bathe these streets and gardens with
your blood. Let no more traitors pass the frontier.
Punish the
thought
of emigration with
death!
Crush
the spiritthe power of opposition. Let us
decapitate
all who hate our glorious revolutionall who,
from their birth, education, character, or position, are
likely to oppose it. They who are not for, are against
us. Let him die who ever
speaks
of
mercy
. Let the
word be the signal of death, or it will render the bold
bolder, and the strong stronger. This is a struggle
between two powers, wherein one or the other must
be
exterminated
. We must destroy our destroyers,
or be destroyed ourselves. The king,
Louis Capet
,
is leaguing with foreign courts. He wishes to
inundate
France with foreign troops. Will you have
Austrian
and Prussian bayonets at your doors and at your
throats? Let us speak to the kingto his ministers
to Europeto mankind, with firmness and with
decision
.
The
revolution
or
death!
We have drawn
the sword, let us cast away the scabbard. We have tried
all means to redress our rights. We have tried
persuasion
threatsentreatiesdemands.
We have tried
reason  we have tried submission  we have tried
peace. It was all in vain. And now we are up, and
hurrah for war! for death! It is but once in a thousand
years that a great people rise together to vindicate the
dignity of the human race. When they do so, there
is but one meanswar! war! war! War against
external
,
and yet more against internal foes. War
with the sword and daggerwith the pike and cannon
with the
lanterne
and the guillotinefor the hour
has come!
His voice broke into a hoarse shriek, which was
caught up and echoed by the momentarily increasing
crowd with a phrensy and delight.
The cabinet of Vienna, continued the speaker,
have fifty thousand men in the Low Countriessix
R 2
thousand are posted in the Bresgawthirty thousand
are despatched from Bohemia. France is threatened
with the fate of Poland. A Prussian army is at this
instant upon her sacred territory, marching towards
Paristowards your homes, your wives, your
children
!
Claude's heart sunk in his bosom as he heard this
high prophet of wo, and beheld the fearful power with
which he lashed the passions of his auditors.
Who is the
cause
of this? continued the speaker.
Behold yonder building!
There
lies the cause of
all your oppressions. But for
that
, there would be
bread and pleasures enough for all. The kingthe
queentheir familytheir household! They are
all
joining with foreign foes to trample you into the dust.
There is a great
great
deed to be done! We must
put our heel upon the vipers. The kings of Europe
threaten us. Let us hold up to them, in answer,
the
head of a king!!!
It is impossible to paint the frantic and fierce
delight
with which this discourse was received by its
terrible
auditory. The orator beheld their delirium with
a placid, good-humoured face and a gratified smile.
His gestures were calm and almost dignified. He
would have proceeded farther, but at this moment a
company of the National Guard were observed to issue
from a wing of the chateau, and to make their way at
a rapid step towards the crowd. The commanding
officer's voice could not be heard, but he motioned with
his sword and addressed those within hearing, forming
his company into three divisions, so as to present a
formidable front of bristling muskets, which
threatened
to shower death upon the furious but imperfectly
armed mob, who at first showed signs of determined
resistance.
Not yet, said the deep voice of the speaker,
before
he descended from his chair. Go to your
homes! Not yet,
mes enfans!
The hour is
approaching
,
but it is not quite arrived.'
Partly influenced by this caution, but probably in a
much greater degree by the nearer sight of the troops,
who, at the command of their officer, made ready and
presented their muskets, the throngs opened and
parted
in every direction, dispersing into the adjoining
streets and squares. They were followed by the
soldiers
,
and cries of Back! back! Fools!
coquins!
nigeauds!
back! and frequent blows with the flat
blades of their swords hastened their retreat and added
to the general confusion.
Claude did not join this rabble in their flight, but
remained, and was presently overtaken by a small
company.
Have you a mind to a bullet for your supper,
young man, said the officer, that you do not follow
your companions?
They are not my companions, sir, said Claude;
my friends lie within yonder walls; and I'll make it
worth your trouble if you'll help me to gain entrance
into the chateau.
How now, fool! said the officer; you must be
mad, or worse, to think of such a thing; and if you
wish not rather to take up your abode in less elegant
lodgings, you'll keep away from this part of the town.
Back! monsieur. Back! I say!
I protest! I entreat! I will will give you any sum
to carry a letter for me, said Claude. It is to a
ladyone of the
Back! said the officer; he is mad or an
assassin
.
And, indeed, the earnestness and agitation of
Claude's looks and gestures went far to sanction this
opinion, which soon received a still stronger
confirmation
.
The orator of the day, lurking behind a tree, was
identified by a soldier as he who had just addressed
the crowd. Two men were despatched to seize him.
When they returned, all present seemed to
recognise
the person of the speaker.
What, George! said the officer, with an
expression
of deep indignation, is it you again at this
work? Shame upon you. I have a mind toto
To what? said the giant, calmly.
To drag you to the dungeon which you and such
as you deserve.
And where have you walls thick enough to keep
out those who would come to seek me? demanded the
stranger.
Parbleu! said the young soldier, reddening with
anger, do you threaten one of his majesty's
officers
?
Yes, threaten and defy him! replied the stranger,
sternly, and yet with a certain dignity.
Had I
my
will, I would put you in such a cell as
would baffle all the bloodhounds who come at your
call to get you out! said the soldier. It would be
only by the hand of the executioner that I would have
that rebellious head of yours shown to the peopleas
one day it will be, if I have any skill in prophecy.
Dog of a hireling! said the stranger, fiercely,
do you know that not only
your
head, but your
master's
,
shall one day
He was interrupted by a cry of fury from the
soldiers
;
and the officer, himself apparently suffering rage
for an instant to get the better of reason, with a deep
execration, gave the word of command to his men, who
scarcely waited for it; they levelled their muskets at
the stranger, who, as if appalled at the consequences
of his words, turned pale, and exhibited other signs of
trepidation. The officer was in the act of pronouncing
the word Fire! when Claude, with an irresistible
impulse to save at any risk the shedding of human
blood in cold cruelty, stepped actually before the
levelled
muskets, and entreated the amazed soldier to
forbear.
For the love of Heaven, sir, said he, as you
value the lives of the king and royal family, do not fire!
One drop of blood at this moment will destroy the
chateau and all its inhabitants, and drench Paris in
blood.
Eh! parbleu! cried the officer, regarding this
bold intrusion with irrepressible astonishment; are
you seeking a grave, that you put yourself before
loaded
muskets in that way? Had I but breathed a word,
you would have been by this time in company with
Csar. Is yon
nigeaud
your
father
, that you think his
life worth so much more than your own?
No, I do not know him, replied Claude; but I
think your position requires prudence, and no blood
should be spilled on the king's side. It would raze
Paris to the ground.
Well, well, you may be right! but,
sacr diable!
you're a bold
ganache!
Adieu, monsieur! and a word
of advice. When next you meet a line of muskets
levelled at a
sclrat
like this, after the words `make
ready' and `take aim' have been uttered, don't be too
ready to step before them. Every officer may not be
as cool as I, and they
might
fireeh! Ha! ha! ha!
par Dieu! that's capital!
Allons
, messieurs!
The troops now drew together again, and, being
formed into a single company by the principal officer,
were wheeled round and marched back towards the
chateau.
Bold friend! said the Herculean stranger,
drawing
near, you have saved my life. I may, perhaps,
one day reciprocate the favour. Who are you?
My name can be of little interest to you,
monsieur
,
said Claude, coolly.
Possibly! but it may be different with mine, in
regard to yourself, young man. Therefore please to
remember it, and, when you need aidas doubtless
you will, for the times are somewhat unsettled, and I
think your tongue smacks of an accent not loved in
Pariscall on
me
, and be assured I will not fail you.
You have saved the life of
Danton
. I am to be heard
of at the
Jacobin. Au revoir! mon cher
.
The stranger turned on his heel and walked hastily
away.
CHAPTER XXV.
All
the efforts of Claude to gain an entrance into
the chateau, or to obtain any communication with the
inhabitants of it, were in vain. He was obliged to use
the utmost caution in making the endeavour, and he
more than once subjected himself to serious danger in
the attempt.
Some days passed away in this state of suspense,
which grew every moment more awful. The most
frightful reports were continually in circulation. It
was said the town was to be sackedthere was to be
a rising of the mobthe chateau was to be burned,
and the royal family and household massacred. The
tumult and alarm each day augmented. Some
dreadful
event was clearly impending. The crisis was at
hand.
It was on the afternoon before the memorable 10th
of August, that, having snatched a hasty meal, and
equipped himself, as every one else had done, with
pistols and a sabre, Claude left his lodging with the
full determination to make his way to the chateau, and
to be first in the attack which, it was understood, was
to be made upon it, so that, gaining entrance with the
mob, he might seek and save Ida, if, indeed, she had
not long since escaped from it. All his exertions could
procure for him no other chance of admission. As he
attempted to make his way towards the Tuileries, he
found the streets thronged with crowds of the worst
description. The shops were closed. Business was
entirely abandoned. Only wild hordes of women and
ruffians, whose actions gave evidences, not to be
mistaken
,
of an immediate outbreak.
It was late in the day when he left his lodgings, and
the shadows of night soon descended upon one of the
most frightful scenes recorded by history. The
uproar
increased, and, with feelings which we shall not
undertake to depict, he perceived the tide set towards
the chateau. Suddenly a tremendous pressure, in
which some of the more feeble were trampled to death
around him, required him to exert all his strength to
escape the same fate. He succeeded with difficulty
in mounting the steps of a church, and it would be
difficult
to describe the emotions with which, from this
eminence, he beheld approaching, with that kind of
solemn grandeur which always attends the exhibition
of immense power, an organized body of about thirty
thousand persons, consisting of the most desperate
men and dissolute and frantic womenthe mere refuse
of human nature. Some children were distinguished
in this formidable battalion, and, fearfully indicative of
the extent of the revolutionary fury, many of the
National
Guards swelled the rank of the enemy they
should have confronted. Few regular arms, however,
were seen; but countless hands bore with a firm grasp
whatever chance had thrown in their wayaxes, poles,
scythes, pitchforks, clubs, spears, and butcher's knives.
Hundreds of torches threw a lurid glare upon the
scene, rendering it at once more picturesque and
awful
;
and, at short intervals of distance, and waved
wildly in the smoky light, were lifted banners
displaying
inscriptions of the various revolutionary
watchwords
most in vogue, such as
Down with the Veto!
Death to the Austrian!
Long live the
Sans Culottes!
The country in danger!
and,
The nation for ever!
This dreadful army came up and passed on with a
measured tread, that sounded like the rumbling of a
volcano about to burstthe unbridled and clamorous
fury of individual passion having subsided into a
general
current, more silent only because more deep.
Suddenly they broke out, as if with a simultaneous
impulse, into the chorus
a-ira!
The blended voices
of so many thousandstheir irregular and terrible
armstheir garb of rags, filth, and desperate
wretchedness
their
haggard and ferocious facesand the deep,
hollow tramp with which those determined feetbent
to the throne of their kingkept time to the music,
made a scene which would have appalled a heart less
stout than Claude's. It seemed, indeed, the whole
nation
gathered together in gigantic force, and rolling, in
one stupendous billow, to sweep away the solid banks
which had pent it up for ages.
Different indeed were the feelings and intentions
which animated Claude from those which, perhaps
with scarcely a single exception, inspired the dreadful
masses of desperate beings around him, and deep was
the horror and disgust with which he beheld their
slow, but determined, portentous advance; but he saw
no other chance of effecting his purpose than joining
their ranks, and accordingly he fell in, his drawn sabre
in hand, and pursued his march. He well knew their
path and his own were the same. In this way he
succeeded
in getting much nearer the scene where
centred
so many of his hopes and fears.
It was his intention to follow this army of
desperadoes
to the very gate of the chateau; but an accident
prevented him. A female, whose appearance was that
of a fury, finding him in her way, suddenly thrust him
violently forward, and on his turning to defend himself
from the second blow, she raised a glittering knife, as
if to anticipate his resentment by making the first fatal
attack. In the astonishment excited by this incident,
Claude's foot slipped, and he would have received,
without being able to parry it, the descending stroke
of this half-drunken pythoness, and fallen only to be
trampled to death beneath the multitude, which no
such trifle could an instant arrest in its course, when
a third person extended his scythe so as to fend the
thrust, and hastily, at the same time, reaching his hand,
sustained him in a perpendicular position. There are
kind hearts in the lowest scenes. He was, however,
thus pressed out of the ranks, and, breathless and
fatigued
,
he was obliged to rest among a group which,
motionless itself, beheld this portentous tide flow by.
The regiment from which he had been thus excluded
passed on, and, unaccustomed as he was to such
violent
exercise, he was glad to stop a moment and
recover
breath.
This terrible body had scarcely passed, when it was
followed by several companies of grenadiersand
legions
of licentious vagabonds, at first entirely without
order or arms, but who received the latter as they
proceeded
from hands careful to supply them, without fee
or question, wherever they were wanted. From these
frightful crowds ever and anon rose a kind of
half-chanted
chorus, which had the most solemn and almost
sublime effect, of
Bread! bread! bread!
Suddenly the deep report of a cannon sent an
electric
shock through the stormy sea of human beings
heaving around. Then the drums beat far and wide
the terrible
gnrale
, and from all quarters rose shouts,
fierce and universal,
To the palace! To the
palace
!
This was the long-expected signal for the attack on
the chateau.
Claudehis blood boiling, his mind greatly excited
by the scenes he had passed throughpressed his way
on, resolved to reach the scene of the attack at any
hazard, certain that, if these hellhounds forced
admission
into the royal residence, every member of the
family would be instantly massacred, unless the friends
of the king should have gathered around him, at this
dark hour, in sufficient numbers to make a resistance,
and should have foreseen the necessity of preparing in
an adequate manner to defend their position. Bold and
firm measures would certainly have afforded a hope of
safety. The cool skill of a disciplined militiaa
determined
resistancea resolution to defend the royal
residence inch by inch, and to the last drop of blood,
supported by even a tolerable force, might check the
onsetgive time for the royalists to rally around their
sovereign, till the fickle multitude should abandon
Vol. II.S
their bloody purpose. Had these requisite
arrangements
been made, Claude knew that every accession
to the besieged would be of fearful importance, and
that the fate of the contest might be turned even by a
single arm. He pictured the unfortunate and
excellent
,
but wavering, monarch and his beautiful queen
awaiting in horror this appalling attack; and Ida, pale
with terror, calling perhaps on him for aid, which she
little dreamed he had thus promptly determined to
offer
.
Deeply did he yearn, during that midnight march
amid the most remorseless and bloodthirsty wretches
that ever gathered to a scene of carnage and crime, to be
planted in front of the almost defenceless circle which
they were hastening to attack. No tempest-tossed
mariner ever sighed more eagerly for land, than he for
the moment when he might throw himself before the
king and her who was now trembling at his side, and
when he might oppose even his single breast to this
awful danger. He had been denounced as a coward
for shrinking from doing what he deemed
wrong
, and
he could be driven neither by anger nor false shame
to violate his principle, and to break the law of man
and God. Among those who sneered at and despised
him, was there one heart that would have remained
more unappalled in this scene? one foot that would
have more steadily pursued its way where humanity,
chivalry, and love called him?
After breathing a few moments, and feeling that his
arms were safe, his pistols firm in his girdle, and his
poniard in his bosom, grasping his sword with a
prayer to Heaven for success, he stepped from his
resting-place, and committed himself once more to the
swift current which rushed towards the fated chateau.
He soon found that his principal danger lay in the
effect
of the now momentarily increasing excitement of
the scene upon his mind. He could scarcely restrain
his disgust and indignation within the bounds of
prudence
,
or wait the proper moment to strike a blow in
defence of the weaker party. It was only the image
of Idapalepursued perhaps by ruffians, and
consigned
to dangers too horrible to dwell onthat gave
him power to govern the impetuosity of his soulto
repress his mounting passions, and to check the arm
that longed to deal death among the fierce and brutal
wretches who howled around him for the blood of the
noble, the innocent, and helpless. But for long habits
of self-control, he would probably have here sacrificed
his life at once, without the slightest advantage to the
cause he espoused. Guarding himself with a
powerful
effort from a premature discovery of his intention,
and making his way on and on with unwavering
perseverance
and the most unshrinking disregard of such
dangers as could not be avoided, he struck through the
masses of the tumultuous rabble, who, supposing that
the tall and determined mangrasping his sabre as one
who meant to use it well, and advancing through all
obstacles with such a reckless energywas one of
those acting as their leaders, made way for him on
every
side. His form, indeed, was one that commanded
attention. His hat had long since fallen. His hair
was streaming wildly about his head, and the deep
emotion
of his soul had imparted to his demeanour a
commanding
dignity, and to his face a sternness, for which
he had been in some degree remarked even in the
glittering
scenes of fashion, but which at this hour spoke
like one born to command, and whom it was not safe
to resist. Yes, he who had been able to endure
a blow
,
and all its humiliating consequences, rather than
violate
a principle, now disclosed, perhaps half
unexpectedly
to himself, the soul of a herocool and
self-governed
in the midst of such shocking and perilous
scenes as the world have rarely witnessed, without
a shudder at the death-shrieks which often arose
around himnow of some wretch suspended to a
lamp-post at his side, now the wild cry of some
woman
fainting and trampled to a shapeless clod beneath
his feetand without the slightest disturbance of his
calmness, although pressing on and on amid
weapons
which he knew must be presently directed against
himself, and expecting each instant as he advanced
hoping
, indeedto be rewarded by a discharge of
cannon
which
might rake the narrow and crowded streets
from end to end, and greet the besiegers with such a
reception as they deserved. He felt his soul exalted
with emotions never known before. He grew more
and more calm and resolute, and deeper and deeper
every moment grew the burning impatience of his
soul, to find the occasion when he might abandon the
ranks of his bloodthirsty companions, and, throwing
himself by the side of the other partyof Ida,
perhaps
aid
in checking the attack, or yield his life in
the attempt.
But alas! one individual in a scene like this is but
an atom; and, the nearer he approached the central
scene, the more he was hemmed in, and deprived of
power over his own motions. He was borne slowly
onward, as a plank upon the billows; and, long before
he came in sight of the Tuileries, in an agony of
suspense
to know whether any attack could have been
made already, without, perhaps, any defence, the
morning had filled the east, and the smoky flambeaux
began to grow pale before her pure light.
At length he reached a point whence the chateau
was visible; and he perceived, with inexpressible
exultation
,
not only that the attack had not commenced,
but that it was to be met with a manly defence.
Battallions
of the National Guard were marched up to the
chateau. The
gend'armerie
followed on horseback.
Various appearances indicated that the besieged had
not abandoned hope; and that the besiegers, great as
were their strength and numbers, would not advance
farther on their enterprise without some hesitation.
On looking in another direction, however, it was seen
that the insurgents were swelled each hour by new
accessions
,
and were steadily advancing in several
columns
.
Even while Claude reconnoitred them, a large
body of the wildest rabblewho had just forced the
arsenal, and thus completely equipped themselves with
armsapproached in regular order, showing that they
were acting under cool and able leaders. They were
received with reiterated shouts of triumph. They
were followed almost immediately by another column
fifteen or twenty thousand strong, and then by another
of equal force. As the strength of the assailants
received
their augmentations, the air was rent with
universal
bursts of triumph, in which the name of each
body was the burden, Hurrah! Victory! The
faubourg
St. Antoine!
The
faubourg St. Marceau!!!
And now the assailants were drawn up in the order
in which they were to advance to the attack. The
clamour of the crowd for a moment abated before the
intense interest of the scene. A burst of music was
heard. A company of the
Marsellaise
moved forward
in perfect order. Claude had placed himself as near
the front ranks as he could geta position for him of
double peril; for, while he thus exposed himself to the
fire of the besieged, he ran the hazard of being cut
down or shot by his own party the instant he should
discover his intention of joining their victims. The
guards of the palace appeared crowded at the doors
and windows. The assailants advanced at first with
some show of order. Suddenly a single musket fired
from a window laid the man next to Claude dead
beneath
his feet. A general discharge followed instantly
from both sides, and then all was smokecrashfire
shrieksshouts  thunder, and such confusion as
rendered it almost impossible to know in which
direction
lay the chateau. His ears were deafenedhis
clothes blackened and burnta ball had passed through
his sleeve, and he had a slight cut upon the arm, which
he only knew some time afterward by the sight of the
flowing blood. Borne, as a struggling sailor in a
shipwreck
,
by the waves, he found himself at length, with
a firm footing, immediately before the palace. His heart
leaped to perceive that he was among the first. There
were heavy blows, and crash after crash, and peals of
S 2
cannon shook the earth, and the bullets whizzed close to
his head. As the breeze blew away the smoke, he
perceived
that he was in the midst of the maddened soldiery,
doing their dreadful work upon the poor Swiss, who,
fighting to the last, yielded their bosoms and their throats
to each red and ruthless hand. He threw himself into
the midst of them to save a poor fellow who was set
on by four or five ruffians, and who fought like a lion.
Claude rushed to his side. The impulse which seized
him was irresistible as madness. He fired, and the
foremost of the assailants fell. It was the first time he
had ever taken human life, and he experienced a thrill
as the poor wretch tumbled back and the blood gushed
from his head and nostrils; but there was no
compunction
in his feelings, and the next assailant shared the
same fate. The poor Swiss thus supported, escaped for
the time at least; but a cloud of smoke from a cannon
discharged at their side, and a rush of the assailants into
the grand hall, separated him from the person he had
saved, luckily hid his interference from general notice,
and enabled him to reach the interior of the palace.
And now, with a trembling heart, he forced his way
in at the head of the troops, as if he had been their
leader. He cast his eyes around. The halls, slippery
with blood, were already yielding to the work of
destruction
.
He mounted the broad stairs  he flew
breathless through the gorgeous hallshe sought in
every chamber, with the expectation of beholding the
royal circle surrounded by their last defenders, and
ready to be slaughtered. He had made up his mind,
in such a case, to fling himself into the midst of them,
and share their fate, whatever it might be. At his
heels were a thousand ruffianstheir drawn swords
red and drippingtheir hoarse screams resounding
the
king!
the
king!
At length they were met by another party, who had
conducted the search with a better knowledge of the
localities, and who were headed by a fierce young man,
whose actions were those of a maniac.
Sacr dia
ble!
cried he, they are gone. The birds have
flown!
The intelligence was received with a storm of oaths
and maledictions by all but Claude, who heard it with
an exultation which almost deprived him of prudence.
It was with difficulty he restrained himself from
uttering
a shout of triumph which would have betrayed
him to his rough associates.
Mais n'importe!
cried the voice of the young
leader;
nous y reviendrons!
[2]
[2]
An historical fact.
We shall come here
again.
Oh, save me! save me! cried a voice husky
with terror, and one of the unhappy Swiss, whose
companions had been all massacred, pursued by a
band of butchers, rushed through the crowd. He
traversed
the hall with steps winged with terror, and
escaped
through an opposite door. All joined in the
pursuit. It resembled the violent phrensy of a pack
of hounds after a deer. The poor youth, better
acquainted
than his pursuers with the localities of the
chateau, succeeded in eluding their grasp till he
descended
into the lower apartments and offices of that
huge edifice. Here he reached the royal kitchen, with
the whole yelling crew at his heels. An enormous
fire, as if the royal family had expected to enjoy their
dinner that day as usual, was blazing on the hearth.
He sank exhausted to the floor, and was instantly
seized.
To the roofto the roofhurl him off! cried a
cracked female voice.
Nothe hook, the hook! exclaimed others,
pointing
to a large hook in the ceiling; and several eager
hands had already thrown over it a cord which hung
dangling in the air.
The fire! shrieked a brawny woman, her eyes
glittering with the light of intoxication, if not of
madness
.
The last proposal was received with frantic delight,
and immediately acted on. The victim was grasped
by a dozen fierce hands, and bound with the cord which
was to have been used in strangling him. Claude
turned to escape the sight of what he could not
prevent
,
and, as he hastened away, he heard the plunge
and sudden shriek of the desperate wretch, the
crackling
of the sparks and flames, and the hoarse yells of
the barbarian executioners.
A scream in an adjoining corridor, sounding above
all the roar and tumult of the palace, now called his
attention in a new direction; and, with considerable
surprise
,
he saw several females in the last state of terror,
pursued by a rabble who threatened to sacrifice them
as the poor Swiss had been sacrificed before. A man
had even seized the arm of one of the trembling
fugitives
,
who, by their attire and appearance, seemed of
superior rank. His trembling eagerness scarcely
permitted
him to examine whether Ida might not be among
them, though he had persuaded himself of her escape
with the queen. The defenceless victim sank upon
her knee, and lifted her hands as if yielding to death.
Of all the sensations which a human being can
experience
,
perhaps that of Claude was the most singular
mixture of delight and horror, on recognising in the
uplifted face of the unhappy being the features of Ida.
He advanced with the intention of striking dead the
ruffian who still dragged his victim by the arm. But
the habit of self-control here again came to his aid; for,
instead of cutting down the man, which would have
been the signal for an instant slaughter of himself and
those he wished to defend, he seized his throat with a
giant's grasp, and hurled him back against the wall.
She is a
woman!
cried he, in a voice so stern
that for a moment the wretch paused in fear.
The wild scream which Ida uttered on recognising
him, and the joy and confidence with which she clung
to his arm and to his bosom, almost unnerved him
for the crisis in which he found himself.
A woman! cried the man; what of that? She
is my prisoner. Stand back! and he lifted the
scythe-blade
which he held in his hand aloft in the air with
gesticulations of fury.
Claude drew a pistol silently but firmly.
A bas les aristocrats!
cried the wretch, and
started forward to cut him down.
There was no longer time for delay. Claude fired.
The ball passed through the assailant's brain. For a
moment the commanding attitude and stern voice of
him who had so boldly interfered between the lion and
his wrath, arrested the party.
What! don't you know me? exclaimed Claude.
I am your leader. I was the first to mount the
tyrant's
steps. Had
he
been here, you should strike
and spare not; but we shall not commence our cause
by butchering
women
. Back, I say, and let us send
them in safety away.
He's right, cried two or three voices.
He
was
the first in, said another.
Then I demand a guard for these miserable women,
who are not worth your rage, said Claude. Go, my
friends, seek more worthy game.
The young man who had made himself so
conspicuous
,
and whose voice had first announced the escape
of the royal family, here came in with some of the
National Guard.
Women? said he; they must be removed.
I demand a guard to take them to a place of
safety
,
said Claude.
You are right, stranger, said Lazarre.
Antoine
he
turned to one of the regular soldierstake
twenty men and conduct these women to the next
guardhouse.
The soldier obeyed. The rabble made way. The
females were surrounded by their escort and marched
out of the palace.
[3]
[3]
A fact.
The trembling Ida was rather
borne than led by Claude, whose brain reeled with a
joy too sweet to be certain, as he found himself under
the protection of the guard, completely disentangled
from the immense multitudes which now surrounded
the palace, but which grew less dense at every step of
their retreat, till they were far removed from the scene
of action, and paused in the comparative safety of a
distant and narrow street. Claude here conferred
with the officer, who promised faithfully to take each
one of his affrighted charge wherever they wished to
go. For himself, he was in the neighbourhood of
the
section du Theatre Franais
. Ida, from the
revulsion
of feeling, and the fatigue and danger of the
previous night, was almost unable to support herself.
Bearing, therefore, her light form upon his arm, which
thrilled beneath the beloved burden, he speedily
reached
his hotel, gained his room, and deposited her upon
a sofa. A maid attended at his request. She was, by
a fortunate chance, a modest and kind-hearted girl,
entirely
untouched with the revolutionary mania.
Annette
,
her eyes bathed with tears, offered to become,
through every danger, a constant and devoted
attendant
of the lovely young stranger thus unexpectedly
committed to her care, and instantly commenced her
duties.
We must beg the reader to paint, according to his
own imagination, the scene which took place when
Ida recovered her senses. All that sensibility and
delicacy
could require or bestow, marked every moment
of their interview, while they hastily interchanged such
particulars as were most requisite to a mutual
understanding
of their present position and prospects,
although
Claude carefully avoided revealing the great
change which had taken place in his fortune, and of
which Ida knew nothing. That they should quit
France instantly was of course desirable; but
Carolan
was in prison, and Ida would not desert him. In
vain Claude begged her to go herself to the frontier,
with the means which he hoped to be able to supply
for her journey, promising to remain, and do all in his
power to procure the count's liberation. She firmly
refused to set off without her father. Whatever
sentiment
might have been felt of that passion which had
been revealed to each other without words, and so long
cherished without hope, at this instant it gave way to
the more pressing thought of escape for themselves,
and the means of rescuing Carolan.
Trust to me, said Claude. Remain where you
are; if Annette will but be faithful
Oh, for ever! said the warm-hearted girl, her eyes
filling with tears. I will never abandon
Mademoiselle
Carolan as long as I live.
I will consent not to leave Paris, then, till we
rescue
your father.
In this time, when so much prudence and courage
were necessary, Claude appeared more calm and
noble
than Ida had ever seen him before. Even through
the mean, torn, and dirty dress which he had assumed,
his air was so free and commanding, his face so full
of manly beauty, that, little knowing the change which
had occurred in his condition, she innocently felt that
her happiness depended on him, and that he was the
only being who could ever possess her love. In the
mean time, he placed a purse in Annette's hands,
requesting
her to order everything necessary to the
security
and comfort of her young mistress; and
Annette
was a
femme de chambre
whose genius could
have ministered to the wants of a princess, and
surrounded
her with such cares as only a French
femme
de chambre
had any idea of. She was as
good-humoured
as she was adroit and intelligent; and it
seemed
as if Heaven had sent, in the last moment of
danger
,
this invaluable aid, as a token that the little party,
beset as they were by perils, were not to be deserted.
CHAPTER XXVI.
With
the deepest anxiety that had ever winged his
steps, Claude left Ida to the charge of Annette, and
flew again to La Tour for advice and assistance in the
singular situation in which he now found himself. La
Tour was more alarmed, more wavering than before.
He was almost resolved upon flight himself; but eyes
were upon him, as he well knew, which would detect
his first motion towards such a measure. Danger
makes us selfish. He could but advise Claude to fly
with his new companion, and to take his chance for
getting out of France. As for Carolan, he assured
him that the only consequences which would follow
an attempt in his favour would be the arrest, and
perhaps
the destruction, of those who should make it.
Disappointed in the succourwhich, indeed, he
scarcely expectedfrom La Tour, Claude next
proceeded
to the person whose address he had procured
from James, and who had been recommended as one
so able, from various circumstances, to afford him aid
in an emergency like the present. Ida had already
informed him that her uncle, Colonel St. Marie, was
still at his chateau a few leagues from Paris, and that,
if she could reach it, she would there take up her
abode, and consider the best means of rescuing her
father from his unhappy and perilous situation. By
the aid of the person alluded to, measures were
arranged
for their immediate departure, and the next
day they succeeded in escaping safely out of Paris,
and in reaching the Chateau St. Marie.
We will not detain the reader with the various hopes,
fears, and emotions which animated each of the little
party who, thus removed from the immediate scene of
action, here debated upon the means of Carolan's
deliverance
and their subsequent flight out of France.
Claude was often in Paris, where he beheld scenes
of which the reader would scarcely wish to hear the
dark and bloody details. But, notwithstanding his
exertions
,
he could not succeed in gaining admission to
Carolan, or learning more of his fate than that he was
in the
Conciergerie
, and was not likely to be released.
The frightful massacre of the first, second, and third
of Septemberthe formal commencement of the
Republic
the
opening of the National Conventionthe
execution of the king, of the queen, and many more
of the horrors of that remarkable period, took place;
while Ida, sheltered in the chateau of her uncle, and
kept, as far as was possible, in ignorance of the scenes
around her, waited, with an anxiety which preyed upon
her health, the dreadful course of events, till some
vicissitude
should either deprive her of a father whom,
with all his eccentricities, she deeply loved, or should
return him to her arms. Indeed, the sources of her
anguish
were numerous as well as profound. She had
heard but indirectly from her mother, till Claude, by the
arrangements which he had made with James, opened
a new and more certain mode of communication. But,
alas! it rather added to her grief, for she learned that
her mother was dangerously ill from the effects of the
agonizing suspense into which the peril of the count
and Ida had thrown her.
Several months passed away, and, notwithstanding
the exertions of Claude, without producing any event
favourable to his wishes. The whole time was by no
means spent by him at the chateau. He was
sometimes
weeks together at Paris  mingling with the
mobsshouting the cant watchwordsattending the
tribunals, and playing the
rle
of a zealous
revolutionist
.
In the course of the various enterprises to learn
the details of Carolan's present situation, he had made
several attempts to see
Danton
, whose life he had
saved, and whose real character and influence he had
now learned better to appreciate. The faithful agent
and ally supplied by James at length aided him in
Vol. II.T
presenting the affair in such a light to Danton, that
that terrible arbiter of life began to listen to the
propositions
of a pecuniary nature which, as the time
advanced
and the danger grew more perilous, began to
be large enough to tempt the cupidity of a much more
scrupulous magistrate.
It was with feelings of such gratification as he had
rarely experienced, that Claude was one day
returning
from Paris to the chateau St. Marie, after having
nearly brought these negotiations to a conclusion, when,
being almost arrived, he was alarmed by the sound of
horse's feet, and a body of troops overtook him on their
way to join the army of the Alps. It was about noon,
and the towers of the chateau were just visible at a
little distance from the road. At the sight of them the
colonel ordered a halt. Claude had succeeded in hiding
himself amid some thick shrubbery, in such a way
that he could, without being seen, overhear the
conversation
.
From this place of concealment he
perceived
that a peasant had been arrested and brought
before
the commander, who put several inquiries to him
respecting the chateau and its occupants. The replies
were of a nature to awaken considerable alarm. The
man questioned was a bigoted Jacobin; and, whether
from party zeal, private enmity, or the mere desire to
behold a scene of carnage and plunder, related many
particulars, which aroused the fury of the colonel, who
seemed to be a low, coarse man, with that determined
bent towards cruelty which marked so many minds
during this period. The sum of the information thus
received was, that the owner of the chateau was a
royalist
;
that he had a brother, who was not only a rank
aristocrat, but a Prussian nobleman; that the latter
had come into France with the avowed intention of
aiding the royal cause, in consequence of which he had
been imprisoned, and was either beheaded or was
awaiting execution; that the present occupant of the
chateau was also an officer of decidedly royal
sentiments
,
and that he was waiting to emigrate only till he
should ascertain whether the brother could be saved.
The informant added, that the daughter of the
imprisoned
Prussian was also a resident of the chateau,
and that she was a very beautiful girl, who refused to
quit France from fidelity to her father; and that there
was an English spy, also in the habit of remaining
much with the family, although disguised under the
character of a revolutionist. Claude heard, with as
much astonishment as alarm, these and many other
particulars related of himself and the precious charge
over whose safety he had watched with so much care,
some of which could only have been ascertained by a
system of
espionage
which he had too carelessly
concluded
he had escaped.
The
sacr
aristocrat! then demanded Colonel
Dubois, has taken no part in the revolution?
No, citizen colonel, replied the peasant; they
are determined to emigrate as soon as the proper time
comes.
That they never shall, said the colonel. What
say you, my brave fellows? For us or against us is
our motto; these are traitors. Shall we down with the
old crow's nest about their ears?
An enthusiastic shout announced the delight with
which this proposition was received by the licentious
troops; for, notwithstanding the victorious career of the
French armies under the Republic, they frequently
interrupted
their march to indulge in excesses
characteristic
rather of undisciplined banditti than of regular
troops.
A short council was immediately called, consisting
of two or three of the officers, of which Claude did not
wait to hear the result. He crept from the thicket,
which fortunately led through a narrow lane shaded
with trees and bushes in such a way as to conceal him
from the view of the soldiery, who were, moreover, too
expectant of the orders of their chief and of their
anticipated
booty to regard his motions. Following, therefore,
the path, which lay in a direct line to it, he reached
the chateau, breathless, covered with dust, and pale
with the terror which the incident had conjured up.
His sudden appearance and agitation at once
announced
that he was the messenger of evil. Colonel St.
Marie had been asleep upon a sofa, and Ida was sitting
by his side lost in thought. They both started up and
heard with inexpressible terror the danger which was
approaching. St. Marie, although superannuated and
scarcely able to walk, rose with an indignation which
for a moment recalled the strength of youth to his
limbs. The domestics were instantly collected, and
preparations for defence were commenced. He called
for his arms, and gave twenty different orders in the
same minute. Three or four bewildered serving-men,
incapable of rendering aid, even had there been any
chance of defence, ran to and fro, scarcely knowing
what they did; and St. Marie, even while grasping his
sword with one trembling hand and a pistol with the
other, as if determined himself to confront the ruffians
who threatened him, sank back exhausted into a
fauteuil
,
and his weapons fell from his nerveless grasp.
Ida, said St. Marie,
you
must fly. Wyndham,
it is to you alone I dare intrust her. I know not
which of the servants, if any, are worthy of confidence.
One mile back through the wood is the hut of
Susanne
,
an old family nurse, who has a certain place of
concealment.
I
will never leave my hearthstone for
these recreants. Do not seek to persuade me. This
man, he added, pointing to the trembling old
domestic
who supported his feeble steps, is the only one in
the family who knows it besides myself. I will call
the others in, and they shall not see the road you take.
Fly. I commit her to your care.
My beloved unclemy father! Oh, merciful
Heaven! preserve me, murmured Ida, fainting with
terror.
Do you fear to accompany him, my child?
demanded
the old man.
Oh, no, no! cried Ida; but come with us, my
uncle!
Never.
Then I will not desert you
I command you, Ida. Your presence here will
make things worse.
These are dangers, said Claude, which make
flight imperativefor you, monsieur, as well as for her.
Your ageyour
Never. I have never fled from the enemies of
France; shall I fly from her children? Never. I will
receive these rude visiters in my hall as becomes a
host. I will retain them if I canat least till you are
out of their reach. I willHark! Ida! sweet child!
away.
They embraced as those embrace who may never
meet again.
The trumpet sounded a blast almost under the
window
.
There was a trampling of horses' feet upon the
stone pavement of the court, and three hoarse cheers
announced the numbers and the spirit of the
new-comers
.
Claude led his affrighted companion, with
gentle
force, from the arms of the high-hearted old man,
and withdrew, tenderly sustaining her hasty and
faltering
steps. He thought himself the sport of some
wild dream. He passed hastily through the gate.
One of the soldiers, by the precaution of the enemy,
had been already planted there. His glittering
bayonet
arrested them, and he levelled his musket.
No, my fair friend! cried he, laughing, you
are just the one we want.
Back! Back, I say! Ha,
cochon!
he
continued
,
as Claude raised a pistol. He accompanied the
last exclamation by discharging his musket; but,
before
he had time to bring it to a correct aimbefore
even the words had fairly left his lips, the ball, winged
from the rapid hand of Claude, laid him dead upon
the grass. The contents of his musket spent
themselves
harmlessly in the air. A wild shout from the
house winged Claude's feet with yet new swiftness;
and, lifting Ida upon his arm, he gained a thick grove
T 2
within a few yards of the wall, just as a crowd of
shouting ruffians turned the angle of the building,
which, indeed, was already a scene of shrieks, tumult,
and uproar.
Completely sheltered by the bowers of the
tangled
wood, he fled hastily with his beloved burden.
It was not long, however, when, by the increased
weight upon his arm, he perceived that he bore a
senseless
form. He stooped to gaze upon that face, the
image of so many a delicious dream, and a thousand
times more beautiful in reality even than in
imagination
.
He bathed her pale temples and closed eyes
with water from a spring, that gushed from the rock
against which he leaned, and, with a tremour at his
heart such as he had never known before, he
measured
her beautiful, senseless form with fearful eyes,
to assure himself that the ball of the ruffian who had
fired at them had not marred the fairest mortal that
ever came from the hand of nature. Terrified, yet
dazzledenraptured, yet in despaira tenderness,
which would have made him too happy to lay down
his life for her, entered yet more deeply into his soul.
With inexpressible rapture he perceived that she was
not wounded, and that she already began to give signs
of life. Her head hung back upon his armupon his
bosom. Her eyes opened. Her mouth almost
touched
his own. He felt her fragrant breath upon his
cheek.
At this moment he would have forgotten the
danger
which surrounded him had his own life alone been
at stake. The obstacles to his union with Ida were
removed; and her whole demeanour towards him
during
the time which had elapsed since their meeting
in Paris, had filled his heart with new fervour, while
it inspired his mind with deeper respect. Both
seemed
to feel that, amid the dreadful events going on
around them, and in which they themselves were so
deeply interested, any formal expression of their own
sentiments would be out of place. The language of
both, therefore, had been only that of a friendship full
of tender confidence and deep happiness, strangely
mingled with apprehension and anguish. But now,
with the object of his long-cherished love thus
committed
to his single carethus abandoned to himself
alone  thus beautiful  thus clinging to his bosom,
amid the bowers of a wood hidden from every eye
he could scarcely avoid flinging himself at her feet,
and declaring the passion which inspired him. But
the poor girl did not participate in his forgetfulness of
danger, although her very terror unconsciously
betrayed
the love with which she had long regarded him.
As he sustained her trembling form with the delicacy
of a brother, feeling that even to die for a being so
dear was a greater happiness than had ever before
been allotted to his dark and lonely life, he saw
enough in the unguarded tenderness and dependance,
which even her fear and grief betrayed, to swell his
breast with rapture, that rendered him, as far as
regarded
his own safety, totally regardless of the
tempest
around.
Do not fear, he cried; no peril shall reach you,
dearest, beloved girl.
A shout again came from the chateau.
My unclemy father! Oh, save me! save me!
she murmured, sinking from mingled fear and
affection
upon his bosom.
With a Herculean arm he lifted her once more, and
did not pause again till he reached the hut of old
Susanne
.
CHAPTER XXVII.
Near
the hut of Susanne was a subterranean
passage
,
in former times connected with the chateau. It
communicated with a rude outhouse, which had been
used for some mysterious purpose, of which the
tradition
was lost. This retreat was known only to three
persons in the family of St. Mariehimself, Susanne,
and one of his oldest and most faithful serving-men.
It was in order to procure to Ida the advantage of this
place of security that he had sent her to Susanne,
unwilling to trust the secret to any other of the
servants
on an occasion where there might be so many
temptations to betray it.
With hasty and trembling steps the two females
took their place in this passage, of which the opening
could not be discovered without the treachery of some
one possessed of the secret. Leaving Ida here in
comparative safety, Claude determined not to remain
with them, but to reconnoitre from a distant position,
and to defend it from any one who might by chance
approach it.
He therefore selected a spot where he thought he
would be concealed, and remained, with emotions of
mixed agony and happiness, to await the events of this
interesting day. He could see the towers of the
chateau
,
and, before an hour had elapsed, he beheld their
tops surrounded with masses of smokea sad token of
the work of destruction going on beneath. Off his guard,
he gazed at this ominous sign with so much attention,
that he did not observe the approach of four soldiers till
they were so near that they discovered him. He had
one loaded pistol. His enemies were completely
armed. His first impulse was to sell his life dearly;
but he reflected that resistance was certain death, while
submission afforded at least a chance of safety. He
yielded, therefore, with readiness, and was instantly
conducted back to the chateau.
It was with some difficulty that he could repress an
exclamation of horror at the sight which met his view
on arriving there. The large saloon was filled with a
clamorous and half-drunken band of soldiers, seated
at the tables, having finished an ample feast. The
servants
were bound and ranged against the wall.
Several
of them were females. Colonel St. Marie himself
stood also bound in the midst of them, his face and
dress stained with blood from a wound on his head.
The ruin of the interior of the chateau was nearly
accomplished
.
The costly furniture was scattered around
in fragments, having been wantonly broken with axes
and pikes. All that was portable and valuable was
stowed away in sacks and wagons. Mirrors had been
dashed to atoms; statues, clocks, candelabras,
chandeliers
,
shattered; and invaluable paintings and rich old
tapestry cut to pieces with sabres and bayonets.
Everything
which could be discovered in the building
had been brought forth to supply the demands of five
hundred voracious soldiers; and whole pipes of choice
wine had been dragged from the cellar, and had been
already so far exhausted by the brutal guests, that a
general excitement, not far from actual intoxication,
had reduced them from the appearance of troops with
at least some claims to discipline, to little better than
a mob of drunken robbers and cutthroats. Money and
plate had been grasped by greedy hands, and were
piled up in baskets preparatory to being packed; and
several attempts had been made to set fire to the
chateau
,
one of which seemed likely to be successful, for
in an adjoining room the flames were slowly advancing,
and emitted volumes of smokewhat Claude had
already
perceived at a distance.
The feast was now done, and the men had risen and
were standing erect as well as they could. The
colonel
fixed himself in his seat with a magisterial air, and,
slapping his hand furiously down upon the table till he
made the plates and glasses ring again, commanded
order.
Citizen-soldiers! said this man, with a drunken
hiccough, you have done well. You have done your
duty. We have already the benefit arising from
clearing
France of these vile aristocrats. They must be
swept off the face of the earth like so many reptiles.
The population is to be reduced one fourth. Had
I
been consulted, it should have been one half. Then
there should be bread and wine, and land and gold for
the remainder. Then there would be no more prisons
no more starvationno more oppressionno more
jails. All would be free, happy, and rich. It is these
drones, who eat the fat of the land and do nothing
these ruthless tyrants, who have trampled on you for
so many yearswho have caused all the wretchedness
of poor France. It is decided that her population
must be diminished. Our glorious Dantonour wise
and patriotic Robespierre, have pointed out the way.
We have fired this old den of aristocratsyou may
hear the roaring of the flames. As for the brood of
vipers who have nestled here, their doom is sealed.
They must (hiccough) die. They hate our glorious
revolution, and they must die, I say.
This discourse was delivered with a drunken energy,
which was often interrupted by the inability of the
speaker to proceed from mere intoxication, but yet
more by the coarse and exulting cheers of the
brutal
auditory, and the groans and shrieks of the victims.
These unhappy beingsa few hours before in the full
enjoyment of life and hopethus suddenly brought
upon the brink of eternity, manifested in various ways
their horror and despair. Some shrieked aloudsome
weptsome clasped their hands in silent horror, and
some in pious prayer. St. Marie himselfhis eyes
flashing with horror and rageaddressed the wretch
who sat thus in bloody judgment over him in terms
of dignified remonstrance. But all were alike in
vain.
[4]
[4]
Many a similar scene had been already acted in France. Let it
not be supposed that the writer is drawing an exaggerated picture from
imagination. He copies from historical records; and they who, in
England, or France, or any other country, are so eager to raise the
banner
of revolution, should their rash design prove successful, would
behold
equally awful outrages.
Company, attention, cried Col. Dubois; and for a
moment the rolling of the drums drowned all other
noises. Bring out the prisoners.
They were thrust rudely forward in front of the
chair where the ruffian sat with a magisterial air, his
eye glassy with wine and that appalling desire to glut
his sight with human blood, which seemed then an
epidemic in France.
Here is another prisoner, citizen colonel, said one
of the soldiers; and Claude was thrust roughly into
the middle of the floor. At the sight of him there
was a comparative silence among even the rude
soldiery
,
as if they felt a new interest in the drama.
Who are you? demanded the colonel.
I am a teacher of languages, said Claude, firmly
and boldly. I fled from Berlin to join the
revolutionists
.
I am at a loss to know why these men have
confounded me with the enemies of France.
Were you known to any one as a friend to the
revolution?
Yes, to Danton!
He is the spythe English spy, said the
peasant
who had given the information which led to the
attack.
You are greatly mistaken, said Claude,
composedly
;
I am so far from being a spy, that I was the
first to enter the Tuileries on the glorious tenth of
August
.
I was the first to enter the tyrant's palace.
Humph! said the colonel. That is easily said,
but not so easily proved. The first to enter the
tyrant's
palace! Liar! you shall confront him who was
the first, for he is an officer in our company. Here,
come forward, he cried, beckoning to a person at the
other end of the hall.
A wild-looking young man, with long hair streaming
about his face, and piercing black eyes, stepped
forward
at the call. Claude recognised him in a
moment
as the young leader on that bloody day who had
been so near him.
If this man recognise you, said the colonel, you
shall go free; if not, you die on the spot for a liar and
an aristocrat. Hey, my brave boys! is not this
Solomon's
decision?
And he laughed triumphantly at the certainty which
he presumed he had now established of convicting his
prisoner in this summary way.
It is hardly fair, said Claude; but, to show you
how sure I am, and how little I fear any harm from
these my comrades in the great cause, citizen colonel,
I accept the offer.
Look at him, then, said the colonel.
Lazarre fixed his bright black eyes upon him,
measured
him with his glances from head to foot, and said,
NoI never saw him. He is an impostor.
But I saw you, said Claude, calmly; and I will
convince you you also saw me.
If you did, said the stranger, haughtily, you
would know my name. It was sounded that day by
mouths enough.
You were called
Lazarre
, said Claude. You
mounted the great stairs waving a banner, on which
was inscribed, `
Down with the Veto!
' You shot a
Swiss at the entrance.
Flying?
Noin his box. Behind you were borne three
heads on a pike; and when we learned the flight of
the tyrant, you exclaimed, `
N'importe, mes amis; nous
y reviendrons!
' In the kitchen youthat is,
we
threw a fugitive into the flames.
By Gracchus! did we not? said Lazarre,
extending
his hand. Not a hair of your head shall be
touched.
And it is hard, after being foremost in tearing down
the tyrant's thronein ridding the nation of her
oppressors
to
find myself counted among them, said
Claude, in a surly tone, and with a frown of anger at
Colonel Dubois.
Ha! get back, then, citizen, in God's name, said
the colonel, as Lazarre again greeted him with a
friendly
welcome. As for
youcoquins! nigeauds! co
chons!
cried the colonel, addressing the rest of the
prisoners, look your last on the light of day. The
enemies of France must fall! Revenge (hiccough)
revenge is the order of the day. You're rebels!
(hiccough) you're aristocrats! (hiccough) and ye
must die! Silence, I say, cried he, as the voices of
the prisoners burst forth, some in supplication, some in
threats. There is one chance for you; a woman
a girl,
parbleu!
has escaped us, and is concealed
somewhere, as I am informed, in or about this
chateau
.
He or she among you who will tell me where
she is hidden, shall receive his life as a reward; for
the restSergeant Gregoire, lead your prisoners into
the court. Choose a file of twenty men, the least
drunk among ye, and make short work of them, for
we must be on our journey. Hark ye, wretchesI
give you
one minute
which of you will tell me where
this young breeder of rebels and aristocrats is?
There were seven among the prisoners. Of them
St. Marie and one servant alone knew Ida's place of
concealment. The latter had heard the order which
St. Marie had given, but he remained pale and
motionless
.
Claude believed that all this brutal parade was but
a mode of tempting those who knew the secret into a
confession.
Allons, messieurs!
said Dubois; you have ten
seconds. By Brutus! I am in earnest.
You cannotyou dare not cried St. Marie.
Ah! old
coquin
, that is your opinion!
In the name of humanityof France cried St.
Marie.
Sergeant Gregoire, said the colonel, the time
has expired. Forward, and do your duty.
The sergeant advanced. He had placed himself at
the head of twenty men, who, with their charged
bayonets
,
compelled the prisoners to proceed. Claude
caught one agonized glance from St. Marie. At the
Vol. II.U
door one man stopped and cried aloud for mercy. It
was the old servant who alone possessed the secret.
Lache! cried St. Marie.
Stop, cried the man, I will revealI willI
will and he fell upon his knees in the last
paroxysm
of terror.
Speak out, then, reptile, thundered Dubois.
I willI will gasped the trembling old man,
nearly insensible with terror; shesheI cannot
I am choked!
And may God's curse fall on
him
, cried St.
Marie
,
with a voice so deep and stern, that, for a moment,
it awed even the half-drunken wretch himself who
presided
over this diabolical scenemay God's curse
light on him who, to save his miserable life, commits
my sweet child to the grasp of these hellhoundsthe
curse of Goda dying man calls it down upon him
and his for ever!
I cannot help it, gasped the man; give me life,
and I care not. Sheshe is hidden in
All leaned forward with increasing interest to catch
the words from his pale and quivering lips. St. Marie
struggled to spring upon him. He was bound, and
held by two strong men. But the speaker's voice was
stopped by another hand. A bullet from the
remaining
pistol of Claude, which he had carefully concealed
in his bosom, lodged in the temples of the unhappy
wretch. He fell back dead without a groan. St.
Marie
gave a shout of triumph, and a wild yell of fury
burst from the throng, who threw themselves upon
Claude, with their muskets and sabres in hand, to cut
him to pieces.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
At
the tumult which followed this bold act, Claude
believed his last moment had come. He was seized
by a dozen brawny hands, sabres flashed and clashed
before his eyes, and he was borne to the floor, and had
scarcely time to commit himself to the mercy of his
Creator, ere he felt two bullets whiz past his head, and
a sword pass through his body. The next instant
would have terminated his existence had not Colonel
Dubois himself interfered. His deep, coarse voice, in
tones of thunder, demanded order, and his gigantic arm
rescued his victim from immediate destruction, in
order
to succeed, if possible, in tearing the secret from
him before his death. It was after much discord and
struggling that the commander succeeded in forming
his men once more in a kind of order, and he instantly
proceeded to question Claude. Accounts of the
beauty
of the young girl who had escaped him had excited
his curiosity and inflamed his imagination, and he
resolved
to secure her at any rate. The continual
return
of the men who had been sent in search of her
without having accomplished their object, yet farther
aroused his passion.
So, friend, you know the secret hiding-place, then?
said he, as Claude, whose wound was much slighter
than he thought, stood bleeding, but unshrinking, before
him.
I do.
You will reveal it to me?
No.
You shall be richly rewarded if you doyou shall
die like a dog if you refuse.
I am ready.
Is she your mistress?
She is a woman, and I cannot betray her.
We will see. Sergeant Gregoire, leave this bold
youth with me. Conduct the rest of the prisoners
into the court, and do your dutyinstantly.
Stupified, incredulous, bewildered, the unhappy
beings
were marched out. The soldiers' tramping tread
was heard as they drew up on the pavements under
the window, and at each motion their muskets clanked
with an ominous regularity.
Dubois filled a large glass with wine till it overflowed.
You think, perhaps, I am not in earnest, said he.
Claude's heart turned to ice. He could not believe
his eyes.
Will you save your life? I swear you shall be
untouched if you will utter one word to put me on the
clew.
I am not a traitor. I cannot purchase my life at
such a price, replied Claude.
At that instant was heard the discharge of musketry,
and a deep groan, that made Claude thrill with horror
in every fibre of his frame. Even Dubois turned pale.
Claude's face also was bloodless, and a faintness came
over him, such as no pen may describesuch as he
thought would suspend his being without the aid of the
executioner.
Let them cry `
Vive le Roi' now!
said Dubois;
and as for
you
you shall follow them in
one minute
if you do not reveal your secret; will you do so?
I protest against this brutal barbarity, said Claude.
I cannot believe, Monsieur le Colonel, that you will
murder me for refusing the basest act of cowardice
and treachery. I throw myself upon your generosity
your
mercy
(and his voice quivered).
Do you mean to say, cried Dubois, turning livid
with rage, that you still
refuse
to discover the retreat
of this woman?
I do, said Claude.
Sergeant Gregoire here marched in at the head of
his silent company, who ranged themselves in a line
before the table, and at his command reloaded their
pieces.
Gregoire, said Dubois, lead ten more men into
the court, and send this obstinate fool after his
companions
.
Cold-blooded fiend! said Claude.
The ruffian made a furious gesture with his arm.
Forwardmarch, said the sergeant, with military
brevity.
Claude advanced. He had done with life. This,
then, was death. They passed from the hallthrough
the corridorinto the open air. The sky was above
him. The afternoon sunshine fell calm and yellow in
the court. The breeze touched his face. He heard
the barking of a dogthe careless warble of a bird
a flock of pigeons swept down into the court, and,
frightened by the soldiery, rose and mounted again into
the balmy air. He beheld the waving branches of the
trees. The silver clouds were lying in the heavens,
and the broad green fields were stretched in the
distance
.
He cast one look abovearoundthen the
form of Ida arose to his imagination.
One word could save him, but that word would
consign her to a fate worse than death.
No, said Claude; when the hand of a profligate
dashed a blow upon my forehead, I refused to peril my
life because I thought the occasion unworthy of it.
Here humanityhonourcourage, call upon me to
throw it away. May God protect this now
unfriended
girl and receive my soul.
Comrades! said Claude, with a firm, bold voice.
Hold! he yields, cried Dubois from the window.
I ask one favour!
It shall be granted! cried Dubois.
Let me give the word
myself;
and, when you fire,
aim at the heart
.
The sound of horses' hoofs was heard. They
approached
at a rapid rate. A horseman rode into the
court. He was of gigantic stature. The crowd of
U 2
ruffians recognised him, and hailed his approach with
acclamations and cries of
Vive Danton!
What is thiswho is this? cried he.
Sacre
diable!
I know this face. Ah! where is your
colonel
,
my good fellows? You have been busy, I see;
so much the better; but thisI have seen that face
before, and I owe it a service. See, he is falling. Is
he already dead?
In truth, loss of blood and the emotions of these
scenes had been too much for Claude's strength. He
had stood erect to receive the fire of the soldiers, and
he had already bidden farewell to earth; but in the
delay
so much beyond the moment, when he expected to
receive the fire of his murderers in his bosom, the
excitement
of the moment, which had sustained him till
then, gave wayhis brain swama coldness, a
faintness
,
and then a darkness crept over him. He
believed
already the ghastly ordeal past. He sank
down upon the stones, and saw and heard no more of
what was going on around him.
CHAPTER XXIX.
It
was several days after the preceding events, and
at the first sign of daybreak on a cloudless morning
towards the latter part of the autumn, that a wretched,
half-broken carriage, with two spavined horses and a
ragged postillion, drew up at a small
auberge
near the
old chateau St. Marie. A rough but strong horse,
saddled
,
was attached to a post at the door; and Claude,
in the Jacobin costume of that period, at the sound of
the wheels, appeared at the door and had some
moments'
consultation with the postillion. They both
looked
with many signs of impatience towards Paris, when
the sound of another vehicle was heard with such
lively tokens of satisfaction that it was easy to discover
how much interest they had in its approach. They
then retired within the house, of which the
window-shutters
and curtains were carefully closed. The
second
carriage also drew up at the little inn, and three
figures stepped out. One was St. Marie, the other
Carolan, the third the tall and gaunt figure of Danton
his rough and burly visage expanded with
good-humour
,
and his deep voice every instant making itself
heard in half-uttered exclamations of pleasure and
self-satisfaction
.
Ah! ca! voyons!
said he, patting Carolan; go
in
par Dieu!
ha! ha!
Attendez, mon ami, attendez
you will see in the house--ah! ha! ha!
Of these three persons, the most strikingly changed
in dress, appearance, and manner was Carolan. He
was pale, emaciated, ragged, and stained with filth.
His manner was subdued into a wretchedness and
despair
which strongly contrasted with his usual
self-complacency
and arrogance; and he looked with such
a bewildered and terrified air upon his facetious
conductor
,
and watched so eagerly for the person who
should answer the tap on the door, that it was clear he
had not yet been let into the secret of what he was to
behold. Indeed, he had been now, for the first time,
taken out of his miserable prison, where he had been
many months confined, and where he had witnessed
scenes enough to break the spirit of a bolder man; and
he expected little more in the present morning than
to be conducted to the guillotine, or to be massacred
in some less open way. Half dead with terror and
exhaustion, he was led hastily in through the opened
door, and found himself in the presence of Claude, who,
completely dressed for travelling, seized his hand and
led him into a room, where Ida, in the plain dress of
a maid-servant, which she had procured from
Annette
(and in which, by-the-way, she looked extremely
pretty
),
threw herself into his arms with a flood of tears.
What is this? where are we? St. Marie!
Wyndham
!
Stay not to inquire, my dearest father, said Ida,
clinging to his bosom with streaming eyes.
But
Be satisfied, said Claude. Dearest sir, all is
right; we have no time to lose. This moment we
take our flight out of France.
Ah, Dieu! out of France? By what means? How
have I escaped my dungeon? where? what friend?
Danton drew off dozens for the guillotineit is but
by the chance of a lot that I was not beheaded
yesterday
.
Come, come, said the huge and good-humoured
stranger, a cloud passing a moment over his broad,
rough countenance, nothing against Danton this
morning, if you please.
I
am
Danton!
and it is to
me
, under that honest person yonder, that you owe
your freedom. What! do you think me a monster,
because you do not see the wisdom of the plans which
a dire necessity makes me follow for poor oppressed
France? Believe me, sir, although I am the
reluctant
cause of much unhappiness and bloodshed, it is
for France and for mankind that I am so. But do not
carry away with you, to the happy country where I
learn you are going, the idea that I am insensible to
kind emotions. No! I sympathize with the distress I
am compelled to occasion, and often I relieve it. Be
yourselves at once the witnesses and the proof of my
mercy. To free Carolan and St. Marie I have been
obliged to make great exertions, and to run even some
danger; but I am not the man to be easily discouraged.
Goyou are free. Your course to Nymeguen shall
not be interrupted. I send with you an officer, with
such a passport as will carry you past the frontier
without a single stoppage. Go, friends, to a happy
landto a happier fate; leave France to woes
unutterable
,
and
me
, perhaps, to the
scaffold!
He passed out without other adieu, and the carriage
which brought him was heard rattling away back to
Paris.
What magic! what guardian angel! muttered
Carolan; who has done all this?
Ida pointed to Claude, and strove to speak, but
could not.
Allons, messieurs, en route, said a strange voice,
startling all from their mutual congratulations. It was
the
gen d'armes
provided by Danton.
I am desired to see you safe to the frontier, said
the soldier; we have no time to lose.
It need not be added that but little time was wasted
in getting ready. The count and Ida, with Annette
and St. Marie, entered the carriage. Claude mounted
his horse. He was thoroughly armed, and it would
have been ill with any one who had interrupted their
path.
The old horses accomplished the journey better than
could have been expected from their appearance; and
at length, all dangers past, they reached Rotterdam,
and sought in a good hotel the repose of mind and
body of which they all stood in need.
History, which records the extraordinary manner in
which a crowd of ladies belonging to the court of the
unfortunate Marie Antoinette were rescued from the
mob by one or two of the leaders of the memorable
attack on the royal chateau on the tenth of August, and
escorted in safety from the scene of action, has also
left several authentic evidences of intervals of the
kind-heartedness
and
bonhomie
of Danton, and his
readiness
to sympathize with individual instances of
distress
,
even at the time when he was calculating how
many hundred thousand heads were to fall before
France could be depopulated to the necessary point.
We cannot think of entering too much into details
respecting the few days passed by our party of
fugitives
at Rotterdam, to recover from the exhaustion
consequent upon their visit to France, and to wait also
the sailing of the vessel which was to bear them to
London, for there it had been determined they should
go. Count Carolan's broken health and St. Marie's
age and feebleness nearly monopolized the society of
Ida; and Claude, with a delicacy peculiar to his
character
,
avoided pressing himself too much into their
presence. After a separation so long and events so
agitating, he preferred leaving them together; besides
which, he had many arrangements to make, letters to
write, and affairs to attend to, of which they little
suspected
the import. It was impossible, however, to
avoid many moments of solitary meeting, which were
full of enchantment to Claude, as they fully confirmed
those tokens of tender confidence which had escaped
from his charge while flying through the wood from
the chateau St. Marie. Their mutual demeanour,
without any formal avowal of their attachment, had
insensibly
assumed a character more and more
indicative
of the sentiments they entertained for each other
far different from what it had ever been before, and,
perhaps, from what either intended. Long before the
ship-captain who had agreed to take them to London
was ready to sail, Claude had learned to regard Ida
as his own, with a feeling of deep happiness which
more than compensated for all that he had suffered;
and she also, by no means a dull scholar, had learned
to listen to his wordsto lean on his armto gaze
into his face, as the fondest wife receives the regards
of the happiest husband.
The rescue of St. Marie had been all but miraculous.
When on the point of massacring him, it was
discovered
that he had a large sum of money in the hands of
an English banker. It was the policy of certain
among the rulers of that period to spare those who
could purchase their lives with a sufficient ransom.
St. Marie had been saved, and secretly sent to Paris,
and thrust into the same prison which contained
Carolan
,
until he should complete the transfer necessary
to his release. He had shared the benefit of Claude's
negotiations, but both he and Carolan were
impoverished
.
Their whole fortune had been sacrificed.
Carolan had strangely altered during his several
months' experience of a prison and the few hours when
he thought they were leading him to death. All his
pomposity of manner had disappeared. He was
simple
,
grateful, and perfectly natural. He did not even
appear half so much an  (the word Claude had
used himself in former times, but wondered that he
should have done so) as he was generally considered;
but, on the contrary, he discovered himself to be a man
of mind, sense, and feeling, which valuable attributes
had been miraculously restored by a wholesome period
of adversity. How many are there who would be
improved
by the same means! There were moments when
Claude even respected and liked him; and our
manuscript
goes on to assert, that the favourable opinion
thus produced of his good taste and discrimination
was by no means diminished when, one day, just as
Claude and Ida were proposing to go out to walk
probably for the last time before the little vessel which
was to bear them to London, and which was to start
with the first fair wind, should sailhe came out with,
Wyndham, you are the very finest fellow that ever
lived. Your conduct to me has been entirely noble.
I have been reflecting on it a great deal, and, I am
ashamed to add, mine to you has been unworthy of
me. You have acted like a man, and I like a fool. I
am sadly impoverished by the demand of Danton, but
I hope I am not ruined. I have enough for us all to
live upon, and
Here Claude turned very red, and Ida equally pale;
but, in a moment, as if they were exchanging cheeks
as well as hearts, Ida turned crimson, and the blood
ebbed from the face of Claude.
You have saved Ida's life and
I think the wind is freshening, said Ida, rising,
and we shall sail to-night.
But not, said the count, drawing her towards him,
and suffering her to hide her face in his bosom, till I
have consigned you, Ida, to a master abler to protect
and worthier to possess you than I or any other
human
being.
I cannot, said Claude, at present enter into any
such contract.
Cannot! echoed Carolan, the colour now in turn
spreading over his face.
Ida only clung to him the more closely, with a faint
exclamation, which was instantly suppressed.
I deem it proper, said Carolan, a touch of his
old manner crossing him for the first time since his
imprisonment, to say, that I have no authority for my
remark but your own apparent desire; and that an
imperative
sense of duty will demand, that instantly
Suspend your displeasure for a while, my dear
count, said Claude. There is another
a lady
, who
has a prior right over me.
Ida sprang back and gazed with astonishment.
Why, confound it, sir! thundered the count, are
you already married?
At London I will tell all, said Claude, with a
quiet smile. You have kept me some time waiting;
do not complain if, for a few hours
Complain! said Carolan, with his chin again in
the air.
Ida looked at Claude; his eyes were not averted,
and he even took her hand, and pressed it respectfully
and tenderly to his lips.
They were interrupted by the captain, a fine old
English sailor, with a face the colour of a mahogany
table.
Come, shipmates, said he, all ready! we're off
in an hour, and, with this wind, we shall see the Tower
in less than no time.
That will be an extremely short passage! said
Claude, who seemed blessed with an uncommon flow
of spirits, which no one had ever seen in him before;
but you cannot be too quick for us, my old heart of
oak!
Come aboard, then, sir, and we'll show you what
the little
Sally Darly
can do. She'll make eleven
knot before ten. Take care of that plank, miss.
Hadn't you better let me hand the young lady, sir?
No, captain, said Claude; if the
Sally Darly
is
such an interesting creature, you must devote yourself
to her, and I shall relieve you of the young lady, who
has her good points too.
Ida lifted her eyes half tearfully, half laughingly to
his, and, if wonder was mixed with their tenderness,
he saw at once there was no doubt. As they crossed
the plank over which it was necessary to pass to the
Sally Darly
from the wharf, Ida shrunk a moment
from the narrow board; but Claude drew her arm in
his, and, as he supported her on her way, it was quite
surprising to see the effect of mere timidity upon her
cheeks; for it was not proved that the single word
which Claude murmured in her ear as he passed his
arm around her waist and partly carried her on board,
could have had any connexion with their heightened
colour, nor with the downcast glance of quiet
happiness
which was scarcely shaded by her glittering
lashes.
The
Sally Darly
, unlike belles in general, more
than equalled the praises of her admirer. She sped
over the water with all the impatience felt by some of
her passengers; and at last the sweet shores of old
Englandland of peace and virtuethat emerald
gem set in the silver searose on either side of them.
The now nearer shores revealed their soft beauties to
the eyes of the enchanted travellers, whose joy was
only clouded by a reflection of the frightful wo which
devoured the unhappy land they had left behind. The
Sally Darly
, faithful to her captain's promise, was soon
anchored off the Tower, and the party was speedily
landed and committed to the mercies of the
custom-house
officers, who were then, as they are now, very
civil fellows to those who deserve it.
While waiting for the examination of their luggage,
St. Marie and Carolan held a long consultation in a
distant corner of the room, which, by their gloomy
Vol. II.X
faces, was probably concerning the total ruin of their
fortunes.
Ida and Claude sat together upon a bench, waiting,
whether with impatience or not we shall not say, for
the termination of this their second, but less serious
captivity. While engaged in conversing, in a low voice,
in a shadowy embrasure of the room, Ida's veil drawn
close over her bonnet, so that no one except her
companion
could distinguish her features, a boy entered
and handed to Claude a note. It was addressed to
Mademoiselle Ida Carolan, and it was her mother's
handwriting.
She opened it with trembling eagerness. It ran
thus:
My beloved Child
,
Having just despatched a line to your father, I avail
myself of a last moment to tell you I am in London,
well and happy. I have heard all by the attentive care
of Mr. Wyndham. I know that your father's and
uncle's
splendid fortunes are entirely sacrificed, but I
know also that you are safe, and that makes me happy.
Yes, my child, we are beggarswe have nothing; but
we shall meet in an hour, and this thought makes all
misfortunes supportable.
Adieu for an hour, etc., etc.
My mother in London? said Ida. Oh,
you
have done this!
I wrote her from Paris to meet us there.
And
ruined
andand
well
, said Ida, the
momentary
shadow of her face passing away in the
joyful
news of her mother's recovered health and presence
in London.
Yes, dearest Ida, she tells you the truth; your
father's
fortune, as well as your uncle's, is entirely gone.
Can you be happy without the splendour to which you
have been accustomed? Without palacesand
equipages
and
serving-men? Can you be happy beneath a
lowly roofwithout societywithout grandeur
leading
a simple, a lonely life, evendespised by the
unfeeling
pitied
by the compassionateneglected, and
at length forgotten by all? Can you be happy thus,
dear Ida?
He held out his hand; she laid her own in it with a
blush that gave new charm to her beauty.
With
you
in the loneliest spot  beneath the
humblest rooffar away from grandeur and the grand
I ask no more. Oh, if you could know how often
and often I have wished my father was poorthat he
would lose all his fortune, that there might be no
obstacle
to our union. You think I shall regret my
grandeur? Oh, nonever! It has made my
unhappiness
.
It separated me from you.
Where shall we go, then? What shall we do?
You know I am but just out of prison for a paltry debt.
How shall we get our living in England?
Oh, a thousand ways. I will become a governess.
I will teach languages, as
you
did. Little did you
know how I admired your conducthow II
loved
youwhen I used to see you, so meanly dressedso
paleso melancholyso neglectedgoing through
the streets to give your lessons. Your common clothes
were a thousand times more beautiful to me than all
the handsomest court uniforms; and when I used to
be at the king's suppers, how much rather I should
have been with you in your poor jail. Ohthe tears
filled her eyes
never
will you know what I suffered
till I succeeded in making Lavalle relieve you!
Well, then, you shall become a governess, and I
will also teach languages. We will open a little school
together
Oh, we shall be too
too
happy!
In the mean time, I have a mother
You a
mother?
you! How extremely strange! I
thoughtthey told me
Yes, I have a mother. We are going to her house.
Prepare yourself to be pained at the meanness, the
poverty of my abode; a miserable contrast to your
father's
gorgeous palace at Berlin. Then my mother
I hope you will like her!
Oh, I am sure I shall, said Ida, but with a timid
and hesitating air, and pale at the gloomy picture he
had presented.
They were now released by the custom-house
officers
,
and passed into the street, free to go
whithersoever
they would.
But where
shall
we go? said the count. Have
you thought of this, Mr. Wyndham?
Oh yes, said Ida, timidly.
I really cannot tell the way myself, said Claude,
but yonder is a person who perhaps will assist us.
A stout, good-looking, and very neatly-dressed man,
in a plain but handsome livery, approached as he spoke.
Welcome, my lord! said he. Welcome back
to England!
Ida looked inclined to laugh, and Carolan stared in
silent surprise.
Is he crazy? asked Ida of Claude, in a whisper.
The carriage is in this direction, said the man,
respectfully. The servants will take your lordship's
things, if you'll please to say which they are.
Claude did so, and followed James.
They found a large and elegant carriage waiting for
them. Claude aided in Ida, and St. Marie, and the
count, and then entered himself. Annette, all
astonished
,
found herself on the box with a coachman so large
and dignified looking, so curiously and elegantly
dressed
,
that she knew not whether he was not a great
English
lord.
Grosvenor Square! said James. Drive fast!
And off they dashed, at a velocity which might have
taxed the powers even of the
Sally Darly
to equal.
They stopped before a magnificent mansion. A
crowd of domestics were at the door and ranged along
the hall. All was loftygrandmagnificent.
Where
are
we going? said the count. Permit
mereallyto observe, Mr. Wyndham, that
Where
where
are we? said Ida, as they entered
a suite of splendid drawing-rooms.
At home!
my sweet, sweet girl, said a
well-known
voice; and she was folded in the arms of her
mother, and then of Madame Wharton.
And my heromy
son!
said Madame Wharton,
pale as death, and her face bathed in tears.
Palepaler than all the dangers through which he
had passed could make him, Claude entered the last.
It seemed as if he had paused to gather strength and
firmness to meet the flood of joy which now
over-whelmed
him.
My mother! my beloved mother! was all his
quivering lips could utter; and they were folded in each
other's arms, with emotions which we shall be easily
excused for not attempting to depict.
How all the discoveries were communicated to each
otherhow Ida and the count were made to
comprehend
how
Claude learned what he had still to learn
how the servants gazed at their new masterhow
comfortable and elegant every one of the worn and
exhausted
travellers found the apartments separately
allotted
to themhow all were refreshed by the bath,
the toilet, and the most delightful restorativeshow
Annette's head almost turned giddy with joy when she
found in what way her disinterested affection for her
young mistress was to be rewardedhow transformed
they all were in a few hours, by aid of new costume,
and the care of maids and valetshowin short, it
would be an endless, if not a hopeless task to describe
the scenes which followed. Suffice it to say, that
everything went just as it should; everything fell out
as fortunately as if it had been a play, or a piece of
enchantment, or one of the mere fictions which those
good-for-nothing varlets the novel writers invent
according
to their own idle imagination.
Some days entirely restored the whole party to
health and spirits; for, when the mind is free from
care and the heart at ease, the body is easily cured.
X 2
CHAPTER XXVIII.
There
is much more to relate of the prominent
characters in the past history, but we are already, we
fear, trespassing beyond the limits generally allotted
to such a story. The reader will, we trust, excuse
omissions which the may easily supply with his own
imagination.
It was many weeks before Claude sufficiently
recovered
from the avocations and emotions consequent
upon the new position in which he found himself, to
think calmly upon the past or the future. Within that
period he had become the husband of her whom he
had loved so ardently, and for whom he had dared so
many dangers. The novel prospects opened to him
the duties, acquaintances, responsibilities, pleasures,
and plans, so far above all his wildest fancy could have
pictured or his highest hopes desiredexpanded his
mind with almost a new existence. It required all his
firmness of character to remain unchanged; but he
did
so; and, ere many months had passed away, he
had subdued excesses of joy as he had before done
excesses of grief, and learned to move with calmness
and self-possession in his new sphere. A more
contented
husband, a happier wife, perhaps never
assumed
the graver responsibilities of matrimony. For
each had that conscientious and clear perception of
dutythat innate sense of moral right, which had
sustained
both in adversity, and did not desert them in
prosperity. Amid the happiness by which they were
surrounded, consisting of all that earth could bestow,
they did not fail to prostrate themselves, as humbly as
ever they had done at their darkest hour, before that
Supreme Being before whom all the forms of life are
as passing shadows, except what is founded in the
power of self-government and the practice of virtue, at
the sacrifice even of the world's applauseeven of the
happiness of the heart.
Some time after their union, Claude walked through
one of the back streets of London in order to seek and
relieve a poor fugitive recently escaped out of France.
He arrived at the door of the house indicated as the
residence of the object of his search. He knocked.
The man was not at home, and he was leaving the
door, when a woman, apparently a beggar, passed him
and entered the door. She had on a worn and
tattered
frock, entirely divested of ornament; an old
bonnet
scarcely fit for use. It was a cold winter day,
but she was without cloak, shawl, and gloves, and
seemed emaciated with sickness, grief, and hunger,
and trembling with cold. As she entered she
staggered
against the wall, apparently intoxicated; so much
so that Claude drew back, with that disgust which one
feels at beholding a woman in so degraded a situation.
She's drunk, sir, poor thing, said the
bloated-faced
woman who kept the wretched lodging-house;
but I never seed her so afore. She's generally a
werry temperate person, though werry poor pay. I
must turn her out to-day, as I can't afford to take
people
in my house for nothingand drunken sluts like
her too! Here, yougood woman! you might as well
hear it now as later. You must clear out o' my house.
Trampclear! Your room's better than your
company
!
Claude was about leaving the steps, when he was
arrested by the voice of the unfortunate creature, and
the deep anguish and pathos so far removed from
intoxication
.
For God's dear sake, do not turn me out to-day!
said she. I shall die on the pavement.
Die where you like, so long as you don't die in my
house, replied the woman.
Oh, what shall I do?
People as can afford to get drunk
Drunk? Oh, I am not, believe me. I am only
faint from fatigue and want of food.
She turned her faceClaude's eyes fell upon it.
Great God! he cried, do my eyes deceive me?
Noit is impossible.
Mr. Wyndham! Merciful Heaven! I thank you.
Yes, it is I.
Mrs. Denham!
Yesstarving in the streetfainting with hunger.
Oh, sir, she added, a flood of shame crimsoning
her pale face, that you should ever see me in this
situation!
Tears of bitter pain and self-reproach filled Claude's
eyes, and had hitherto kept him silent. In the
fulness
of his bliss he had neglected to inquire of her.
Poor Denham! he faltered.
Don't name him! Oh, Mr. Wyndham, that rash
actthat selfishthatwhat suffering it has caused
me! My father
Your father?
Dead!
And your friendsyour family?
All that I could have appealed to are far away
from London, and I would not be a burden to those
already poor. I thought I could make a living, first
by drawing, then by teaching music, then by sewing,
and lately by going out to service. Yes, I have been
a
maid-servant
rather than eat the bread of beggary
or shame. But my helplessnessmy feeblenessmy
miserymy ill health, disqualified me for all
occupation
.
I have been ill, too, and alone; the privations I
have sufferedthe coarse unkindness of the people
about methe insults offered me, and the gross vice
I have been obliged to witnessto be in contact with
oh, Charles, Charles, had you known what was to
follow, would you have brought upon your poor wife
all these horrors?
And Ellen?
She has a place at a shoemaker's in the city. She
works fourteen hours a day, and scarcely gains her
bread; they abuse and beat hersheI
And the unhappy being, turning ashy pale, staggered
back, and would have fallen had not Claude caught
her on his arm.
He called instantly for a hackney-coach, and, in the
mean time, the woman of the house administered to
her wants with a world of protestations and apologies.
She said that she had already pitied her from her
heartthat she had already seen she was something
better than common. She had told her husband she
would not wonder if she had been even a
carriage-lady
in her time.
Madam Denham revived as the coach drove up to
the door, and Claude supported her in with the
assistance
of a maid, whom he requested to accompany
them. He ordered the coachman to drive at once to
Grosvenor Square. Ida received her unhappy guest
with the sympathy which such hearts as hers always
feel with misfortune; but when she learned who she
was, and how far her husband was, although
innocently
,
the cause of her calamity, she fully entered
into all his feelings, and protested she should watch
over and cherish her as a beloved sister.
In the night the poor invalid grew worse; she was
attacked with a violent and dangerous fever, in the
course of which, at length, reason entirely deserted
her. It was only by means of force that she could be
kept in bed. Her paroxysms during this period were
shocking to behold. She acted over again, in
imagination
,
the terrible scene which she had suffered in Berlin.
She still seemed to wait and wait for the beloved
husband
who was never to return alive. She fancied she
heard the hours strike teneleventwelveone, and
at length that she beheld borne in the dead body of him
who a few hours before had been her support, her
refuge
,
her pride, her happiness, her hope. Again she
kissed
his pale lips, felt his cold bosom, and thought her
fingers stained with his blood. Then she fancied that
she had passed away from that dark scene and fatal
hour. She was wandering about Londonshrinking
from police-officerspraying mercy of the licentious
and the intoxicated, and that they would not insult her
and at length she implored bread from the
street-passengers
.
Ah! give me breadonly bread! Work? I
cannot
.
Look at these arms! Cruel! he's gone. Ah!
madam, will
you
take pity on me? I am starving! A
prison? For mercy's sake, no!
All the skill of the physician could not treat this
state of excitement with much hope of recovery.
Early the next morning, leaving Mrs. Denham to
the tender care of Ida, Claude went in his carriage to
the shop of the shoemaker, whose address he had
learned
,
and where his little favourite Ellen had been bound
as an apprentice. It was a mean, low, dark, filthy
shop, in a damp, narrow, blind alley. A
brutal-looking
man with a red nose, and harsh, appalling features,
was tending the shop, while a shrewish woman, with a
face sour as vinegar, had been examining the work of
the little girl, who, pale and silent, in ragged and dirty
clothes, sat by the window binding a shoe.
It's wretchedly done. It isn't fit to be seen, said
the woman; you little, lazy, good-for-nothing slut,
take that! And she gave her a blow upon the ears
enough to make the child's brain reel again.
Ah! that's right; it's the only way to make
anything
of her.
It's the best I could do, said Ellen, in a voice so
unhappy and resigned that it went to Claude's heart.
Silence, you vagabond. Do you bandy words with
me
too? said the man. What can I do for you,
sir? said he, turning to Claude with a smile fit for a
customer.
Ellen did not raise her eyes.
I have come to see this little girl, said Claude.
But the tones of his voice had no sooner reached
Ellen's ears, than she uttered an exclamation of acute
surprise and joy, and lifted her eyes. On
recognising
him as he extended his arms, she started up with
a scream of exquisite delight.
Why, what on earth is in the child? said the man,
leaning over with a threatening countenance, and
raising
his hand to strike her.
But his arm was arrested by Claude, and the brutal
tyrant was thrust with some force against the wall on
the opposite side of the room.
Zounds and fury, sir, cried the man, rushing
forward
with clinched fists, if you were the king, I'd
learn you better manners than that!
Stop, sir, said Claude, calmly but firmly
grasping
him by the throat; you are a brutal, infamous,
drunken scoundrel; you must
know
that such
treatment
as I have witnessed towards this little girl
subjects
you to severe punishment; and, if you advance
farther, I shall be obliged to teach you on the spot a
lesson you deserve to learn.
Oh! Mr. Wyndhamdear, dear Mr. Wyndham
save me! save me from these cruel people!
Who are you, and what are your intentions?
demanded
the man, his wrath and resistance entirely
abated by the stern and cool attitude with which
Claude had addressed him.
There is my card, said Claude. I have the
power to make you rue what you have done; give me
the articles of indenture of this little girl, and let me
take her away, and I will let you go; otherwise I shall
instantly take measures to have you punished.
Your lordship's graceisthe masterI did not
knowthe child can go where your grace's lordship
likesyour worship.
Yescertainlyyour honourable excellency will
not wish to ruin two poor honest people, said the
woman.
Here are the articles, said the man, taking from
a drawer, with hands trembling partly with
intemperance
and partly with rage and fear, the papers
demanded
.
Come, my sweet Ellen, said Claude.
And
my shoe!
said the little girl, trembling and
bewildered.
Let them finish it themselves, my dearest child,
said Claude, smiling; you will have other work, I
hope.
CHAPTER XXIX.
One
more scenethe last which closes our story
was reserved for Claude, as if Providence had wished
to teach, with the full force of contrast, the lesson which
we have feebly endeavoured to illustrate by giving this
true history to the world.
A few days afterward Claude received a visit from
Lavalle. The joy which he felt on seeing him was
checked by his sad air, his pale and thin face, and the
melancholy betrayed in his appearance and actions.
What is the matter with my best of friends? said
Claude.
I am a fugitive from justice. I have killed a man.
You have followed your principles, and I mine. You
must know that Elkington, on leaving Berlin after Ida
rejected him, had made use of expressions
derogatory
to her character. I determined to call him to
account; but, knowing him to be a fatal shot, I
practised
with the pistol till I became as expert as he. I
thought I should revenge your wrongsDenham's
Ida'sand mankind's, by pursuing and killing such a
scourge to society. I had been also unhappy in my
own affairs. The young lady whom I had engaged to
marry betrayed me; and I thought, in case of my
falling
,
there was no one who could mourn my loss. I
therefore followed Elkington, and demanded of him an
apology for the slander he had circulated against Ida.
Perhaps it was more with the hope of falling myself
than of killing my antagonist, for I was really
tired
and disgusted with life.
Against
Ida!
slander! ridiculous, said Claude.
Nevertheless, he had done so; the words he
uttered
merited death; they were the blackest calumny a
man could utter.
And did you deem the poison from the foul lips
of such a man worth your attention?
Yes; he refused to explain, and I called him out.
We fought at Ostend. At the first fire he fell,
mortally
wounded. I fled to London. He still survives,
but has been also brought over here. Since the event
his mind has undergone a great change. He has
become
conscious of his baseness, and bitterly repents of
it. His terror of a future world has been so great that
it has driven him mad.
Can such a man as Elkington fear a future world?
said Claude.
Oh, yes, and more. I believe, from what I have
heard, he is completely repentant. In his intervals of
reason he has demanded to see both me and you.
He says he cannot, he
will
not die till he has
obtained
our pardon. Of me, alas! he has nothing to ask;
but I am wretched with the thought of what I have
done. I did not know what it was to deprive a
fellow-being
of existenceto behold the suffering I have
inflicted
the
death
I have caused. He deserved to die,
but I am sorry
I
am his executioner. Will you see
him?
I had rather not.
It is his
desire
to see us both before he dies.
Where is he?
I tremble to tell.
Where? You frighten me!
In a
mad house!
In Bedlam.
Gracious Heavens!
Deprived of his fortune, he was seized by
creditors
and stripped of everything. When he fought, he
was without the means to live. Of this I knew
nothing
till subsequently. The physician says he will
not, perhaps, last through the day. You
must
come
instantly.
Vol. II.Y
I had rather not; strange feelings of indignation
arise at the mention of that man's name; he is the
murderer of my friend
No matter; you will experience new emotions at
the sight of him, but neither anger nor revenge will be
among them.
Indeed, I had rather not; it would look so like
triumphing
over a fallen enemy.
No, it is to soothe, to oblige, to forgive a dying
enemy.
I
go; it will give
me
much more pain.
Come, then, I
will
go. I have no right to refuse.
They entered a carriage, and drove at once to the
building where lay the fallen, the dying Elkington.
He was lying in a small whitewashed room, entirely
destitute of furniture except the bed he lay on. His
arms and hands were confined in that kind of dress
they call a straight waistcoat, and a strap around his
waist prevented his leaving the bed, or rising farther
than in a sitting posture. His face was so dreadfully
altered that it was with difficulty they recognised him.
His hair, beard, and whiskers were unshorn, and had
grown very long and ragged, and his eyes seemed of
an unnatural size and brightness. Claude and Lavalle
both turned pale with horror as they gazed on this
object
:
Claude with horror and compassion, Lavalle
with bitter self-reproach.
The poor wretch did not hear them come in. He
was lying on his back, stretched out to his full length
his chin raised in the airhis head thrown back,
and moving in sudden jerks, so as to describe a circle
around the room with his eyes  from the floor  up
the wallover the ceilingdown to the floor again.
This he repeated continually, with that monotony of
motion peculiar to madness. Suddenly he exclaimed,
in the most touching voice possible,
Oh, God! how well  how
well
I know this
place!
Claude was thrilled to the soul with the pathos of
that voice. A hidden quality of character appeared in
it; a tenderness, a feeling, which he could not
reconcile
with the nature of the cold, malignant, bad man he
had known and hated so.
Yesyes, he exclaimed, in the same grief-strick
en, touching tones, that I know full well!
He threw up his eyes again, and measured the
ceiling
and walls with them, his head flung back in an
agony
of anguish.
Well, well, we shall seewe shall see, in God's
own good time! Oh! how I know this placehow
well
I know it!
Why, Elkington, my friend, said Claude,
thrilling
in every fibre of his frame, how are you to-day?
He stopped suddenly, like one caught unexpectedly
by observers when he was doing something he
supposed
in complete solitude, and he looked at the
speaker
fixedly, surprisedly, and sternly.
How do you do, Mr. Wyndham? he said, almost
in his natural voice.
I have come to see you. I hope you are better,
and that you have everything comfortable.
He gave another broad and stern gaze, which
suddenly
changed into a silent laugh; then he closed one
eye, and looked slyly with the other into the corner of
the room, as if exchanging signs with some being there
invisible to all but himself. Then he began once more
the motion with his headnow laughing cunningly, as
if chuckling over some secretthen pausing to
measure
his visiters from head to foot, with glances of such
scorn and maliceof hate and ferocityas made it
evident
that only his confinement kept them safe from his
violence. These changes of countenance were
appalling
to behold. You could see though his face, as
into a mirror, the workings of the disturbed sea
beneath
;
the wild, disjointed clouds drifting gloomily
through his mind, sometimes breaking into a gleam of
sunshine, then gathering over in stormy masses black
as night.
Ah! Mr. Wyndham, he cried, suddenly, we
want no dances; no, we had them
once;
we proved
them well
well
ah ha! ah ha! ah ha!
Unable to endure this frightful scene, Lavalle moved
to go.
Elkington suddenly stopped.
Don't godon't go, said he; sit downsit down
sit down on that bed
lie
down on that bed.
We willwe will, said Lavalle, shocked and
trembling to behold the work of his rash hands, we
will come and sit with you often, dear Elkington.
He laughed.
You have a pleasant room, said Claude.
He looked at him as if he would tear him into a
thousand pieces.
Clean and cool, said Lavalle, in a tremulous
voice, hoping, by assuming an indifferent air, to calm
the agitation of his perturbed, wandering mind.
He fixed his glittering, wild, distended eyes on the
speaker, as if he knew he was a hypocriteas if he
read his
soul
. Lavalle could not, without a painful
effort, stand the unearthly glance. Then suddenly he
smiled and said,
Yescool!
very!
With such another scornful glanceso full of hate
of maliceof sarcasmthat both the young men
believed he
knew
he was mad, and hated them for
pretending
not to see the hellish wreck of his mind.
Then he began to laugh, and mow, and wink at the
invisible beings who seemed to hold unearthly
communion
with him in the corner.
The doctor came in as they stood beside this
frightful
spectacle.
Will he live, doctor? said Claude.
No; to-morrow, at farthest, will carry him off.
Will he recover his reason?
No, probably not. He will sink rapidly after this
excitement leaves him.
No rational communication with him? asked
Lavalle
.
Never again this side the grave, said the doctor.
Good-morning, gentlemen.
In the carriage Lavalle covered his face with his
hands. He was of a livid whiteness.
This horrible sight will never, never leave my
mind, said he; to think that this hand has hurled
that wretched being into his present state. Oh! how
much I wish I had followed your wiser counselyour
example.
He struck me, said Claude, and I thanked God
every moment I was there that I had turned from his
blood and left his punishment to Heaven. Believe me,
my friend, He who placed us in this mysterious world
meant we should govern our rash passions which
betray
us into such errors, and that our hands should
rather be lifted in humble supplication for mercy to
Him than be plunged into the
Spare me, Wyndham, spare me! I would give
all I am worth in life to wipe that rash, bad act from
my conscience.
The next day brought news of Elkington's death,
and nearly at the same hour Mrs. Denham breathed her
last. Lavalle left England and stayed many years
abroad. It is even said he once received a gross
public
insult from a young blood, for which he refused to
seek redress by a duel. Lady Beverly also remained
all her life abroad. She received from the generosity
of Claude a sufficient amount to allow her to live as
she had been accustomed to. The old Jew who had
possessed himself of such a heavy mortgage on the
Beverly estates by the necessities of Elkington, was
some years afterward brought to punishment and
transported
.
He confessed that, in order to retain the
estate
in Elkington's right, he had employed an assassin
to pursue Claude, having discovered his claim before
Elkington himself. The Digbys, on their return from
Berlin, so far from being cured of their
penchant
for
djoonies dong-song
and the
ho-tong
, came to
be very stylish people in their way. Miss Mary
appeared
in society some years afterward as
Madame la
Comtesse Lippe
, that gentleman having married her,
and now flourished among the admiring and envying
company of the Digbys as a French count ruined by
the revolution.
Thomson returned to England and acquired quite
a reputation by killing a poor French officer in a duel,
because he said, in very bad English, Jean Bull was
a bear!
He, however, fell off, in his latter years,
into a mere gambler, his idle love of whist having taken
a deeper hue. Notwithstanding his gallant feat with
the aforesaid French officer, he was horsewhipped and
had his nose tweaked by a little man at whose house
he was once playing a friendly rubber of whist; and
who, after having been beaten regularly all the
evening
,
caught him at a trick which exposed the secret.
Should we ever take up the story again, there are
several
other explanations which we shall feel ourselves
bound to make to the reader; but we must not omit to
state, that the very pretty
Miss Khl
, from whose
power
Claude had been obliged to withdraw, lest his
interesting
and amiable manners should prove too much
for her, appeared in London, in the course of a few
months after his union with Ida, as the lady of an
extremely
handsome young Russian officer, named
Count
Stroggonoffennhoff
, and made a very good appearance
by the side of the young Countess Beverly. Indeed,
Claude and Stroggthat is, her husband  became
great friends; and from the care the young man took
to present his beautiful bride to Claude, and to inform
him who she was, &c., it was evident that, although
a tolerably well-informed man, he did not know
everything
that had happened in Europe during this
eventful
century.
Should there be other points which we have failed
to clear upcharacters of whose fates we have said
nothingmysteries which we have not satisfactorily
unravelled, or, in short, anything whatever, in the
volumes
which we now bring to a conclusion, which may
appear in the least improbable, we can only assure
the reader that, by informing us of the same, we will
consult the MS. in the
Bibliothque du Roi
, under the
care of
Mr. Spiker
, the courteous and learned
librarian
;
and we pledge ourselves that all such disputed
matters shall be immediately and satisfactorily put
right.
THE END.My dear Claude
,
This will only be put into your hands in case of
my death. You will, before then, be informed on the
circumstances which produce it. I saw you struck
last night, and I lost all prudence; I interfered, and
received a blow myself. I have always been brought
up to think a
blow ought not
to be borne. Death is
preferable to dishonour. I know Elkington is a shot,
but I can't help it. The custom of society
must be
complied with. Do not blame me, my wiser and more
thoughtful friend. You have your opinion, I mine.
I am determined to kill Elkington if I can, unless he
make me the humblest apology. This is not to be
expected, and I am prepared to fall. I need not say
that I have not called on you to arrange the thing for
me, as I know you would have taken measures to
prevent
it; otherwise there is no man on earth I should
so readily have chosen. Beaufort I had a slight
acquaintance
with, and he consented at once.
I do not allow myself to think of the future; it
would be useless, and might unman me. My uncle's
fortune, you know, most unfortunately, reverts to other
heirs at my death; but I have ensured my life for
2000, which will keep
I cannot write her name
out of want. You are in a fixed position in
society
,
calm, wise, and good; and with leisure to make
this blow as tolerable as possible. She is an
angel
,
Claude. Never has she brought one frown to my face,
one shadow to my heart. She is all beauty,
compliance
,
sweetness, lovea being as rare as diamonds are.
I do not write to her. I
dare
not. I cannot. I have
tried, but there my firmness forsakes me. I love her
to adoration, the extent of which even she cannot know.
I have kissed the glove she has worn, the flower she
has touched. I have often blessed her with all a lover's
rapturein her absencein her beautiful sleep; and,
were I to suffer my thoughts to dwell longer on her,
I should let this Elkington goI should defy all men's
opinion
. But a
blow!
Destiny calls meI have no
alternative left.
You will find in my portfolio, third drawer from
the top, in the secretary of the little room I occupied
as a reading-room, a paper of directions which I have
prepared for you. The life ensurance company will
pay, I presume, without hesitation. I am quite
certain
she can never want the firm and wise protection
of a brother while
you
live. At this moment, my
fancy recurs to what may happen to-morrow; to the
pain it will inflict on her sweetsweet bosom; to the
scene which must follow any accident. I am almost
ready to acknowledge that I am
wrong
in thus
pursuing
this act; that you are rightnoblysublimely right
in your higher, milder, and
braver
course. Yes, I do
you justicefullfull justice. As my eye glances from
this sheetthe last, perhaps, I shall ever writeto the
face of
my wife
who has trusted her happiness to
me
now sealed with a calm and happy peace, which my
infatuation is so soon to destroyI feel like a scoundrel
and a fool. Yet this custom of society
must
be
complied
with. Protect her, ye angels! Pity her, oh
God!
Adieu, my friendmay we meet again!and, once
free from this affair, I here record my oath never to
engage in another. Kiss Ellen for me, should the
worst happen; and bear my blessing, my farewell to
my wife.
Ever affectionately, my dear Claude,
Your friend,
Charles Denham
.
P.S.And our journey to Italy, too!My dear General
,
I am about leaving Berlin, but cannot do so
without
performing a certain duty to myself, the necessity
of which imboldens me to address this request to you.
It is also proper that your generous confidence in me
should be confirmed; and I beg therefore to enclose to
you the accompanying letter from the Marquis of
E; a gentleman, I believe, whom Count Carolan
corresponds with, and whose opinions may have some
weight. I have a kind of right to press this letter
on Count Carolan, who has openly exhibited an
acquiescence
in the misstatements of Elkington. I leave
to his own sense of right the task of protecting my
name hereafter. As to my
courage
a suspicion of
it can only be removed by those occasions which
Providence
sends, enough to try the temper of our souls
on earth, and to furnish us an opportunity to display it
to the world when vanity requires. If circumstances
have raised a doubt of mine, it is a misfortune which,
like shipwreck or pestilence, every man is liable to,
and which, if chance does not remedy it, patience must
endure. Having deliberately adopted a principle upon
this point, I shall adhere to it and abide the
consequences
.
From all
other
doubts the letter of the
Marquis
of E rescues me; and, after perusing it, Count
Carolan will at least do me the justice to express
himself
satisfied, and to acknowledge that my past life has
been as irreproachable as it has been unfortunate.
For yourself, my dearest general, accept my thanks
for the manner in which you have interested yourself
in my favour. That there are many persons above
the prejudices of the day, and who can find other
motives
for the course I have chosen than vulgar fear, I
am convinced; but as the first who boldly took part
with the poor and the insulted, and whose superior
wisdom comprehended his actions, you will never
be forgotten by your sincere and grateful friend,
Claude Wyndham
.
Claude to Count Carolan.
Sir
,
I send you, through General St. Hillaire, a letter
from the Marquis of Efurnishing a brief history
of my past life, from his knowledge of my character
and conduct. The apparent indelicacy of presenting
an eulogium so partial, as well as my repugnance to
open any farther communication with one whose good
opinion has been withdrawn with a publicity so unjust,
would secure you against further intrusion of me or my
affairs; but a name which, however unadorned with
rank or affluence, I have endeavoured to keep at least
unstained  gives me the right to deny with proof
whatever has been asserted with falsehood and
believed
with haste. I bestow no attention on Elkington,
because he is wilfully wrong; and I offer this
explanation
to you, because I think you only carelessly so.
That you
are
wrong your perusal of the letter enclosed
will compel you to allow, and my slandered character
induces me to
demand
the acknowledgment.
I have the honour to be, your obedient servant,
C. Wyndham
.Mr. Wyndham: Sir
,
I enclose the letter of the Marquis of E, as well
as your own, without any other reply to the `
demand
'
you make for an acknowledgment of `error' than
that men's opinions are their own, and differ in many
points more doubtful and important. There is an
account
at my banker's of 50, which I will thank you
to settle.
Your obedient servant,
Carolan
.London, .
Sir
,
We beg to inform you, for your government, that
the sum hitherto deposited in our hands on your
account
has been withheld for the ensuing year, and we
are instructed that it will not hereafter be continued.
We are also grieved to inform you, that, upon the
presentation of your last draught, we were under the
unpleasant
necessity of declining to accept it, on account
of the irregularity attending your having drawn it
considerably
in advance of your income.
We annex a statement of your account, wherein
you will perceive that your draughts amount to
when, as your income up to the 1st of June
563
amounts to
525
leaves at your debit
38
of which we request you will take due note, in order
to reimburse immediately the balance, which we are
instructed to desire with the least possible delay.
We remain, sir,
Your very obedient servants,
N. B. & Co.Monsieur le Comte
,
I have been now in prison two months. I am ill
without money, without foodreduced to the
common
fare of the unhappy inmates of this mournful
dwelling. I have to inform you, also, that a fatal
pestilence
has broken out in the building, and carried off
three victims in two days. I request you, in the name
of humanity, to release me. I offer you my word of
honour not to leave Berlin without paying you. If
your object is to get the money, you can never
succeed
by keeping me here. If your object is to
humble
my pride, it is humbled as far as a man's should
be. If you desire my lifeunless I can breathe the
air and take a little exercise, your desire will
speedily
be gratified. My freedomif you grant itI shall
employ in honourable labour, of which you shall have
the first fruits. Believe me, sir, incapable of
falsehood
.
I am, Monsieur le Comte,
Your obedient servant,
Claude Wyndham
.Sir
,
I have committed the account against you to my
lawyer, who has already received his instructions, and
I cannot interfere with what now belongs entirely to
him.
Yours, etc.,
Carolan
.London, etc., etc.
Messrs. W. P. & Co., Berlin.
Gentlemen
:
At the request of the Marquis of E, and for his
account, we hereby open a credit with you in favour of
Mr. Claude Wyndham, for 1000 sterling, say one
thousand pounds sterling, which you will please to
supply him with, as he may require the same, on his
presenting to you this letter.
We are, gentlemen,
Yours truly,
N. B. & Co.My sonmy beloved son
!
You, who have borne adversity with greatness, will,
I trust, meet prosperity with dignity. I have at length
succeeded in throwing back the veil which Heaven in
its wisdom had allowed to fall over us. You are, as
from the first moment my secret presentiment might
have taught me, the child of my bosom. Enclosed is
a package which I have prepared for you. It reveals
your history and mine. I would give you no
intimation
of my convictions till they were confirmed. Not
from my hand should you receive a new
disappointment
.
The bill which accompanies this is your own.
Do not hesitate to use it. It is but a small part of the
inheritance of which you are now the master. Your
father was the Earl of Beverly. That title is now
yours. He has just expired, having previously
completed
all the arrangements essential to your
undisputed
assumption of his titles and estates. This great
blessing of Providence I am fain to receive as a reward
for a life spent in the path of
right;
but, in receiving
it, let us not forget that all earthly blessings come
mixed with calamity, and that there is no state of steady
happiness but beyond the grave. I write to you
calmly
,
my beloved son, from the very intensity of my
feelings
.
I did not put pen to paper till I had calmed
them by prayer, and sought from Him who gives and
takes away the strength necessary to support me in
this mixed hour of joy and sorrow. I have much to
tell you, and my bosom yearns to hold you again, my
son! Come to me as soon as you can, without
neglecting
duties more imperative. I have seen you
sorely
tried, and I know you to be equal to your own
guidance
;
but remember that life is short, and the greatest
happiness I can now know is your society.
Everything
is arranged for you without trouble. On
reaching
London you will drive to your own mansion in
Grosvenor Square, lately occupied by your father,
and just as he left it. The Marquis of E acts as
your agent till your arrival, and begs me to say how
profoundly he rejoices at this important change in your
prospects. Come, my son! I would repeat the
sacred
name, and I would repeat ever, to the Disposer
of human events, my prayer of grateful thanks for
being permitted to write myselfyour affectionate,
Your too happy
mother
,
Ellen Lawton
.My beloved Child
,
Having just despatched a line to your father, I avail
myself of a last moment to tell you I am in London,
well and happy. I have heard all by the attentive care
of Mr. Wyndham. I know that your father's and
uncle's
splendid fortunes are entirely sacrificed, but I
know also that you are safe, and that makes me happy.
Yes, my child, we are beggarswe have nothing; but
we shall meet in an hour, and this thought makes all
misfortunes supportable.
Adieu for an hour, etc., etc.